Long overdue review. We came here with another couple of fiends. Had fun from the start. It's a part of Palo Alto that I'm not very familiar with. I like it! It sorta retained that old world charm. This restaurant soaked up that charm. It was evident in the waiter that was assigned to us. I wish I remember his name. He was older and very gracious. Funny as hell too. We had the sangria. Or rather I had me a lot of sangria:) I had a different drink as well but I don't remember what it was. Our waiter said it was traditional too. It was good. We had the croquettes and empanadas for appetizer and bodequita de gallo and empanadas in reduced cocconut sauce plus the seafood paella. I like them all but loved the seafood paella especially. Simple decor and a separate are for the bar that looks very lively! Next time I'll park myself at the bar and then have some paella after:)
This place has by FAR the worst service ever! This is the second time I try to eat there with my husband and have not been able to. The first time, we tried going for date night and the restaurant was super busy so we left. I figured that since it was a very busy night for them, I would give this restaurant another chance. We decided to stop by and have an early dinner (5:30pm) with our daughter who is 9 months old. The restaurant was COMPLETELY empty and the hostess promised us a table.  However, she simply kept answering phone calls for a good ten minutes while telling us that she would sit us down right away. Then when she finally got off the phone, she tells us that she needs to sit her reservations before sitting us down. Serioulsy?! These people had just walked in the door!  She did  this twice... The manager noticed we were just standing there (again with a practically empty restaurant!!!) and comes to tell us that we would be seated promptly. Fat chance! Another hostess shows up and I think to myself "finally!". I figured that the other hostess was very young and perhaps new (she seemed overwhelmed even though the restaurant was not busy at all) so perhaps this other hostess would help us out! Sadly, she didn't! She just answered the phone, sat down more reservations as they kept coming in and finally turned to us and said "If we sit you down, do you think you will be done by 7:30pm? I have another reservation coming in". I couldn't believe my ears!! I worked as a hostess for a long time and never did I ever act so rude to a paying costumer, first making them wait so long for a table in an empty restaurant and then by asking such a dumb question for a reservation that was 2 hrs ahead! I have a baby, of course I'm not going to take nearly 2 hrs to eat! Finally, after a good long wait, we are taken to our table. The hostess then informs me that they do not have high chairs, just "kid friendly" pillows. Really? Pillows?! For my 9 mo old baby? First of all, I would never just place my child in a pillow and second, what restaurant doesn't have high chairs theses days?!Needless to say we left that minute! We ended up eating at the wonderful Mediterranean Wraps next door and guess what? They had high chairs and wonderful service! :) After giving this restaurant another shot, I will NEVER go back! Horrible staff!A manager who was not in the least troubled by our predicament and two very very inexperienced and apathetic hostesses. There are much better restaurants around the area, in fact, just go next door!
One of the busier (and livelier) restaurants on California Ave. With a colorful, vibrant, and musical ambiance, you are a world removed once you step inside...perhaps reminscent of a classy Havana establishment. I snacked on the empanadas, which had a nice, flaky exterior crust and flavorful interior filled with shredded pork. Personally, I'm not a mojito fan, but the place is know for them and my friend enjoyed his pretty thoroughly, so you may consider giving it a shot. P.s. Dine at the bar - the scene is casual, bustling, and perfect for such a place.
I know Palo Alto has a lot of amazing food and this place fairs pretty average to that.  The service is super nice, very friendly staff.  Even on a weekday they are pretty packed so my friend and I were lucky to have nabbed the last table.  Even with it's crowd, we were never rushed. As for food, the pork empanadas are simply amazing.  The puff pastry shell melts in your mouth and the pork is full of flavor.  This is a must get if you come.  As for entree, I ordered a Ropa Vieja and it did not disappoint.  The flavoring was just right and over a bed of rice.  My friend ordered shrimp curry and that was on a more bland side- I wouldn't recommend getting that again.  I love plaintains so these also hit the spot.  I would say that the portions seem to be on a smaller side, especially for the price.
S California Street is full of restaurants and it seemed like La Bodeguita Del Medio is the most popular out of all of them. A bar, restaurant, and cigar lounge; La Bodeguita Del Medio is probably the classiest Cuban restaurant I have ever been to. First off, the most impressive thing about this restaurant is the ambiance and service. While the food was probably only 4 stars, the amazing service and great ambiance earn that extra star to take it over the top. While I and two friends waited 30 minutes for a table, it was totally worth it. The locale is dimly lit, with a strong modern twist on the cuban "style". It's frankly a great place for a date or a get together. The servers are amazingly fast and there is almost always someone watching over you.(my water was topped several times and my utensils were replaced the second on fell on the ground.) For the food: I got my basic favorite cuban dish, the arroz con pollo. It was good, the rice was good and the plantains fresh. The chicken literally was falling off the bone. Serious flavor, my only complaint would be the serving size. It's a bit too small. In terms of apps we shared one croquetas and one Camarones con mojo. The Croquetas were good. Flavorful, interesting, but ultimately not the best I've had. The Camarones were unique and I really liked the kick of the habanero. Definitely a dish I would get again. My friends both enjoyed their dishes: Ropa Viejo and Coconut Crusted Snapper. I tried some and would definitely agree. La Bodeguita Del Medio is the real deal.
Never knew Cuban food could be so good! Starting off with a few libations to loosen everyone up - all the drinks were well made and strong. Mojitos, Cuban Sidecars, etc - we were all liquored up before the food came . The Palmitos Salad was fantastic. I love anything with hearts of palm and avocado. Add in grapefruit, candied walnuts, and greens and you have a surefire winner. If you're a fan of crab cakes - definitely order them. They were full of blue crab, perfectly seasoned on top of a bed of roasted corn salsa. The star of the whole meal was the Caribbean Curry. Its a rich seafood based coconut curry poured over a base of rice. Absolutely amazing - one of the best curries I've ever had. Make sure to end the meal with the Havana Banana dessert. Its caramelized plantains over a scoop of vanilla ice cream. Fidel Castro, eat your heart out.
I wrote this way back in June but am now finally getting around to posting it as yelp doesn't allow you to post from the phone: Everything was amazingly delicious. The really great service made it even better. Try the coconut crusted snapper, even if you don't like fish. Disclaimer: rum may have influenced the rating
Came by for dinner the other night, unsure what to expect at one of Palo Alto's top 10 restaurants that is Michelin recommended in 2011. I was blown away by Fresca in Pac Heights, had terrible Cuban food in downtown SJ, and good Cuban food down in Miami. Restaurant was definitely full during the peak dinner hour. Do make reservations, even if it's merely a day in advance. Pass on the complimentary bread...it's hard. The empanadas that Yelpers were raving about were mediocre at best. They were over-baked/fried. Try Mmoon in downtown SJ for better empanadas...and for ~$2 each too! ;) The shrimp ceviche had tons of shrimp...like ~15 pieces. It was okay. Fresca in the city has better ceviche. Tierra Y Mar definitely hit the spot as the main course. The marinated skirt steak was the best part of the meal being extremely flavorful and juicy, on par w/ NOLAs down the street. The coconut shrimp was fresh, although slightly over-fried. The asparagus and mashed potatoes were okay. The Chocolate Rum cake was on the dry side and too rich...maybe this needs to be split with a group of 4?!? Service was good, although somewhat "fake". The waitress came by a little too much asking if things were okay, in a not-so-sincere way... ...maybe if they put the entire waitstaff in a uniform?!? ...so word on the street and menu is that there is a cigar lounge somewhere in the restaurant...
mojitos are tasty as ever being that's its so hot this summer. solid apps.. had the empanadas,with a wonderful sweet sauce and the CAMARONES con MOJO is spicy outrageousness. Love, love love them. I was expecting the usual skirt steak. when I ordered ROPA VIEJA but got shredded beef.. have to read the menu more slowly.. tasty but not what I expected. service is prompt, food is yummy. Yeah, it's not Miami but enjoyable.
love the shrimp app (freakin' good!!!!!)and cuban side cars the mojitos have too much vegetation for... Read more 
Meh. The Mojito was the worst I've ever had: excessive on the lemon and club soda. We sent it back. For appetizer, we had the Croquetas: deep fried smashed potatoes with cheese. Nothing special, I feel like I could get them from the frozen section at Safeway. It took ages for the main dishes to come, but they were pretty good. I had the prawns and steak dish, my husband got a pork stew kind of dish. Seemed like they were short on staff when we were there as the servers looked tired and annoyed. If the restaurant wasn't in Palo Alto where exciting food choices aren't exactly abundant, I think it wouldn't be doing so well.
Well we went for dinner here and had seafood paella which was pretty okay, have better ones before. The empanadas were nothing great, honestly overall very mediocre food for its price. Stars are for the server who was very nice to us and no wait time. Wouldn't wanna go again.....sorry
Very rude staff! I had a reservation for 8 ppl and after waiting for half an hour they gave me a very small table that could sit maximum of 5-6 ppl. I asked if they could connect our table to another available empty table. The staff refused. I asked the manager and he said we can go find another restaurant. At this point i was so disappointed and disgusted that i asked my parents and grandma to leave for a better place. We found a good restaurant with polite staff in down town palo alto.
I LOVE this place! My boyfriend and I have been wanting to come here for the past couple months and finally we got the chance. We called ahead and they let us know there were booked for the night but we were welcome to come find a seat at the bar. After waiting around for 10 minutes a table left in the bar area. As we decided what to order, we looked around and all the food looked fantastic! We ordered the empanadas (pork), plantains and the Paella for two. The empanadas were crispy on the outside but the pork inside was very tender. The plantains were very sweet! The paella was filled with clams, prawns, chorizo and mussels. We were unable to finish, but they were yummy left overs! Can't wait to come here again, the servers are very friendly and nice.
BAD FOR GROUPS I'm giving an extra star because I've been here before and the food and service was fine for dinner for two. My fiance wanted to celebrate his 30th birthday here because in addition to dinner, he wanted to check out their cigar shop, smoking room, and scotch collection.  When I called to make reservations the person said 1. can cannot accommodate parties greater than 12, 2. they cannot make reservations for groups larger than 8 after 6pm.  We decided to limit our dinner party to 12 people and decided to come to the restaurant an hour early and wait (We hoped to have dinner at 7:30).  (I called the day before to double check our game plan and see if this possibility will work, the person said it would be fine) We came 1.5 hours early (expecting to have drinks at the bar) and checked in with the host.   She tells us that they will not be able to accommodate our group at all.  EVEN if we broke up in to two tables of six, even if we broke in to 3 groups of 4.  It's 6pm on a Tuesday and we were willing to wait until 7:30pm... REALLLLLY???!!! Ruined the rest of the evening. Avoid this place if you're looking for a restaurant to celebrate with a group of friends and loved ones. Oh yeah there is a $2 cake cutting fee per person.
This used to be one of my favorite restaurants when I lived in the area, and it was even my now-fiance's go-to place to take his dates back when he was a college-aged lothario. We both had such great memories about it that we had no problem choosing it when we needed to take my parents out for mother's day in the neighborhood. I'm sad to report that our latest visit fell way short of our high expectations. I'm not sure what has changed - the menu is the same and so is the restaurant, but the food was definitely sub-par. I tried all my usual faves: the ropa vieja, the paella, and some appetizers, and nothing had much flavor or felt very fresh. The paella was downright fishy. Even the plantains felt like they'd been sitting under the warmer too long! The mojitos were delish, and the service was fine (nothing memorable), but I have to say I walked out of there really sad. I hope it was just a one-time fluke and they can recover that magic I remember!
A friend and I were there for lunch on a weekday. She highly recommended the place since she use to go a few years back and swore by it. Suffice it to say, both she and I won't be coming back any time soon. We started with 2 appetizers, each had an entree, with 2 iced teas and after tax and tip it came out to $65, more or less. While I have no qualms about paying for good food, the price point is too much because 1) this is for lunch portions and $65 for lunch is a big stretch and 2) the authenticity just wasn't there. We ordered the empanadas and the croquetas to start. I've had better at a local carniceria for A LOT less than $10 for 3 pieces. Both of us agreed that the picadillo pork stuffing tasted like tuna fish. The sweet icing they used atop the empanada was not complementary. As for the croquetas, it was definitely the better of the two and at $8.50 for 8 pinky-length sticks of fried goodness, it was a bit more reasonable and tasty. My friend ordered the arroz con pollo and I had the ropa vieja. Let's just say that I took half of it home (not because it was SO tasty that I wanted leftovers) and 2 weeks later, it's still sitting in my fridge. The black beans were tasteless and the rice seemed undercooked, unless I was mistakened and they were going more for a risotto-style rice. The one, and only, saving grace of the entire dish were the plantanos! For a significantly better Cuban food experience, great service and for a lot less money, I'd travel to Los Cubanos in San Jose.
For the price and hype, I don't think the meal that my mother and I had was astounding. It's okay, but it's not the haute cuisine people seem to think it is. Ropa vieja was certainly enjoyable, if on the bland side. I honestly would go again for that, but chances are I'd rather make it myself. The coconut-crusted snapper was so disappointing. The fish did not taste fresh--my mother actually said it tasted as if the fish were ground up with added fillers! It's not, but yikes. And the sweetness of both the fish and boniato hash was a bit overwhelming--nothing to break it up a bit. That and the fact that they drizzled a sauce all over the coconut crust made the crust soggy and unappetizing. (I don't get why chefs do that!) And the portion size of the fish was really small compared to the other dishes that were coming out. In other words, the restaurant is a cute, bustling place that I'd take my friends to just because it's a break from the ordinary, just because it's Cuban food. But the two dishes we had at least did not have me singing along with the guitar player that night.
Food was awesome.. service was great. I recommend making reservations as they were turning people away because they were completely booked. However there is bar seating that is first come first serve. Appetizers- We ordered the Croquettas, Empanadas, and Marinated Cheese. All were excellent. The Croquetas were deep fried mash potato worderfulness that came with a tamardind chipotle bbq sauce. Empanadas were tasty.. the dough lightly sweetened. Marinated Cheese + Olive Oil = yum For dinner we had the Paella.. probably one of the best ones I've had. It says serves 2 but it can definitely feed 4. Loaded with flavor with just the right amount of spice. I would get this again.
The first time I went here I was told it was about an hour wait...far too hungry to wait, we left and went somewhere else.  Mind you this was a weekday night, yet this place was packed.  Mental note:  Must come back with reservations. A few months later, I finally was able to feast upon the delights that la bodeguita has to offer.  We started with mojitos, excellent way to start a meal!  Then followed with mussels and empanadas.  The mussels were really tasty and I loved that the sauce had a bit of a kick to it.  The empanadas weren't bad either.  We then had the ropa vieja which is shredded steak, peppers, rice, and plantanos.  This was seasoned very well and and really liked the plantanos.
Really good fish dishes and great ambience!
A friend of mine wanted to have dinner here on a Friday night. Luckily she made a reservation (pretty last minute too) since when we got there, there were a whole bunch of people in the front waiting for tables. Pretty popular place for drinks and dinner after work I guess. +Short walk from California Caltrain stop. I take Caltrain to work, so it was nice to get here via public transportation and not have to look for parking in the area! +Tierra y Mar -- the skirt steak is really good! The mashed potatoes have chili oil in it I think...makes it orange in color, but it's not spicy or anything. I liked the breaded and fried shrimp as well. Good amount of food for what you pay! +Mojito -- had to get a drink since it was Friday. Yummy! -It gets loud! Luckily they gave us a table in the adjoining room, not the one with the bar since there were people just milling about. Even sitting in the other room it was kinda hard to have a conversation with my friend sitting across from me. -Service was a bit hit and miss. Service was fine at the beginning; the waiter had to come back to take our order since we were still looking over the menu. There was another person that was checking up on our table to take empty plates and to refill our waters. We just couldn't find the waiter when we wanted to ask for the bill; he kinda plopped down the dessert menus without asking us if we needed anything else. Not a huge deal. Tips: make a reservation in advance to avoid waiting and take public transportation! If you can't find parking, go into the neighborhoods a couple streets away.
I lived and worked for several years in the Tampa area and had Cuban food all the time, but this is the best I've had. The Graycliff chowder is amazing; I get it every time I go. Everything I've had on the menu has been top notch.
Excellent Cuban food. You can also enjoy a cuban cigar after dinner in their separate smoking area. Great drink selection and the appetizers are tasty. Good place for a seated happy hour.
I have no complaints. Service was timely and friendly, mojitos were delicious and were in cool cups made especially for mojitos, crab cakes were good, bread and orange dipping sauce was unique, and paella was scrumptious.  Also had a very tarte key lime cheesecake with an awesome graham cracker crust.  My friend couldn't stand the acidity of the key lime flavor.
Great atmosphere, you have to try the black bean and plantain chip salsa, and the arroz con pollo its great! Always busy so make a reservation!
Meh. Although others I know enjoy this place, I've found the food and service to be mediocre.
I went for lunch. I ordered the ropa vieja, which is shredded steak, peppers, rice, and plantanos.  Delicious (and I enjoyed the plantanos like I'd never tasted this wonderful fruit (?) before). They don't take reservations for lunch. The place is loud. Get there by 11:30. Great bartenders! Enjoy!
I've loved just about everything I've eat at this place so I'll let the other Yelper's reviews speak to the specific dishes. The overview I can give you of this place is. It feels like Cuba when you walk into this place, at least it reminds me of it. It's a popular place so you'll always be in good company and if you like cigars they have a smoke room "Just remember to not leave your glasses there" :) It's honestly one of the most unique restaurants in Palo Alto for both food and atmosphere. So if you want to take someone (or a group of people) to something completely different you couldn't do much better then La Bodequita Del Medio!
Take me to the Caribbean! Or, at least, to La Bodeguita Del Medio. Welcoming, lively, trendy, and authentically Cuban - you couldn't even tell you were in Palo Alto. Without reservations on a Tuesday night, my friend and I luckily snagged one of the last available tables near the bar. (I'd recommend reservations in the future, even on a weekday). Crab cakes and the plantain chips to start - and wow, those freshly crisp plantain chips were unforgettable. My friend enjoyed the flavors of La Bodeguita's version of Surf N' Turf, Tierra Y Mar. This coconut shrimp and strip steak special were packed with mouthwatering flavor. The order I was graced with, the Arroz Con Pollo, the braised chicken with the perfect, juicy taste - accompanied with yellow rice and the perfect sweet compliment, (even more) plaintains - was the perfect combination on my palate. We'll be back to this Havana namesake soon, on our quest to savor more of this cuban flavor.
This is not the first time I came to this restaurant: they have renovated the place with better decor since a couple of years ago!  I like the paintings on the wall.  Now it's even a pretty good place for a romantic dinner! The paella was yummy and well-presented.  The curry shrimp (not sure if curry is authentically Cuban) was also quite nice with fresh shrimps.  We also tried the coconut crusted red snapper which was OK.
I love love this place! Went for my Mom's bday and followed my fellow yelpers reccomendations. The skirt steak was simply the bomb!
Your options of finding an Authentic Cuban restaurant such as this are this location or their other location in Cuba.  What a great spot our local friends of Palo Alto chose for our one night in the lovely little town. Both my buddy and I each started with a ZACAPA MANHATTAN with a sipping rum called 23-year-old Ron Zacapa Centenario, Carpano Antica sweet vermouth and a maraschino cherry on the rocks.  The ladies each had a mojito to start that was pretty satisfying as well. We all shared the shrimp ceviche in coconut milk and the empanadas as well as chopped romaine salad.  These were all pretty good standard starters.  It was the main courses that stole the show.  The ladies were so happy to share the BODEGUITA SEAFOOD AJIACO with Lobster tails, mussels, prawns, yuca, plantain, spicy tomato cream sauce, served with a side of rice and beans.  Definitely try this dish.  It would be a shame not to sample this delicious Carribean curry.  My buddy had the MASITAS of shredded pork, black beans and rice.  And I had the TIERRA Y MAR (you guessed it smarty pants...their version of Surf & Turf) Marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted shrimp, sofrito mashed potatoes, avocado cilantro pesto. Service was super friendly and welcoming.  There's a bar room and a dining room.  The whole feeling is very casual and friendly.  Enjoy this treasure.
Have been to La Bodeguita more than a few times over the years, but for some reason have never reviewed it.  That ends today. Went in for lunch today with colleagues and really enjoyed the meal.  I have always been happy with the food, but I think what was particularly impressive to me this time was that the quality of the food and the level of service has been consistent over the many years I have been dining there. What the table ordered: Ropa Vieja  (shredded, slow-cooked skirt steak) Masitas (slow-cooked, spicy pork) Pan Cubano (the signature pressed Cuban sandwich) Plantain Chips and black bean salsa What I love about La Bodeguita is that the food is spiced well and balanced.  Not too much heat (but enough to make a spicy food lover like me happy) and nothing is "one-note" in flavor.  Even the black bean salsa served with the plantain chips had the right amount of chile, lime, garlic, and salt.  It's "just salsa'" I know, but it makes a difference when it tastes "just right."  I enjoyed the slow-cooked pork (Masitas), which was served with black beans and rice, and the others in my party were very happy with how flavorful their meals were. Portion sizes leave you pleasantly full and are not coma-inducing, which is nice for a midday meal. Whether you come for lunch or dinner (dinner has a larger menu, so I would recommend you do try dinner there), I think your palate will be pleased. Not cheap, but not over the top expensive for good eats, and you could definitely have fun if you just spent time having signature cocktails and eating bar bites, too. Parking, well, pretty much sucks at lunchtime, but there are free parking garages and free parking lots up and down California Ave so eventually, you'll find a spot.  And after you have a good meal at La Bodeguita, you'll see that it was worth the hassle.
Still a great place to dine and have some Cuban fix. EMPANADAS- Shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilis, pepper jack, coconut-jalapeno sauce- reminded me of a calzone or hot pocket, fried and filled with goodies. MARINATED CHEESE- Iberico cheese, olive oil, fresh herbs and black pepper- kind of a sharp tasting cheese in cubes, nothing special, didn't really taste the herbs. Also learned that they have a little Cigar shop in the back and also a back room where you can smoke it, nice touch.
Walked by and decided to have lunch here. We started with their SHRIMP CEVICHE- Black beans,... Read more 
I've been eating here regularly for five years. Today I was refused a table for two because I was holding a coffee from Starbucks. "We don't allow outside beverages" quipped the smiling hostess with a situationally inappropriate delivery suggestive of a preteen Twilight fangirl. The GM towed the same Party line, replete with tepid demeanor and laissez faire body lethargy. If you value good service and a restaurant that truly appreciates your repeat business, look elsewhere. I certainly will.
I had never tried Cuban food and was anxious to find a great restaurant for my first Cuban experience so I turned to my wonderful friend Yelp for help. I stumbled across La Bodeguita Del Medio and got instantly excited. After seeing the pictures of the paella, I'm pretty sure I almost started drooling. It was a done deal. I gave them a call at 5 since they opened at 5:30 hoping to get a reservation and they were completely booked. Noooooooo! But then she said that they had tables in their bar area that were first come, first serve. Yesssss! "Babe! We need to go NOW!" My boyfriend and I hopped in the car and sped to Palo Alto. They had plenty of parking in the lot behind the restaurant which was unexpected and a really nice surprise. When we walked in they still had a few free tables in the bar area so we swooped quick style. My boyfriend chose the embutidos as our appetizer which were three cured meats from Spain. The chorizo was definitely our favorite and all three would have paired nicely with some cheese, but I'm not sure if that would be typical of Cuban cuisine. Of course we had to order the Seafood Paella and it was awesome! The seafood was very fresh and cooked to perfection. Every bite was packed with flavor and it was easily enough for 3 people. Even though I was already stuffed, I couldn't resist my boyfriend's offer to order the Havana Bananas. That dessert is a piece of heaven sent from the gods themselves! Caramelized bananas, spiced walnuts, cinnamon, and vanilla ice cream?! AMAZING and worth every penny! The only disappointments for the evening was that it was a bit noisy and crowded in the bar area, as to be expected, and the fact that they charge for soda refills even though you know its coming from the bar tap. This was truly an awesome first introduction to Cuban cuisine and we definitely plan on returning although we will make sure to make reservations for the dining area.
The music and atmosphere are great! The drinks are delicious, and the food is fairly expensive but very good.
Went there last night with the husband and boy was I a happy gal! I've been craving some good paella for the longest time and the need was satisfied last night. Also I got to have some delicious shrimp ceviche and some refreshing rose sangria, so I really couldn't complain. The olive oil they give out with the bread is so good, too! I asked them if they sold it for us to take home, and they said they're working on it and it'll be available for sale soon, so YAY! The paella is huge and not cheap, so I recommend sharing it among at least 3 people, even though on the menu it says for two people. Perfect place for a Friday evening! Just wish it was a tad bit cheaper!
Why I haven't dined more in downtown Palo Alto is beyond me. But it's my goal to make my way out there more often. I used my trusted Yelp app to find this place! Here's what I had (it was my first time trying Cuban food): Shrimp ceviche [Black beans, habanero, coconut milk, key lime and cilantro] - So tasty and I loved how they served it with plantain chips. I haven't had ceviche with coconut milk, so this was a surprisingly delicious twist. Empanadas [Shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilies, pepper jack, coconut-jalapeno sauce] - I don't usually eat pork, but I usually love empanadas, so I made an exception. I'm glad I did! Muy delicioso! Ropa Vieja [Shredded skirt steak, chilies, peppers, platanos maduros, yellow rice] - I've always heard of this, so I had to try it. It was good, just a bit on the spicy side (because of the chilies - duh to me). I love plantains, so the addition of their sweetness to this dish was very good. The service was good. At times they took a little longer refilling my water and they weren't ridiculously busy. But overall, they were very courteous and our meals didn't take a long time. I found a parking lot nearby, so that was a plus. I'll be back.
What a cute place! Thank God for Yelp. Just when I thought I had exhausted my choices on University, I came across La Bodeguita, tucked away on California. We came here for Valentine's Day but called the day before to make a reservation. Obviously they were booked to capacity but we came later around 8 pm to see if could avoid the dinner rush. Success! We were seated in minutes. Some must tries: Sangria - it's not too sweet, not too winey, and deliciously refreshing. Aroz Con Pollo - Soft, moist chicken, sweet platanos and yellow rice; excellent combination of sweet and savory. Croquetas - Cheesy, bready, fried. Yup. Masitas - I think this was my favorite; there's something about beans and rice that is so satisfying. Topped with spicy pork and I'm set for the night. We also had the empanadas were so-so. The ambiance is perfect for a date night or to catch up with a good friend. I want to come back and try their mojitos and smoking lounge. There's a huge parking lot in the back as well as metered parking in the front. Loved the personal, friendly service and will definitely recommend this spot to others!
Four of us went for dinner to this restaurant on a Saturday. There is free parking in a lot next to the restaurant. As we had already made reservations, we were comfortably seated within a few minutes after we arrived. There was live music and they have a full bar. For some reason, I visualized this restaurant to be quiet and romantic, but I was wrong. We were served complimentary bread and olive oil. The bread wasn't warm and soft, so I was not too fond of it. I loved the Dulche le Leche cocktail. For appetizers, we ordered Empanadas and Crab cakes, there were delish. My husband and I shared a plate of Tierra Y Mar entree; the presentation of the food was fantastic and the steak was cooked to perfection. Absolutely loved it! We topped off the meal with Key Lime Tart and Chocolate Rum Cake, which was bathed in rich chocolate. Chocolate loves will go nuts for this one!
Went back with my oldest so she could try it before she left on a trip - and I'm SO GLAD we went again! Everything was SO YUMMY - and this time we also had their Sangria! I wish they served it by the pitcher... but then again it was good to limit us... so refreshing and just the right sweetness... This time we also tried the Paella - So delicious - the seafood flavor is addicting and the rice very tasty... we have leftovers which we will be eating tonight! :) We also tried the Ropa Vieja - oh my - so tender and flavorful.  I loved my Arroz con Pollo - our family usually eat chicken at home so I typically don't order it when we go out but this chicken is SO tender and flavorful - and add the rice and plantanos... you just can't help but to gobble it down. My daughter LOVED her Tierra Y MAR - thae sofrito mashed potatoes are a perfect complement to the marinated skirt steak and coconut crusted shrimp and aspargus - she growled at anyone who tried to sneak any off her plate!! Still loved the mussels - was just as yummy as the first time we came! And this time we tried the FLAN - OH MY!  Tall and creamy and flavorful... event though we were full - we gobbled it up! Recommend reservations and we learned this time that there's a parking lot in the back so it was easy to find parking... Thanks for being so consistently awesome! :)
OMG! I've had cuban food at Cha Cha Cha is SF and thought - it's okay - I like it but after having... Read more 
Stopped in on a Wednesday night to check this place out. I arrived a little earlier than expected which gave me a chance to check things out. Around 6:45pm this place was jumping, the bar was full and the dining area was packed as well, so I was looking forward to a great time. Appetizer: Empanadas - delicious and filled with pork, always a good starter. Plantain Chips - with guacamole dip was a great choice as well. Entrees: Coconut Snapper - The snapper was deep fried in a coconut basted batter. Great taste and was surprisingly good. Plato de Veg - This was an enjoyable meal. Drinks: Old Cuban - Sweet but good Rum Negroni - mixed with Campari one of my favorites. Dessert: Chocolate Cake - the cake was pretty dense and not how we would've expected to close out the night with dessert. :/ This may have been a 5 star if our waiter was more attentive to the table.
Pretty good Cuban food for a decent price. I LOVE me some Cuban food! My friend and I had never been here and decided to give it a shot. She arrived before me and put her name down and was told we'd have to wait about 30 minutes. We stood in the restaurant for about 30 when we asked how long we'd have to wait. They told us a little while longer. Then after 10 more minutes she asked again and they told us that there was a table available but we'd have to be done eating in an hour and a half. Apparently the table had been open for about 20 minutes...we didn't understand why we hadn't just been seated earlier. There was plenty of time to eat so we just sat down. (For the record we finished our meal in about 40 minutes). The service after that was very fast. And the food was pretty good. I got the Ropa Vieja (braised beef, rice and fried plantain). This dish usually comes with black beans but not here, so I ordered it as a side. The waitress said that they didn't normally do that but she'd see what she could do. They brought the beans and I was a very happy camper. My one gripe with the food was that there wasn't really enough rice. Other than that though everything was delicious, especially the plantains! I would come back here, but maybe try and make reservations beforehand.
One of my favorite restaurants in the palo alto area. Perfect for a special date night. We came here and had: The Especial Empanadas (not usually on menu) Shrimp Ceviche The Bodeguita Seafood Ajiaco (soo good) Mojitos EVERYTHING was fantastic. Their waiters are charming and the overall ambience of the restaurant is very nice as well.
Came here for dinner with a friend.  I've been here once before and it strikes me as a nice place to have a meal with a lively feeling.... We got the CROQUETAS appetizer, which are crispy potato fritters with aged Spanish cheese accompanied with a tamarind-chipotle BBQ sauce. I ordered the ROPA VIEJA, which consists of shredded skirt steak, chilis, peppers, plantanos maduros, yellow rice. Thought the appetizer was alright, but I did enjoy the Ropa Vieja as it was rather flavorful and reminded me of comfort food..... Had some wine with dinner, which was a good compliment. Recommend this place!
**STROH RUM PUNCH AND ROPA VIEJA EXCEEDED MY CUBAN DESIRES** Nice ambiance with a friendly staff. ORDERED: STROH RUM PUNCH ($9) - Best drink on California Avenue. Period. I was stumbling out of the place after two of these. ROPA VIEJA ($12) - The shredded skirt steak, chilis, peppers, plantanos maduros, and moros y cristianos was very good. I loved the plantanos; sweet and flavorful. It wasn't a cheap lunch, but it was worthy. Good place for groups and couples. Make reservations beforehand because it will get busy. RECOMMEND.
So delicious! Went there for lunch, sat outside and ordered the Ropa Vieja. It was delicious and the service was great. Definitely would go back and recommend it to friends!
I'm pretty sure this isn't totally authentic but who cares.  It's a nice place in a perfect location for after work dinner and drinks for client and customer working meetings or just to meet up with friends. My two favorite dishes are the Tierra Y Mar and Bodeguita Seafood Ajiaco.  Other rocommended dishes are the Masitas, Ropa Vieja, and Coconut Crusted Snapper.  Basically just about everything on the menu has been pretty good.  Some colleagues love the Mojitos here as well so you might want to try that out.  I tried it but maybe they hyped it up too much.
Food-yum! Service- fantastic. Atmosphere usually busy but fun. Great drinks! Love the paella & steak/coconut prawns.always perfectly done. Rum bananas for dessert- crazy good! Can be busy on weekends so u might need a reservation! Worth it!
This place rocks! The food is amazing! The tierra del mar is yummy  my favorite! The mojitos are the... Read more 
In search of my favorite cuban restaurant, along comes "La Bodeguita Del Medio". Love Love this place! So many items to choose from but I always go with my usual Ropa Vieja (tender and flavorful) which comes with platinos maduros and yellow rice..For starters you have to order the Croquetas( potato fritters) which comes with dipping sauce and finish the meal with a cafe con leche( only place in the bay I have found that serves this) Of course they have all sorts of rum drinks, in fact they even have rum tasting if you are into that. This is the real deal so come and check this place out!
Needed a place to celebrate a post-birthday dinner with some friends. Yelp comes to the rescue as usual!  I made reservations for 6 people on a Friday night for 8pm. We arrive 20 minutes to the place and it is packed!  Even with reservations, we waited at least 30 minutes. But, the hostess informs us that we are getting a really nice table. Once we're seated, I have to agree with the hostess. It's a pretty good table!! We are way in the back, facing the whole rest of the restaurant. And it's a booth! So, waiting makes up for it. Our table ordered: For starters: Shrimp ceviche, Crab cakes and Empanadas. All of these items were so delicious!! For entrees: Arroz con Pollo, Ropa Vieja, Caribbean Curry, Tierra Y Mar and the Seafood  Ajiaco. For cocktails: You HAVE to get the sangria! It is hands down THE best sangria I've had anywhere. You really couldn't taste the alcohol and I have to say, it was pretty strong. My friend and I were both pretty tipsy after have 2 glasses of it. I had the Tierra y Mar and it was simply delicious!! The meat was so tender. My only gripe was that my mashed potatoes were hotter than my steak. I would've preferred my steak to be hotter. But, oh well! I scarfed it down. Service, Ambiance and Food were top here. I'd definitely come back again!
Ajiaco.  We come at least once a year, and we split the Ajiaco.  It is too good to possibly consider getting anything else.  (ok, we came for lunch once and got something more reasonable).  The ajiaco is an amazing creamy based seafood stew/chowder that seriously is big enough for 2.  We always end up taking enough home for at least one lunch of leftovers.  So $50 for dinner for two (with leftovers) isn't the most expensive, right? Some of their appetizers are pretty good.  We had the olives once and were unimpressed (I think there was a cheese thing we didn't care for either). The danger: rum.  They have an amazing selection of sipping rums.  Sure, you could get a mojito, but can't you get those at Taco Bell these days?  Their rum selection is amazing and not something most places have.  The price per drink varies, just like Scotch.  But we can easily end up spending over $30 per person on drinks here. Finally, there is a cigar room in back.  Because of state regulations, employees can't go inside.  You need to order alcohol at the bar and take it back yourself (and bring your empty glasses back out to the bar).  If you let someone know, they can come in a back door to the humidor and sell cigars.  We like splitting a cigar to end the evening (with a final glass of rum or two).  Usually the room back there is empty or close to it but has a welcoming vibe. It is possible to have an amazing dinner here for 2 for $50 (or less).  We end up having an amazing romantic evening for $150.
Came for lunch to meet a friend. Friendly service, delicious food and cool ambiance... couldn't have picked a better place to get together! we ordered: Empanadas - crispy, flaky, flavorful Cuban Sandwich - my friend said it was good (but only ate half of it... don't know if it was because it's a large portion or if it was just an ok sammich) Ropa Vieja - tons of flavor, love the balance of the sweet plantains and slightly salty yumminess of the steak with rice and beans. I ate it all. :) Key lime pie - tarty and sweet with a flaky crust Chocolate cake - very dense, very sweet, very chocolatey! The only reason I'm giving 4 stars instead of 5 is I think they are pricey for lunch. Definitely a great experience though! We'll definitely be back... hopefully with a larger group of friends to try dinner & cocktails & cigars! ;)
I was surprised by how good this place was. The Ropa Vieja was incredible... tender, juicy, bursting with flavor. The plaintains and rice were perfectly done. My friend loved the bean soup and cuban sandwich, and I got to try the crusted fish entree. ALL DELICIOUS. The service was great. The ambiance is wonderful. I would come back again and again! My only problems were 1. It's on the pricey side and 2. The sangria was weak and not as good as I wanted it to be. UPDATE: You know what, I'd say La Bodeguita is one of my favorites in the Palo Alto are. The Ropa Vieja is still one of the best dishes on the menu. I've also tried the salad with pomegranate reduction and goat cheese croutons-- amazing!! I'd love to get this again though the portion is small. The drinks are also great. Our waiter recommended El Presidente (which reminded me of very expensive, alcoholic orange soda... but I digress). The coconut crusted snapper was fantastic as well. This is a great place for special occasions.
Came here for lunch today and their salmon salad is SUPERB! The fish flakes into slices and is oh so tender. Love the light dressing on the salad, thinly sliced onions, and asparagus. Perfect light yet filling lunch =) I want to come back here for lunch again! The wait staff is also very friendly and attentive.
Delicious food!! I've been here one time for dinner and many times for lunch and I've always been happy with the food! I've had Tierra Y mar and a lot of their specials and they are all good. I also love their Mojito! As for appetizers go I've tried them all but their Shrimp Ceviche and Pan roasted mussels are the best & amazing! I pretty much didn't  used to like mussels until I ate them here, and probably this is still the only place I would order them.
Great Food, amazing drinks(ask for the top shelf Mojitos) they are a must....most of the food is well priced and has not been overly Americanized beber bien mi amigo
Overly hyped up. Good overall. I wouldn't say I'm a fan, but I wouldn't complain if someone wanted to come here. I would probably even suggest it if someone said "hey, how about some Cuban food?" I love good Cuban food, and while this place fits the bill for the most part, it's definitely missing that je ne sais quoi. I ordered a Dark and Stormy cocktail. It was fine, but pricey for what it is. I prefer a ginger beer with a little more kick. The (blue crab) crab cake appetizer was good, but you get three tiny crab cakes the size of falafel. Considering the portion sizes for the other dishes seemed so generous, this seemed a little stingy. The roasted corn salsa on the side was good, though perhaps a tad dry. The croquetas were very good, but I liked the carrot slaw on the side even more. My dad and I split the Paella de la Bodeguita. The flavors were very good, and the dish was definitely stew-like. But it said "en cazuela," so I expected the delicious crisped rice that comes along with that. I mean, why serve it in the paella pan otherwise? So yes, there was no crisped, pan-seared rice in the paella. To me, this is like getting dolsot bibimbap at a Korean restaurant for no other reason than having your rice kept warm. What a waste for presentation. Obviously, this killed much of the enthusiasm I had for the restaurant, and why I'm super hesitant to give this place more than three stars. The desserts were good. Flan was light, soft, and eggy, and the key lime tart was lime-y without being overwhelming. I wished the crust was a little less soggy. If you're going to go there, why not go all the way?
5 stars all around!! I can't rave enough how great this place was!! My husband and i went here for our anniversary dinner and had Charles as our server. He was excellent. We never had to ask him for more refills or anything. He joked around a little bit and as the night got busier.. his mood didn't change at all!! Charles suggested for us to try the empanadas for our appetizer. omg.. these are some of the best empanadas we've had!!! It melted in your mouth. For dinner i had the arroz con pollo and my husband had the ropa vieja. Can i just tell you.. i'm already wondering when my husband and i are going to return. I loved the plantains that came with the meal and i made sure to save some food for lunch the next day. It still tasted just as good. We finished off the evening with the havana banana based on all the other yelp reviews i read. My fellow yelpers definitely did not steer me wrong with it. I loooove dessert and this one was great! My husband ate just as much of it as i did.. and that means he liked it. I recommend this place to anyone wanting to try cuban food. Two thumbs up and 5 stars from me and my husband ;)
Came here for hubby's birthday and we both loved it. Food was good...we tried their skirt steak after reading all the reviews here and were satisfied. I ordered the Havana Bananas for dessert and asked our waitress to put a candle on top for hubby's birthday. She brought out the Havana Bananas as well as a Key Lime Pie (on the house). Service is excellent, setting is nice & casual, mojitos are yummy! What's not to like about this place?
Get the cuban sandwich. It's a huge portion and really, really good, especially if you're a fan of paninis and other grilled, pressed sandwiches. I wanted the pickles and mustard on the side but was informed that the sandwiches are premade in the morning, so they already included the mustard. They were able to put the pickles on a separate plate though. The sandwich was served cut in two diagonal wedges on a bed of spring greens in light dressing. I also had the chance to try the yuca fries which were only okay. Their two dipping sauces seemed a bit weak. One was a tamarine chipotle sauce and the other was a garlic something. I think I will forgo the fries next time but go for the sandwich. I've also heard that this place has a great happy hour, so I will try to stop by after work some time. The atmosphere early on a Saturday night was pretty dull until about 8pm when there were many patrons waiting for a table and the music was turned up high. The interior is quite intimate when the lights are dimmed and candles at each table. Service is very attentive and friendly.
We came here for the last lunch of the summer. The place was pretty packed, but we were armed with a... Read more 
Really good but also expensive. Special occasions kind of restaurant due to the price, but definitely worth coming back even for casual dining since it's so dang good. Came here Friday night for an early Mother's Day dinner part uno. We picked this place since I received a gift certificate for a free dinner so might as well make an occasion out of it =) I made reservation for 6:30pm and it was PACKED. The bar, outside patio, and the dining room were all full. Making a reservation is highly recommended. We ordered the empenada and the croquette for appetizer, the paella for two, the Tierra Y Mar, and the special fish of the day (seabass). Everything was delicious! The empenada (3 pieces) was very tasty. Pulled pork was tender and soft and the outer shell was thin and crunchy. Loved it. The croquette (7 pieces) was alright. I didn't like the tamarind/chipotle bbq sauce that it came with. But it was smooth and crispy. Yum. I expected the Seafood Paella ($48) to be huge from reading the Yelp reviews so we order it to share. It was really goood!! One of the best I've ever had. DEFINITELY can feed more than the 2 people the menu suggested. I like all the seafood that was in it, they did not skimp on those items inside the paella. Lots of shrimps, calamari, mussels and clams and they tasted fresh! Spicy and savory and deelicious! A must try! The skirt steak on the tierra y mar ($25) dish was really  tender and i like the cilantro avocado dressing that was drizzled on top. The large coconut shrimp was also really tasty! The batter was light, it was sweet yet savory. Came with asparagus and sofrito mashed potato. The seabass special ($25) was oh-so-juicy! It had a lime sauce over it and was served on a bed of veggies and sweet mashed potatoes- very unique! We were stuffed by the end of our wonderful meal. Food was absolutely great! Service was also good given how busy the restaurant was that night, our waiter and sever was still able to be attentive, helpful, and cheerful. They were very welcoming and accommodating! I will be back! Highly recommend!
The atmosphere in here is warm and cozy -- once you're inside you'll feel transported out of suburban Palo Alto and into some exotic locale. The drinks are fun, not too expensive, and the waiters are very accommodating. Plus, their croquetas are delicious and authentic. Highly recommended appetizer.
I don't venture out of SF often but when I do, I make sure the trip is worth it.  After strong recommendations from multiple yelp friends, this one topped the list for my friend's belated birthday dinner. I imagine that Cubans would naturally start dinner with a cocktail or a glass of rum. La Bodeguita has excellent lists for both so we did just that. They have wine and beer available, but how could you pass on the cocktails? The Hemingway had rum, fresh lime juice and maraschino served in a sugared rim martini glass. It was so easy to drink that I had two. We shared crispy plantain chips with black bean salsa and embutidos (cured meats that include chorizo, lomo and serrano) at the bar and finished those in no time flat. After transferring to the tropically decorated and warmly lit dining room, we settled in and our waiter quickly took our orders. The shrimp ceviche had a cute presentation and came in a highball glass. Interesting to note is that this was made with coconut milk, which I really liked. The Ropa Vieja was a winner with its fork tender skirt steak, chilies, peppers, sweet plantains and yellow rice. My friend had the masitas: spicy roasted pork over white rice and black beans, which was delicious as well. The yummy cocktails, tropical ambiance and supreme entrees make La Bodeguita a standout on this stretch of S. California Ave.
Came here for dinner with a group of friends.The place looks nice from outside. It is very crowded and noisy the moment you get inside.I had  plantain Crusted goat cheese for main course ( it was very blend and with no dressing) since the sellection for vegetarian dishes was very limited( only one on the menu except for salad)and for dessert I had Havanna banana which was yummy:) but I have to say they had much better food than I expected it since I had such a bad experience with Cuban food when I was in Cuba. Atmosphere: noisy, not suited for a romantic dinner Service: ok Price: a bit on the pricy side considering quality of the food. I could spend that money on. Better food. Food: poor menu selection, if you are vegeterian I suggest you go somewhere else. Overall:nice  experience to eat  there but I think this was probably my first and last time there!
Came here last night for a birthday dinner.  Really liked the decor - warm colors, tropical potted plants and lazy fans overhead all added to the feeling that perhaps I was really in Cuba.  We noticed that the silverware was real silver, and that most of it did not match. I was delighted that they had yucca fries.  My salad was tasty, creamy and rich with manchego cheese, with a slight kick to it compliments of some kind of pepper/chili.  The portions are large, and the staff is nice and generous.
This review will be focused on lunch since I've only tried it for lunch.  Ordered the carne asada sandwich which consists of a bun with a ridiculous amount of tri tip.  The tri tip was coated with red pepper sofrito which gives it a unique taste.  Even though it's red and contain red pepper, it's not spicy at all.  The entree comes with a side of small green salad to compensate for the carnivorous meal.  Overall, it was a great choice.  My bitburger pilsner complimented the meal!
Wonderful food. Great atmosphere. Addictive plantain chips. Incredible mojitos. Hemingway would approve.
Went for lunch awesome service and even better food. Need to go back for Mojitos and tapas
This place is nice because the menu is surprisingly small, and the drinks menu is larger than the normal menu.  This calls for a good time, I liked the Cuban Sidecar. I don't recall which other appetizers I ordered, I just remember crab croquette and the Embutidos being good.  We made a mistake of ordering one of the lamb special AND the paella.  We figured "we can eat a lot"...ok we can't eat that much.  The Paella, although it's for 2 people, is definitely for 4 people, unless you don't plan on eating anything else that night.   Only bad thing is there's a split charge of $2 on other plates. Parking: Street parking (lots of it).
I grew up in Havana as a child and this place definitely gave me a nostalgia i haven't felt in years.  Maybe it was the guitarrista's raspy yet comforting voice or the familiarity of the acoustic latin melodies coming from his guitar, but i was a fan the second i walked into this place. Since i had just flown into San Jose from SoCal i had no idea what surprise my girlfriend had planned for dining out.  When we walked into the restaurant there were no tables available so we both sat at the bar to order drinks.  The mojito was not the best i have tasted and is the only reason this place didn't get the 5th star.  One thing you have to realize about the mojito is that it is probably one of the hardest drinks to make and requires the bartender to put some serious effort into making it taste special. We were able to eat at the bar and ordered the chicken empanadas as an appetizer.  Not only were these the best empanadas i have ever tasted, but we had to order a second plate of them because the succulent, amazing taste left in our mouths was just too torturous to ignore. My girl ordered the arroz con pollo as her main entree and i ordered the tierra y mar.  The presentation was creative, the service was friendly and while the restaurant was buzzing with customers we didn't have to wait long for our food to arrive.  The steak just melted in my mouth, it had to be some of the best quality beef i have tasted in a while.  It came with shrimp and some delicious mashed potatoes that when mixed with the pesto-like sauce on the meat made me wish that moment would never end. We finished off with a decent Flan for the postre that had an interesting zesty-lemony flavor that at first confused my taste buds and made me question if i had ordered the right dessert.  I am quite used to the caramelized taste of my mother's Flan recipe that she learned from one of our neighbors in Havana. The best part of the night was the great Rum selection they offered at the bar. Our bartender was even nice enough to give me a taste of a few aged Rums that had some excellent flavor. Overall, its a wonderful place and i definitely plan to take my lady there again as soon as i get back up to the Bay.
Their Cuban sandwich is delicious. And its one of the less costly things on their menu! When you go, I highly recommend their empanadas, Cuban sandwich and a nice, tall glass of beer. They have a good selection of beer and the sandwich and empanadas will leave you feeling satisfied. Since I like to eat a lot, I also ordered the Arroz Con Pollo and Camarones, because I was told they packed great flavor, but I found them lacking. Stick with the sandwich and empanadas and you'll be happy.
Great service and really good food! Go. Go. Go!
being a palo alto restaurant, you cant really expect much and this is a very typical palo alto restaurant that is catered to "palo alto" people as the food is just ok while prices arent necessarily cheap or a good deal. what really bugged me is that they dont give you free soda refills. i refuse to go back to any place that does not have free soda refills, and i actually dont order sodas at restaurants that often but i know that most places usually give you a free soda refill. we also ordered a small child portion of cranberry juice and they charged us $3.25 which was pretty crappy since it was literally almost the size of a shot glass. foodwise it was nothing spectacular and ive had way better cuban food. the plaintain chips were normal, not particularly tasty and i personally thought the croquetas were gross. the masitas says spicy roasted pork on the menu and i asked the waiter how spicy it was, and he said it was "palo alto" spicey, so in other words, its not really spicey at all. the dish itself was ok and the pork was cooked fine. the ropa vieja, shredded skirt steak tasted good but looked sort of gross and mushy and tasted mushy just like it looked.
Came last night for a going away party. Mojito. made w/ Bacardi limon. Yummy. They even have the recipe written on the collins glass for you to learn how to make the perfect Mojito. reminds me of Miami. Tried the Cocoa spritzer. Malibu rum. Soda water. Mm! light and refreshing. Crab cakes - pleasant appetizer. The corn relish was awesome. i couldn't get enough of it, it had a nice spicy kick to it too. and the crabcakes were no joke. tasty and fresh bits of crab! So good! Pork Empanadas. perfectly crispy non greasy empanadas, with pickled carrots (yummo!) on a bed of black beans (meh) Coconut crusted snapper. This was good. the boniato mash was super creamy. the snapper was more on the sweet side, and the sauce was tart and citrusy. It didn't hit the spot for me. but the crust was nicely crunchy without the greasiness. so it was nicely cooked. I'm just a fan of more savory than sweet and sour dishes. Tried the skirt steak and coconut shrimp dish. the coconut shrimp was so good! not sweet, the perfect amount of savory and crispy-ness sans grease. and the skirt steak was a perfect medium rare. Great place to eat at. especially in groups. :)
My first experience with Cuban food and I can't stop thinking about it. Our department came here for a colleague's birthday lunch and us "first timers" were all very pleased. It is a very quaint environment and you might miss it if you are not actively looking for it. I eat at different restaurants off California all the time, but always walked right past this place. I haven't ate red meat in over a month and a half so my body was yearning for it. I ordered the Ropa Vieja which is shredded skirt steak over rice with plantains. Each bite made me happier, leaving me to wonder why on earth I decided to give up on meat in the first place. Prices are affordable and portions are filling. Service is just OK. I'm already planning my next visit.
La Bodeguita del Medio So I came here with a co-worker for lunch.  We had arrived 10 minutes early prior to the restaurant opening (11:30).  Sometimes there is already a line, but maybe today is Monday and there was no line.  As the doors opened we were the first to be greeted and seated.  Nice clean table and menu awaited our presence. Since we don't make our way out here too often we wanted to get a few dishes to share....(more to sample). For the appetizers we had ordered the: Empanadas Shredded Picadillo Pork with roasted chilis, pepper jack and coconut-jalapeno sauce.  The shredded picadillo pork was wrapped and baked in bread.  A yummy 4 star dish. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Here is what the inside looks like. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... SHRIMP CEVICHE Black beans, habanero, coconut milk, key lime and cilantro Lots of shrimp here....if you like a shrimp cocktail you'll love this dish.  This dish is served cold.  3.5 stars dish. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... For our Entrees we had: BISTEC DE PALOMILLA Marinated Grilled Steak served with Plantain (platanos maduros) on top of the famous Cuban Rice and Bean (moros y cristianos). This is a Cuban-style filet mignon. The lime juice, onions, and garlic are essential in giving the steak its flavor.  Not as tender as I would like it to be....but yet tasty. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... I'd have to give this a 3.5 to 4 star dish. MASITAS Sauteed Cuban Spicy Roasted Pork Shoulder, served with white rice and black beans and topped of with caramelized red onions. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... The rice on this dish was very good.  The pork is not very spicy.  4 star dish. After eating the 4 dishes we did not have room for a dessert.  This is a nice relaxing place to chill and chat.  Can be romantic, can be socializing.  Make this the restaurant you want it to be and you'll have a good time.  People here are very nice and they did check in on us from dish to dish.  The check in's by the staff was much appreciated!! Cheers to good food and good drinks.
La Bodeguita del Medio is my go-to place for quality Cuban food (and beverage!); the service is stellar and the ambiance perfect for a night out. Most times, I order their arroz con pollo with white-meat only as my entree, but I've also tried their Caribbean curry. For dessert, you can't go wrong with their key lime tart, Havana bananas, or flan. Salud!
Good place. I'm a recovering vegetarian, so I've been gradually easing myself into the shallow end of the carnivorous life- I opted for the vegetable plate expecting it to be fine and all, but yeah, a vegetable plate. It was incredible: Black bean cakes, boniato mash, grilled piquillo pepper, sauteed vegetables, and goat cheese chimichurri. My wife got either the Chicken or Pork, and liked mine better. Ditto on the Croquetas- they were totally amazing. Even the chili oil they give you for the bread was super delicious. Can't remember the last time I was impressed by something like the oil for bread. Dessert was delicious, super rich chocolate rum cake. Excellent service here, too.
Celebrated bf's dinner here with good friends and we all had a fabulous time.  Dishes ordered were: Steak with coconut prawns Croquetas Spicy beef embanadas plantains with beans Ahi Tuna Sangrias Mr Johnson Chocolate rum cake Everything was super delish.  This place is great for birthday dinners or dinner dates as this place is romantic and cozy. I also liked that they had  a guy at the corner playing live music in the bar. Will definitely come back here to try their other dishes.
Food is delicious and price is very reasonable. I tried the skirt steak today and was super impressed with how tender and delicious it was. They also have a cigar bar in the back. Can't wait to try it put.
I've been here 3x now, finally making time for a review. Started with mussels, steamed perfectly. My friend ordered the Cuban sammich, love it when the bread is toasted and not too thick, comes with salad. I ordered the seared salmon salad - which I love when it's done very rare, and have had great seared salmon in the past. My waitress said they'd make it rare but it came out pretty well done, so it was a little dry. I asked for the pesto cilantro dressing that would have come with the tortillas so that helped. Ordered the day's special dessert (picture posted), bread pudding topped with a scoop of ice cream, Yums. Bill totaled to about $60 not including tip. Wasn't a perfect experience, overall this is more of a 3.5, but rounded up to 4 for friendly customer service.
If you're going here, make sure you guys go in as a group. They won't give you the table you reserved (even a day ahead) unless you have everyone right there and then. Thanks a lot for making our meal disappointing by holding us up by the door. There were so many open tables around before and after we finished our meal, what the hell happened to customer service?!? Just because plenty of people praised you here doesn't mean you can start slacking off. We had to turn away some of our friends coming in because the table they gave us won't hold us all. You got a ton of free tables around and you can't even bothered to put them together just for us? And that was before and after our meal. Obviously there are a lot of people who skip on their reservations. Here's a good quote for you to learn in this business: 'First Come , First Serve'.  There, I just gave you an hour of business consulting. I hate pulling out a review like this especially since the servers were so good and obviously the management already got a bloated head.
After reading all the good reviews, I am wondering if I should post this negative review.  First, the bread in the bread basket was hard as a rock.  The Arroz Con Pollo was not moist and tender.  The yellow rice was lukewarm.  I guess the chef pressed the wrong microwave button.  The Cuban Sandwich was meh.  We didn't finished the meal and stopped at the Med. Cafe next door for wraps.
I love Cuban food. There's a La Bodeguita (the little bodega) on the main drag in Puerta Vallarta, but unlike that one, this PA location is a lot calmer. Of course, this is a franchise capitalizing on being the place where the Mojito was born. Today, tourists and locals continue to go to La Bodeguita del Medio whether you are in the Ukraine, Havana, Mexico or good 'ol Palo Alto. Don't expect Salvador Allende, Pablo Neruda, Ernest Hemingway or Josignacio to waltz in on California Avenue, expect only a schlock like me to come mambo-ing in. It's always the same routine for me when going Cuban. Ropa Vieja, rum and flan--and they serve these well here. Ropa vieja, or "Old Clothes," is a popular dish of the Caribbean, especially Cuba, Panama, Puerto Rico, and the Dominican Republic. It is a shredded flank steak in a tomato sauce base. It resembles old torn up clothes because the meat is shredded. Love those platanos, black beans and rice. The rum for me (depending on which restaurant) would have to be Nicaraguan (Flor de Cana, 21 year old) or Costa Rican (Centenario, 21)...but these are sometimes hard to get here, so Bacardi would do. The flan...every Latin American country has their own version, and I wish I could remove my internal organs to accommodate them all. (Imagine Spanish spoken in true Cuban manner..very very very fast and drop all known consonant at the end of each word) Es siempre la misma rutina para mi cuando se va de Cuba. Ropa Vieja, el ron y el flan. Ropa vieja or old clothes, es un plato popular del Caribe, especialmente Cuba, Panama, Puerto Rico, y Republica Dominicana. Se trata de una carne mechada rallado en una base de salsa de tomate. Se asemeja a la ropa vieja roto porque la carne. Amo a los platanos, los frijoles y el arroz negro. El ron para mi tendria que ser nicaraguense (Flor de Cana, de 21 anos) o Costa Rica (Centenario, 21) ... pero a veces son dificiles de conseguir aqui, asi que Bacardi haria. El flan ... todos los paises de America Latina tiene su propia version, y me gustaria poder sacar mis organos internos para dar cabida a todos ellos.
Been meaning to explore the culinary offerings of PA, and definitely started off on the right foot with this place. La Bodeguita Del Medio delivers good food along with an overall solid dining experience. The dining room has a nice low-lit and romantic ambiance, but it can get rather noisy in there. Pretty spacious with tables for small and large parties. For appetizers, we got the crab croquettes ($9) and the empanadas ($10.50). Both were solid, but nothing remarkable. The crust on the empanadas were a tad thick. The entrees definitely impressed. The paella ($50 meant for two people) had an awesome flavor, with a hint of low heat coming after a few bites. Confirming what others have said, this dish can probably serve three, maybe four people. We also got the special of the day: Braised Pork Cheeks ($20) which were incredibly tender, sitting on top of whipped potatoes soaked in a tasty sauce. The Tierra y Mar ($25) wasn't super special, but proved to be a good dish as well, as the skirt steak was flavorful and the coconut shrimp good sized. For dessert, we finished off with the chocolate rum cake, as good as any chocolate cake I've had. The sauce was awesome. Service was excellent. The waiter was helpful in ordering and my water never fell below 3/4 of my glass which is definitely a sign of attentive service. I will definitely be back.
YUMMY.  Excellent lunch option.  Reasonably priced, decent decor, good service.  Convenient California Street location in midtown Palo Alto. I think lunch portions are a bit smaller than dinner portions.  The lunch prices are lower than dinner prices for the same entrees. I highly recommend the "masitas" and the ropa vieja.  I always get either one of these 2 entrees because they are so freakin' delicious. The servers are always very nice, but I think the bartender during lunch is lazy.  I went once with my boss for lunch and sat at the bar.  My boss wanted some extra meat in his sandwich, but the bartender told him it couldn't be done because the sandwiches were "pre-made" -- seriously?!?  Why would you go to a nice restaurant and sit down and pay tip so you can receive a sandwich that is not made to order but has been sitting there, already made hours ago.  That doesn't sound right, so I think he just wanted to be able to input the order on the touch-screen and not have to walk back to the kitchen to ask them to do it and also not have to figure out how much more to charge.  If that is not the case and the sandwiches really ARE pre-made, shame on the restaurant for doing that!  But given the quality of the food here, I doubt that is the case.  I think the bartender is just lazy. On another note, this place has a pretty hoppin' bar during happy hour and even late some evenings.  Pretty rare for California Avenue!  (I think the only other real bar option on California Avenue is the divey Antonio's Nut House.)
Good food! We were not sure what to order and had to ask a lot of questions. Everything that our waiter recommended was really good. It was my birthday, and waiter brought a small desert with a candle on behalf of the restaurant. Nice gesture!
The food is decent - but they really make sure that people don't come back 1. Made us stand around and wait until everyone arrived, even though half the restaurant was empty 2. They restrict payment options - we had a party of 8, but were only allowed to use 3 credit cards. Pretty weird because we also spent a ton on food Just generally a shitty feel as we walked out. Not nice for a not inexpensive meal
I love cuban food. What we ordered: Camaron Mojo YUM-I would order 2 Spicy Pork dish Curry Shrimp dish All were great, would order again. I would honestly pass on the Mojitos, not enough alcohol! Service was great.
Solid four stars!! The BF and I were going to be in the area, so after reading many a yelp review, I decided to make a reservation here. ( though I was nervous as the BF is Cuban so was hoping the food stacked up). Our reservation was at 7 and they sat us right down. Some places still make you wait regardless if there's a reservation. The description of this place is spot on. It was a very intimate and romantic place. We ordered sangria's and the paella for two. Both were excellent. The paella quite filling, tasty, and ample; the sangria not too fruit punch like. There was tons of food. Then we tried the flan for dessert. The BF said the sauce was fantastic and that the flan was smooth. The only flan better is his moms( awe!) Needless to say, the BF enjoyed this place and even has his next meal pick out. ( which makes me extremely happy)
Arroz con pollo (Cuban style braised chicken and plantains over yellow rice) - looked amazing! The chicken was moist and tender. The plantains weren't mushy or overly sweet and had a nice crunch on the outside. The yellow rice flavorful and paired with the chicken perfectly. Ropa vieja (shredded skirt steak, chilis, peppers and plantains over a rice and black bean mix) - very pleasing to the eye, especially the fried plantain chip that was sitting pretty on top. The steak was juicy and full of flavor! And the black bean and rice mix was really good, wished there was more! We were both satisfied with both dishes and left feeling really full. This is a great Cuban restaurant - relaxing atmosphere, comforting food, friendly staff and great service. Cheers!
WOW...this placenhas the best Cuban food I've ever tasted (and I've been to the best Miami has to offer).  We had the cerviche, arroz con pollo, masitas, and the skirt steak, and it was all outstanding. i will be back again soon, and wouldn't hesitate to order anything on the menu.
I was there for lunch on a Friday.  Had their black bean soup, which was very flavorful.  Service was nice too.  I will go back for a dinner experience soon...
4.0 Stars I haven't been back to La Bodeguita Del Medio in a long time and I'm definitely glad I had the opportunity to eat here again. There's usually a wait at this place so I would recommend calling in for a reservation if they still have spots available for the night. If you don't want to wait for a table there's bar seating at a first come, first serve basis. I liked sitting at the bar area, especially because there was live music playing right behind me and it meant direct access to their delicious mojitos. The ingredients were really simple: Bacardi Limon, mint, sugar, fresh citrus juice, and a splash of soda. They had glasses of the ingredients all lined up and ready to go. The bartender crushes all the ingredients together in front of you and serves it quite quickly. They aren't strong at all, but they have a nice sweet taste. We ordered an appetizer and two entrees between two people. We started off with the Croquetas, which were crispy potato fritters filled with aged Spanish cheese. These were served with a tamarind-chipotle BBQ sauce and a diced carrot salad on the side. The Croquetas were lightly battered and had a smooth, pillowy filling. I seriously thought the sauce on the side was just ketchup! I guess the Croquetas were so good that I couldn't even taste the BBQ sauce. For our main entrees we shared the Arroz con Pollo and the Masitas. If I had to pick between the two I'd lean slightly towards the Masitas more. The Arroz con Pollo was a Cuban style braised chicken with platanos maduros (plaintains), and yellow rice. The dish was overall pretty sweet, but also savory. The rice was delicious. I wish the chicken was a little more tender though. There were sections of the chicken that were more dry than others. The Masitas had a completely different flavor compared to the Arroz con Pollo. The Masitas was spicy roasted pork with white rice and black beans. It was not sweet and it had a nice hearty flavor. The spice was very subtle, but it rounded out the dish very nicely. The pieces of roasted pork were really tender. I loved the added touch of caramelized onions. These were so good! I'd be interested in coming back to try their Paella. The pictures of it on Yelp look huge! == A MUST TRY! ==
Awesome place!  My boyfriend had been raving about this place ever since we started dating, but since he's such a great boyfriend and cooks for me all the time, we hadn't made it here until last night.  The atmosphere is great---lively but not so loud that you have to yell at the people you're with all night.  I love the live music as well.  The service was very personable without being in your face.  My mojito was tasty, a bit less sweet than I'm used to, but I probably eat too much sugar anyway.  Our apps of shrimp empanadas and mussels were devoured by me, my boyfriend, and my friend.  Our main courses of mahi mahi (me), ropa vieja (my friend), and the Cuban sandwich (boyfriend) left us feeling pretty full.  So, we ended up going with dessert wine (yum!) and coffee for dessert. I'm so glad we finally made it here.  Looking forward to going back again to try the Tierra y Mar next time!
Pros: Fresh food Good service Nice ambiance Bar stays open late Cons: May lack authenticity Pricey Mixed drinks are hit or miss Someone in my party was from Miami and questioned the authenticity of the food.  I can't validate if this is real cuban food, but it is good. We started out with a Cuban cocktail.  The waitress suggested the Key Lime Pie.  Wow, this was so sweet.  Make sure you enjoy sugary drinks before you order this one.  I'll pass on this next time. We ordered 2 appetizers, empanadas & plantain crusted goat cheese, both were winners. I ordered the vegetarian dish for my main course, because I was already full after the drink & appetizer.  I highly recommend the Plato de Vegetales for anyone who is looking for a lighter dinner option. For dessert we had Havana Bananas & Rum cake.  Neither was memorable so my suggestion is to eat more of the food and skip dessert.  Or, go grab dessert somewhere else. It seems that every other course we ordered was good so that's why I'm giving it 3-stars.
Great Cuban Food in Palo Alto! The dining room has a nice ambiance and the service was excellent - upon learning it was our first visit, our server (Charles) explained the menu and made a few recommendations.  Here is what we decided on..... Drinks - Zacapa Manhattan, Mojito, & Red Wine Sangria Appetizer - Empanadas (Pork) Salad (Split) - Plantain Crusted Goat Cheese Salad Entrees - Ropa Vieja and Plato de Vegetales Dessert - Chocolate Rum Cake Everything was excellent, but the standouts were the Zacapa Manhatten, Mojito, Pork Empanadas, and both entrees.  The drinks were not the standard recipes - the Manhattan was made with Zacapa Rum instead of the whiskey and the Mojito had Bacardi Limon rum; the crust on the empanadas was perfect - flaky and not greasy; and the meat in the empanadas and Ropa Vieja was super tender and very tasty. The menu is short - but that is not necessarily a bad thing.   Only negatives would be the sangria was good but not great (maybe our expectations were high after having the excellent Mojito and Manhattan) and it was a bit noisy in the dining room. Overall we really enjoyed our first meal at La Bodeguita Del Medio.  Looking forward to going back and trying some of the other menu items (and tasting some of their Rum offerings).
I came here for lunch, and I was afraid I would never be able to leave. They were slooooooow. The plantains were not very ripe, but otherwise my arroz con pollo was good. Too bad I had less than 10 minutes to enjoy my dish. My bf asked the waitress for the check when she finally brought the food out to rush the process along. Then, instead of giving us the difference, she handed back change that was actually the amount of the bill?!!
It's tough to get me to venture out if SF on a weeknight, but my friend told me this place was really good.  After reading the Yelp reviews and looking at the menu, I had already decided what to order before I got there. We started off with a Cuban Sidecar and Mojito and ordered the Croquetas as our appetizer.  I went with the Ropa Vieja and my friend got the Lamb Chops which was the special of the day. My friend got there before me, so he already ordered the Croquetas.  They came out right when I got there.  Perfect timing!  I love fried foods, so the Croquetas were a winner.  Nice and crispy on the outside with the soft potato inside.  My Ropa Vieja was deeeelicious!  The shredded skirt steak was seasoned perfectly.  The steak had the right texture and wasn't too chewy.  And the platanos maduros were nice and sweet which added a nice contrast to the savory steak.  I was able to try a bit of the lamb chops which were also quite good, but I still liked my dish better. The service here was good, and there's plenty of parking in the lot behind the restaurant.  This is definitely on my list of places to come back to.
I like this place. Good food, but occasionally inconsistent. The rum drinks are good. I love the empanada appetizer, the goat cheese salad, the arroz con pollo (with delicious sauteed plaintains on the side) and the drinks. Ahh, the drinks. My favorite is the Hemingway, a simple rum and lime concoction with a touch of sweet maraschino cherry syrup served in a martini glass with a sugared rim. Watch out for the tasty but deadly rum punch! Make a reservation for the weekends or try to work yourself in to a bar table where you can also get food.
I went to Bodeguita for dinner with my mom and dad today to celebrate Father's Day. We should have made reservations, but I didn't find this place until 5 PM and by that time, they were all booked until 8:30 PM. They apparently keep their outdoor tables and barside tables available for walk-in. We were told if we got there between 6-6:30 those tables should be free and they fortunately were! Definitely make reservations! Their menu is so exciting, filled with the flavors I love - lots and lots of coconut, seafood, curry, and chilies. And the cocktail menu is super extensive and filled with yummy sounding cocktails like key lime pie and dulce de leche cocktails! The ambiance is really relaxed and casual. They even had a guitarrist dressed in a havana shirt and a Panama hat seranade the restaurant. My parents and I decided to split two entrees - the seafood paella ($48) and the caribbean curry ($22). The caribbean curry was really mild and it wasn't a very large portion, but it was quite tasty. The paella was sooo moist with a tomato sauce. Yum! I'm sad we didn't get to try the Tierra y Mar though - seems like it's a yelp favorite! We also had the chocolate rum cake ($8) for dessert. The cake was really dense and its just smothered in that chocolate rum sauce. I wish the chocolate sauce had more of a rum flavor, but you could still taste it. I thought that was a fabulous idea for a dessert. Next time, I definitely have to try the Tierra y Mar and the caramelized bananas dessert!
Omigosh. Wanted to take a friend from the East Coast out for a good dinner that didn't consist of boiled meat or bland starches and holy damn did I hit the money on this place! Friendly service, comfortable ambiance, and DELICIOUS food. The prices are not my everyday ideal, though for a special occasion it's a great splurge. Mojitos ($8) were tart, not very sweet, and a bit heavy on the mint, but great alongside the Plantain Chips/ Black-Bean Salsa app ($6.50). This app could easily be split 3 or 4 ways if folks are just noshing. Thin crisps and hearty salsa. Insanely good. I ordered the Plato de Vegetales ($17.50), and my friend got the Ropa Vieja ($18). Hers was savory, and more reminiscent of enchilada filling (shredded beef with a chili sauce). We were told it's the most popular item on the menu, and I could see why.  Mine had a ridiculous complexity of flavors; black bean cakes sitting on top of a potato mash, topped with roasted red bell peppers, asparagus, other veggies, and covered in a creamy chimichurri sauce. It was heaven, and a serving too big for me to finish in one sitting (leftovers - yes!). SO SO good. Dessert was flan ($6.50), and was a traditional flan - easily shared - covered in an orangey sauce. I would have preferred a traditional caramel, but it didn't stop me from eating it. I was intrigued by the 'sipping rums' available, though after a mojito and considering the number of cops trolling El Camino at night, I decided against it. All in all, amazing. Do yourself a favor, and please go.
This is hands down my favorite restaurant. Every year on my birthday I always try to consider going any where else for dinner, but have ended up going to La Bodeguita for, at least, the past 6 years. My family and I ALWAYS order the mussels appetizer because the broth is amazing. Even after going through multiple rounds of bread enjoying the hot dipping oil, more bread gets used to soak up the broth. I always order the Tierra y Mar entre which comes with flank steak, sofrito mashed potatoes, coconut shrimp and grilled asparagus. It is to die for. The paella, which I've enjoyed as well, is more than worth the $50 price tag. You get a huge quantity of delicious sausage, shrimp, fish, olives, clams and mussels. This may sound like a huge amount of food that is likely to induce a food coma so the solution is to order a Mwa. This is their version of a non-alcoholic mojito which might just be better than their inebriating counterpart. At the end of this meal, do treat yourself to the Havana Banana dessert. Bananas, hot caramel, vanilla ice cream, walnuts and cinnamon. Heaven.
Really 3.5 stars. My food was very good - I just wasn't blown away. I think the problem was too high of expectations (I blame my sis who talked it up too much) I had the Ajiaco seafood plate which you need to share. I have a friend whose cioppino is off the chains - this is a similar type plate and I think the sauce could have been tastier. However - 5 stars for Havana Bananas - a must if you are doing dessert! 4 star mojitos too We went for a bday celebration and it was a good place for that or a more romantic situation - plenty of cute couples around :) Also if you are into cigars, great place to lounge out back and enjoy your stogie. You can buy one there looks like too if you don't have one and wish to partake.
A bit pricey but everything was terrific. We had: Mojitos (minty fresh!) EMPANADAS: shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilis, pepper jack, cabbage salad, coconut-roasted jalapeno sauce. (Mm) EMBUTIDOS: cured meats with hard cheese from Spain's famous free-range "pata negra"  (Mm) CROQUETAS: crispy fritters with potatoes, queso, green onion, and a tamarind-chipotle bbq sauce (MMmm) MASITAS:  spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans, rioja caramelized red onions (MMMMmmm) TIERRA Y MAR: marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted tiger prawns, sofrito mashed potatoes, avocado-cilantro pesto (OMG MMMMMMmmmm) ARROZ CON POLLO: cuban style braised chicken, plantanos maduros, yellow rice (MMmm) HAVANA BANANAS: caramelized sweet bananas, walnuts, cinnamon, vanilla ice cream (STFU/OMG I want more MMMMMMmmmm) HOUSEMADE FLAN: infused with santa teresa orange rum (MMMmmm) Look: if your mouth isn't drooling or your pupils aren't the size of dinner plates, you are a zombie. Everything above was perfectly done, plentiful, and one of the of the best all 'round dinners I can remember.
After traveling to Miami, I now have a palate for Cuban food.  So I headed to LBDM for a great dinner of Ropa Vieja and a Cuban coffee. The host was very kind. He saw I was dining alone and gave me a few magazines to read while waiting. Everything was good and I had a clean plate at the end. (Anyone who knows me, knows this is unusual, as I always leave some for later.) The Cuban coffee gave me enough energy to come home, turn on some Latin tunes, and dance while I got my weekend housework done. Vamos echar un pie!
I've been a big fan of La Bodeguita Del Medio (and the entire strip of California Ave) for a few years now, but this is my first time writing a review. The restaurant definitely gets crowded on the weekends and reservations are recommended unless you don't mind sitting in the bar area. It's rather unpretentious and unassuming from the exterior, but once inside, you do feel as if you're transported somewhere else, especially on a beautiful night.  The music plays at a nice volume, the walls are covered with interesting art, and the lighting, while dim, isn't too dark to see your food or your dining companions.  The ceiling fans, in their slow rhythmic pace, add to the feeling and it just feels relaxed and low key.  It's a vibe I enjoy. Once we sat down, we were offered a choice of a few drinks and it's hard to not be tempted by something on their drink menu.  Their house favorite Mojito didn't disappoint and their special Blood Orange Sangria was fantastic. The food came next and the Cuban food here is all hearty, delicious, and well flavored.  Our selections: Shrimp Cerviche - really enjoyed this appetizer.  Plentiful fresh shrimp were cooked in a wonderful whitish liquid that had me guessing cilantro, onions, beans, coconut, and lime/lemon juice.  Fresh and paired wonderfully with the deep fried plantain chips. Tierra Y Mar - one of their most popular items, it's a surf and turf but Cuban style.  The shrimp are deep fried coconut batter shrimp and the steak is a well marinated skirt steak.  It's all served over mashed potatos.  While I thought this dish was good, it's a bit monotone and the steak isn't as enjoyable as the Ropa Vieja (or shredded skirt steak) nor does it have as much flavorful sauce as that dish.  It's their most expensive entree and worth a try, but I'll skip it and get the ropa vieja in the future. Arroz con Pollo - I'm always a bit leery of ordering chicken from non-Asian cuisine as I'm worried about overdone chicken, but this dish was done perfectly.  Delicious caramelized bananas added a sweet note that paired with the fall off your bone chicken that was both moist and well flavored.  Served with rice that picked up every last morsel of meat and sauce. Cubano Sandwich - the least expensive entree on the menu, but a definite comfort food.  Great meats, cheese, and a mustard spread add to a great warm sandwich that is generous in size and easy to share.  I always like ordering this as an entree. Overall, La Bodeguita is a winner on this strip of California Avenue that definitely has it's share of popular restaurants.  While food is slightly pricey (especially after drinks), I'd argue this place is better than run of the mill downtown Palo Alto or Mountain View place.  Bring guests here and they're sure to rethink what they know about Palo Alto. La Bodeguita Del Medio accepts credit cards, including American Express.
I love this quaint little restaurant in Palo Alto....Loved the vibe .... the inviting yellow walls and the colorful art frames on the wall... and the dimly lit dining area. The website says they are walk-in friendly..however, i do suggest making reservations, especially for dinner. (i think the website suggests that too) I came here with 3 friends on a Thursday night and thank goodness I made reservations. It was a pretty busy night. We got seated a little after our reserved time, but that's okay. We were handed our menus and was asked for our drinks... And us three girls,...had the infamous mojito. And it was .... if-you-close-your-eyes-and-sip... you'll hear waves and feel the sun strike through your skin and sniff the smell of the ocean...and tanning lotion... But....one loud diner brings you back to reality that oh. it's just the drinkgasmic mojito. See, i did research before we came... The paella looked absolutely pretty and delectable..and reviews said it was a big plate to share..so we thought we'd give that a try. *Shrimp Ceviche: a different twist to what I'm accustomed to...Their version of shrimp ceviche has a coconut-y touch and is really really refreshing. Really went well with our mojitos. *Paella de la Bodeguita: $48 for 2 people. Our server asked us if we wanted to order the bigger one for an additional $20... but we declined.Take note. This is one gigantic "for two people" plate. I'm glad we stuck with the "for two people" because 4 of us even had enough to take home..Each. The Paella was filled with clams and mussels...and shrimp. They really don't joke with the amount of seafood they put on this dish. The saffron rice was moist and tasty. All of us loved this and tried our hardest to devour everything...but failed. *Ropa Vieja: Shredded skirt steak. oh. this is love. The meat...tender and juicy. flavorful but not too powerful. The plantains that surrounded it were sweet, plump and good. Leftovers are great for a sandwich. I would have given 5 stars to this place, but the service was mediocre. Our server was really nice...but it took maybe a good 20minutes before she came back to our table to get our orders. The paella took a good 25mins before it came out too. And also...this cuban restaurant is possibly cuban with a twist of something else.. there were a lot of cuban dishes that weren't on the menu. The menu wasn't that extensive as the other cuba restaurants i've been to. But it's different. that's why it stands out in my palette. I highly recommend this place. and I'd definitely come back!
CUTE CUTE CUTE - great vibe - lively colors - playful atmosphere! Food was good too! Ropa Vieja ($18) - super uber soft shredded beef seasoned with peppers and chili, heaped on top of yellow savory rice, and plated with slices of sweet plaintains (aka maduros). YUM. Friend Jessie's Masitas ($18.5) of spicy roasted pork was super tender and flavorful too. Had a taste of the Black Bean Soup as well which was quite nice though a bit heavy to start with. Dessert of Mr. Johnson's Chocolate Rum Cake ($8.5) was densely chocolate, not too sweet and had a nice rum flavor. But who is Mr. Johnson? Overall well priced fun restaurant. Definitely would come back to try some other dishes.
This was one of the best dining experiences I have had in a long time and definitely the best in Palo Alto. The food was delicious, especially the skirt steak with chimichurri sauce.  The mojito was SUPERB. The location and atmosphere are wonderful (if a little dark).  But what stood out the most was the service.  Always had water, got menus quickly, food came out quickly, and the table was bussed efficiently.  And all of this without feeling like they were hovering. It really all added up to a really great dinner out. BRAVO!
Can't believe I haven't written a review for this place. Long story short, we've been there a total of 4 times. The food is full of exotic flavors, Cuban food is hard to find, good Cuban food even harder and this place hits the spot . Service is attentive and fast !
Sometimes, the company you keep will make the restaurant experience so much better. Came here with great company and this place had great food. Service was really friendly, setting was nice and cozy, food was generous in portions. CROQUETAS - Probably my favorite. It was cheesy goodness. EMPANADAS - standard but good if consistent is what you're looking for. PAELLA DE LA BODEGUITA - Seafood platter of goodies (lobster, mussels, scallops, etc). Delicious, LOTS of actual seafood goodies in it (most places jip on that but this place didn't) It also came with a side plate of rice. It's a lot of food AROZ CON POLLO- pretty big portion with side of rice. The chicken was good, albeit slightly dry but good nonetheless. If I knew the portions were be so big, I probably would have ordered less so I could actually enjoy more. There was just a lot of food and after a while, I was too full to really enjoy what I was eating and just focused on trying to finish it.
Had a shrimp and veggie curry. Solid flavor, solid service. I'll return. Update: After a second visit, still think this food is good but not great. I'd downgrade to 3.5 stars if Yelp gave me the option. I'm curious and will likely give it a third shot sometime soon.
First time I came here for lunch on a whim with a coworker, I was offered a shot of rum to start.  NICE, but no thanks!  I'm back on the clock soon! I have tried their cocktails here and never been disappointed.  I like the Hemingway and Havana Sunrise.  I like sweet drinks because I'm a girly girl. I've been back multiple times (at least 10!) and always enjoy the arroz con pollo dish.  9 times out of 10, the tender marinated chicken meat falls off the bone... but there have been a couple times where it's been a little tough.  Overall, never NOT tasty.  Their crabcake appetizer is quite tasty (but not the best crabcakes I've ever had - for that, Passionfish!!) and recommended. One time they had a special paella for one for lunch.  Their regular paella is for 2 during dinner.  I was blown away!  Delicious!  I definitely need to get the paella for 2 sometime with a date.  Not a huge fan of olives but you can pick them off.  Never had paella with olives... and I liked it more than Cascal's paella. The parking lot behind is janky and spaces are tight, but if you can, snag one of the special La Bodequita-only spots right behind the restaurant.  If not, I recommend street parking.
Have I really not reviewed this place?? Wow. I've been here for dinner 4 or 5 times over the last year, and the food is amazing. I've tried the empanadas, the arroz con pollo, the coconut-crusted snapper, and also bites of the tierra y mar and the masitas. Everything has incredible flavor and has been cooked to perfection. Tender meat, not too salty, delicious mashed boniato. One of my favorite parts are the maduros (cooked sweet plantains). I like them so much that this time, I ordered a side, since I knew they didn't come with my dish. The drinks for me have been a little hit or miss, though my friends and family seem to love them. The mojito I ordered on one of my first trips was a little too watery, so you couldn't really taste the alcohol or the mint very well. Since then, I've either just ordered a glass of red wine or have stuck with water. I love that the ambiance is good for parents' visits, dinner with friends, or a romantic evening out. And the prices are very reasonable for the quality of food. My reason for 4 stars comes down to the service. It really depends who you get, as this most recent time, we waited 20 min. for drinks, and they never delivered my friend's drink. They made up for it by comping that drink, but we wished we had gotten them all sooner. Service can be very slow, so it's best to focus on conversations with your friends and family and know that the wait will be worth the delicious meal. So, 3 stars for service and 5 for food averages to 4 stars. Tip: Call ahead for a reservation, and you won't have to wait for a table. Can't wait 'til next time.
Favorite cuban spot!!!! Everything is sooo delicious. My favorites apps: shrimp ceviche, crab cakes, plantain crusted goat cheese My favorite dishes: arroz con pollo, coconut crusted snapper, and the caribbean curry
One of my all-time favorite places to eat in Palo Alto! Seriously, we have never had a bad meal here.  Service is always top-notch as well. For starters, love the croquetas.  The marinated cheese plate is also good. For main course, can't go wrong with Arroz con Pollo, Tierra Y Mar, or any of the seafood dishes. The 'Stroh Rum Punch' is deadly... as in, it's so good, you can't stop drinking them. Highly recommend this place.  Make sure to call ahead for reservations however, as they fill up quick most nights.
I ate here for the first time a couple of years ago and only recently got around to visiting again. I had no recollection of what any of the food tasted like the first time so it really was like starting fresh. First of all, the decor inside is really cute. Nice, hip, Cuban feel to it. I was the first of my party of four to arrive and when they saw I was waiting awhile they were kind enough to offer me a drink and bring me something to read. On to the food... Croquetas - I wanted to try this since a lot of other Yelpers raved about it. Thoroughly enjoyed it! The tamarind-chipotle BBQ sauce was great too. Pan Roasted Mussels - OH YUM. Definitely order this. The chili/soy/garlic/orange broth the mussels sit is really salty of you spoon it and drink it as is, but it creates the perfect marinade for the mussels. Delish! Masitas - Mmm... chock full of flavorful and very tender! Paella de la Bodeguita - Ok, the menu says this serves two but I think it actually serves three or possibly four. It was huge! Our party of four ordered this and the Masitas for our entrees and it was just the right amount of food. I haven't had a lot of paella but I really enjoyed this one. I just wish they had piled on more seafood because there is a lot of rice and each of the clams were tiny! Overall really satisfied with the dinner I had here. Only thing I found disappointing was the mojitos. Everyone said such good things about their mojitos and I didn't think they were strong enough, haha. Couldn't really taste the alcohol. They were serving sangria that evening too and I liked that much better.
I have been on restrictions, due to lent on which I have given up rice.  yah yah I know. Why would I come here where they serve Paella  and Arroz con Pollo. Alan was famished, and with the help of YELP.  We wanted to give this place a try.  No reservations, but we were able to get seats near bar. Alan ordered the Ropa Vieja, and I ordered the Empanadas and a side of plantains.  Yummy!!! I know restrictions!!! Coming back to taste their Paella and Arroz con Pollo.  Maybe after my limitations I can add a star and write another review.
The black bean burger with avocado and onions for lunch had great seasoning. The bread and chili dipping sauce is also great. The fried yuca was a bit greasy and salty; I prefer this at Joya's. There was a nice cocktail menu I didn't get to sample for the work lunch. But I came back another time and had a mojito and a coco spritzer (coconut rum, pineapple juice, and soda water). The mojito was just ok (but I'm not really a big mojito fan--my friend said you have to try them because it's a cuban place), but the coco spritzer was delicious (and not too strong).
The food is very flavourful.  I had the masitas with yucca fries.  The masitas weren't true mastitas (as in they were not pan fried, more like pernil, but in chunks), but they were very good.  The yucca fries were the best I've had (but no green garlic sauce!!??).  The flaun was the best since my days in Sunset Park in Brooklyn. The service was rushed and inattentive. The prices were on the high end for what you get.
I am hooked! I can say it is now one of may Favorite restaurant ! 5 stars for the food it is absolutely delicious . Yummy. 5 stars for the service. they are great 5 stars for the atmosphere , very nice place 5 stars for the cocktails I can't wait to go again . I love this place
One of my favorite Cuban place. Love the pork dish!! They have cigar smoking area in the back if you are in the mood for smoking cigars after dinner.
This is my favorite spot. It's a place that one person can dine solo without feeling like you have to be somewhere with somebody. Therefore, I'd like to claim this my "getaway joint" haha. A place for myself. I love the atmosphere. Live music sold half of my ratings here. The guitarist has a soulful voice that is an addition to the enjoyment you have in front of you. It's a romantic place. So I sugguest bring a date if you're not the sole diner like myself. That was all about atmosphere. Did I forget to mention that the service is superb? I was treated warmly by Chris and Michael. They showed me the humidor cigar cellar. If I were a smoker I'd be there all the time. I have to admit, cigars are for occasions only for me. Try it with their list of Scotch Whiskey. There's plenty of good ones to choose from. Now lets get to the food. The paella, is bomb! I can't think of another word haha. I loved it. There's a vast amount of seafood and, excuse my language, but "good shit" in the paella. So around $40-something bucks an order, have it with no less than two - three people. You'll be bagging it to go if you're stingy and try to order it only for yourself. Have a drink with it too =) Don't forget the drinks. There's a long list of Rums. I'm not one to like rum very much, but I'll always try something new when I'm there. Unfortunately, i can't give all the reviews and dishes that I've had. All I have to say is "I suggest you try everything!" ...And if you really don't like what you've tried, then try something else on the menu. Eventually, you'll take bait in something you'll like.
my coworkers took me out to lunch for my birthday here today. id have to say, it was quite tasty, although the food i ate i dont feel was super Cuban. Except for the Yuca Frita, yum. we were seated promptly, and it was a lot nicer inside than I imagined it to be. My coworker said its a good date spot. tried the bread with the chili oil, very good, although the bread is quite chewy. 3 of the 4 of us ordered the mahi mahi panko crusted sandwich. my coworker had tried it before and raved about it, said the mango tartar sauce is not super mayo-y, etc. as soon as it came out she said it was totally different, but it was still good. the tartar sauce was very mayo-y, and the fish was fried more than before(didnt seem very panko like). the bun it sat on was huge...but nicely toasted. it was a bit hard to bite into without making a mess, but yummy. i think if the bread was a little thinner, it would be perfect. the side salad is also nice too. the yuca frita, we got 6 pieces, and it was very delicious. i usually like my yuca with a cream side sauce they have, but this came with nothing. i asked the waiter for some, and he gave me this hot sauce he likes it with, but it was a bit too tomato-y for me. service was good, we were the last patrons out the door. i would definitley come back again and try something more authentic.
Love this place! It has excellent fresh food, with great flavors. I had the chicken and my friend had the shrimp dish and they were both fantastic. I'll definitely eat here again.
An old friend was visiting from the east coast so we came out here to try some "ethnic" food per the recommendation of another -- The drinks were good, but the food was just okay. For the price point, I was disappointed... though I suppose my experiences w/Cuban food have always been that it smells better (and more seasoned) than it ends up tasting. I split the paella with one of my friends and while the serving was abundant and chock-ful of seafood and other goodies (which I appreciated), it just felt like something was lacking...  there was no flavor punch -- just warm, mediocre, awesome-smelling but "meh"-tasting food. I will say, however, that we received great service and the decor was lovely.  Might be a place I'd go to for happy hour and apps, but I don't see myself wanting to spend the money on dinner again.
This place is a real gem... I had lunch here recently, and can see why this place gets such positive reviews.  The decor here is nice, and the menu rich and fun.  The crowd was mixed during my visit, with families, business-types, and students scattered throughout the full room.  The service was pleasant and attentive.  And those mojitos sure looked good as the bartender kept serving them up... Keeping it simple, I had the Cubano sandwich.  I'm used to tortas cubanas served in Mexican taquerias, which are often ruined by having too many ingredients.  The more authentic sandwich served here consists of pork loin, ham, Swiss, mustard, and pickles on an awesome, crisp roll.  The tangy salad definitely complements this dish.  I highly recommend this place...
Hubby and I was craving for cuban food and i heard a lot of good comments about this place so we had to try it. Food is great. That night we shared the seafood paella for two. I was shocked when they brought it out. It's huge and it's actually good for 3-4. Love their famous mojito although i didn't had it with alcohol. Their sign outside is very small but if you see bistro elan then it's across the street. Great cuban food!
I think it's a bit too pricey for what you get. It's good food and the service is good! And if you reeeaally love Cuban food it's a good place to go. We went with a few German friends (all around 30) and we wanted to order cocktails. They didn't except the European DL! So they had to go back and get the passports! We never had problems with the European driver's licence before and we could always order alcohol with it!
To summarize: The service is good and the food is A-OK. I'm not a huge fan of Cuban food (mostly because I don't like to eat spicy food), so I was glad to see that this place offers non-spicy dishes. My group arrived for a noon lunch reservation and we were seated right away. Our waiter was very attentive and the rest of the staff was always coming by to fill up our water glasses. I had the Empanada appetizer and the Cubano Sandwich, which were both good, but not outstanding. The tables are also packed together closely so it can get loud during the the lunch rush. However, it seemed to clear out at about 1pm (we came on a weekday).
cozy setting but the space is larger than i expected once you walk into the restaurant tried 2 dishes, tierra y mar was good but the arroz con pollo clearly stood out. chicken was juicy and tasty. the havana bananas was a perfect sweet way to end the meal - how can you go wrong with caramelized bananas?
Food is 3.5, but the reasonable prices and excellent cheap dinner drinks makes it a solid 4. What to get here?  Everything Cuban is good, particularly the Frijoles Negros (stewed pork and black beans) - their "national dish" - is pretty awesome.  The dishes here are a bit Americaned down, however; but the food is very good considering the price, if you don't mind the California flair. I think this is a good place to take someone for a "test" first date.  It has good and happening ambience on a friday, and it won't break the bank while you will get good and soulful food.  Well...you might not want to kiss her, after all those pork and beans...!!!
This places has a very special meaning to me...here's the back story. Before I even knew I wanted to move to the Bay area, I came to visit a friend who just landed a job at Apple. So while he was working, I found myself at this bar on a lazy hot afternoon with some other friends. I remember my mother calling me telling me that Oprah said that the Bay area had the most eligible bachelors. Ok Ma. But I remember standing in front of this place, taking in my surroundings and thinking, "I should live here, it's feels like home". Ok so what's that have to do with my review of this place? Nothing really just having a moment...So honestly this place was great, food, drink and service-wise. I've been back a few times and just have had great experiences. It's a great place for just drinks with a few friends. Or dinner. In fact I think this would be a great first date place. So if you are out there online dating - use this place for a first encounter. It's impressive.
I like the food and the drinks are great. What I don't get is how the manager gets aways with talking to customers the way she does. It's happened to me twice and I've also heard her talking to other people the same way. People around here are usually so friendly... Now my friends don't want to go there anymore. The rest of the staff on the other hand is very friendly
Romantic date night! Boyfriend took me here a few times.  Loved their paella and their huge selection of tequillas/rums?  (I think it was).  Anyway the boyfriend had me try some after dinner, so we sat at the bar and sipped on aged tequilla.  He was a fan; me- not so much used to sipping on tequilla- but was a fun experience.
Enter by the back door. There, you may see friends savoring slow conversation over drinks and cigars. Dine early. But, at the bar, before, observe the minty muddling of countless Mojitoes in preparation for the busy night. The meal, to be taken slowly. Enjoy the unusual, the enticing. Spanish cured meats to start perhaps. Followed by, say, the FIDEOS CON CAMARONES, $12.50, a spicy warm pasta base hosting grilled prawns, avocado, asparagus, aged manchego, & conch butter sauce. Sublime. As with many La Bodeguita offerings, a bit spicy yet forgiving and relaxed. Cuba!
Can I give negative stars?   I know it's not healthy, benevolent, or nice to hate, but i HATE this place. My first 2 experiences here (both this year) were good -- good enough to make my husband and I think we might be regulars.  They obviously don't want or need repeat patrons.  They're a popular place thus believe in treating customers like you know what. I made reservations for Saturday at 5:45pm, at least that's what I put in my email to everyone for my son-in-law's birthday dinner.  The girl took my phone#, but the restaurant never called to confirm, but that's OK. What's not OK is that we showed up at 5:45pm and the hostess laughed and told us she just gave away our table, our reservation was for 5:30pm.  OK, seat us at another table in your empty dining room.  She said she couldn't do that, their rule is to hold reservations for 15 minutes, but we're welcome to sit at the bar.  She laughed again.  Yeah, hysterical situation.   I asked to speak to the manager. Well, the manager didn't seem to care either.  He never apologized, but at least he didn't laugh.  He invited us to sit at the bar because they were booked that night.  We declined.  We ended up going to one of the other friendlier, more reasonably priced restaurants on California Avenue and had a great time. The attitude of this restaurant is rude, unprofessional (what happened to the customer comes first -- I've been to much nicer restaurants such as Masa's in the City or Nick's on Main in Los Gatos where mix ups have occurred and our parties were graciously accommodated), arrogant, smug, and I will never, never, never recommend or frequent this place again.  I think they're just awful.
Set up a group dinner with some friends here. Made a reservation since there were 4 of us. We were seated some what promptly (about 5-10 min. after the reservation time) and here's what was ordered: -palmitos salad ($9.50): the lime vinaigrette was very refreshing -tierra y mar ($25): enjoyed the sofrito mashed potatoes and the skirt steak was cooked well -plato de vegetales ($17): this dish was okay...compared to the other dishes, it didn't really stand out in my mind -arroz con pollo ($17.50): the chicken was good, a bit dry at certain parts but very tasty The service was great since it was a pretty busy night. Our server was attentive and patient and the waters were constantly being refilled. The portions are great to share. The 4 dishes were probably too much for the 4 of us...we should have gotten 3 dishes, since we had a bit of leftovers. My fave dish was the tierra y mar...I thought it had the best flavors. If you can't find any street parking on California, there's a parking lot behind the restaurant.
Made a reservation since I read that it gets quite crowded. Glad that I did 'cause it sure was a hot... Read more 
This place is great, four stars only because I am not the biggest fan of cuban food, but if I am going to eat it anywhere... I was introduced to this place by my husband's aunt and uncle, they take us to some really great places, and this was one of them. We have come back a few more times, and would do so more often if we had the funds. The rum mixed drinks are great. I am more of a whiskey/gin drinker, but I will be happy with anything on their menu. As for the food, it is the best cuban food I have had.
3.5 Dinner at this simple, yet modern Cuban restaurant was superb.  Too bad the nearly 2 hour wait tainted the evening.  After my girlfriends and I (3 of us) were told we would be seated within an hour, we came back to find that it took almost another 45 minutes after that!  Shame on us for not making reservations, but with this restaurant not located on the downtown Palo Alto strip, I had no idea it would be so packed! Should you find yourself in this situation, ease your frustrations at the bar, where service is friendly (you can also order food here).  The blood orange sangria was fruity and slightly fizzy - a hint of Sprite, the bartender says with a smile. Once seated, with the hostess apologizing profusely (at least service isn't pretentious), we devoured and enjoyed our orders of: Tierra Y Mar, Arroz Con Pollo, and a Ceviche appetizer.  The Tierra Y Mar dish was my favorite- tender skirt steak, juicy and sweet coconut prawns, drizzled in an pesto sauce of avocado and cilantro, with creamy mashed potatoes and asparagus.  I found the chicken in the Arroz Con Pollo a bit dry, although seasoned well.  The yellow rice that came with it was moist and flavorful, complementing the nicely cooked plantains.  Ceviche was served with thick pieces of shrimp and I found the addition of coconut milk to be a delicious creamy addition to the bright lime juice. Of course, no Cuban dinner is complete without the standard Mojito drink, which was light and refreshing.  I could have handled a tad more alcohol for both of my drinks though.  For my friend's birthday, they brought out a lovely rich chocolate cake with a side of ice cream.  By the time we finished polishing off our plates, we "almost" forgot the treacherous wait.  I definitely plan on returning...with reservations next time.
Mojito's & Paella Oh My ! Reservation highly recommended for dinner. Fun lively atmosphere. We ordered the ceviche for appetizer and the warm goat cheese salad. Unbelievably yummers! For dinner we went with the paella which was absolutely delicious. Come hungry because you will eat the whole thing. Really great drinks too. We didn't leave room for dessert - next time. I'm totally coming back here.
Food: Had the Tierra Y Mar which was overrated. Good texture but lacked in taste. My companion had the Caribbean curry, we specified it to be spicy. It was definitely the better dish, with a good kick that didn't overwhelm the curry. Environment: Romantic. Good for groups. Service decent. Price is more expensive than I care for, but maybe I'll get a less pricey dish and the plantains.
Nice ambiance- we sat in the bar area, which serves the same food as the more formal dining room. Ropa Vieja: delicious! Plantains: I love these things, and was expecting a little better. Nothing was bad. Dessert: flan was as expected, key lime pie pretty good. I would get the ropa vieja again and the key lime pie. Reservations recommended for dinner. Two of us ate for $65, with no appetizers and no alcohol.
overrated and overpriced.. I asked the waiter if their plantain chips were fresh, meaning you buy the plantain, cut them and fry them,  and he said yes so I proceed to order them but turns out they aint fresh at all..they were just regular mass proccessed plantain chips..blehhhhhhhhhhhhhh.. disgustinggggg.. Ordered Tierra y Mar and also Arroz con Pollo..both entrees were bland.. If you are used to eating latin american food and you come to this place you would know the food is not worth the price.. It is fancied up and the flavors fall short... The ambiance and customer service is good.. good place for like a date but the food and what you pay aint worth it.. would not come back and would not recommend...
From all the yelp reviews I was expecting to be wowed by the fares of this Cuban place.this place is strictly average
Found this on yelp when I have a craving for Cuban. The Bistec (grilled skirt steak) was perfect, juicy and flavorful with the right caramelization).  Plantanos maduros (sweet plantains) was served at right temperature, warm, crispy on the outside and did not taste heavy from the oil. Can't wait to go again and try their paella.
My favorite is the Bistec de Palomilla: the steak is tender and flavorful. My second favorite is Arroz con Pollo. The fried plantains are really good.
(I'd like to give it a 4.5 star!) I have been wanting to go here for a long time, but never seemed to be in the area or be with the people who wanted to join me. My wife had been there several times and raved about their Cubano sandwich, and loved the restaurant. We finally got a night out (sans kids) so we decide this was the night! The place was crowded but had a great vibe. We were told it would be 45 mins or so, but we could wait at the bar for our table. We got a drink, (try the Dark & Stormy!) and in 20 mins our table was ready. The ambiance is very cool. Sort of like an upscale cantina and a bit loud, but not annoyingly so. The menu is chocked full of deliciousness. I normally don't have much of a problem choosing my entree, but here I did. We started with the Empanadas. They were scrumptious! We decided to get the Tierra Y Mar (skirt steak/coconut prawns), and the Masitas (spicy roasted pork) to share. They were both delicious and perfectly portioned. We ended by sharing the Havana Banana dessert, which is served with caramelized bananas, spiced walnuts, cinnamon and vanilla ice cream. It is amazing, and a perfect dessert for two to share. The service was spot on and always funny, friendly and attentive. We never had to scan the room for someone to refill water or order more drinks (Did I mention that the Dark & Stormys are AWESOME?!) I'm certainly going to make La Bodeguita Del medio one of my regular go-to dinner spots. BONUS: They also have a cigar area in the back where they roll their own cigars and you can enjoy them with some fine rums. Sounds like a guy's night is in order! Food: A Service: A+ Ambiance: B+ Drinks: Extra Credit! Parking in back is ample
Consistently one of the best restaurants in the Palo Alto/Mountain View area.  I've come here intermittently over the last 10 years, and have never been disappointed. Their menu is varied enough to satisfy any particular food preference or dietary restriction.  There's no skimping on the ingredients, either.  Just recently I had their paella for one for lunch.  I was expecting a large pile of rice with a small smattering of seafood, but it was the exact opposite - lots of mussels, shrimp, and clams. I don't often get their cocktails, but the few times I have I have been pleased.  Not much of a mojito fan, though, so I can't comment on them. Reservations are highly recommended if you come here for dinner, particularly on the weekend.  If you come here for lunch, consider eating around 1:00 if you don't have reservations, and your wait might only be about 15 minutes.
Tierra y Mar - delicious Arroz con Pollo - delicious, very tender chicken - although the chicken had a ton of little bones that I had to pick out of my mouth. Plus, you get free bread & this delicious oil to dip it in. Service was great. Despite the deliciousness, I think this restaurant is pretty overpriced. I've been living here for years & thought I had gotten used to Palo Alto prices, but I felt kind of ripped off after eating at this restaurant.
One of a kind place... not so much for the food, but for the food plus cigar room combo.
Hubby went on a Fry's run and was hungry so we yelped this joint. To our pleasant surprise their happy our menu is impressive and whaaat? They serve Paella!? We shared the Paella de la Bodeguita (it says it serves 2 but can easily serve a small family of 4-6). It was the BEST paella we've ever had! Variation of flavors, aroma and color... this paella was surely http://bomb.com Authentic and reasonably price. We stuffed our faces and didn't even make a dent. We each packed maybe a good solid 1.5 lbs of left over each and ate it over the next two days!!!! We will surely return just for the paella -service? that deserves 2 stars :(
The mojitos here are good but I've had better in South Beach.  But for a place somewhere in northern California, it's pretty good.  The croquetas as mentioned by other reviewers are good but please don't dip them in that weird tasting sauce that comes with it.  They call it BBQ sauce, I call it disaster.  The food here is great.  The seafood especially.  It's better to go with another person so you can order one of those entree for 2.  And they do have specials that changes once a while.  The atmosphere here is great, very festive but not very ideal for a quiet romantic dinner.  If you're looking for good food, good drinks, and a good time this is the place.  Plus, while we were there, they had a Cuban musician playing music at the bar area.
My friend and I went there on a Thursday evening and really enjoy this place.  First I am not big Cuban fan.  Let me preference that by saying I have had Cuban once before and it was okay.  With that in mind, I really enjoyed my meal and look forward to going back. We split the martiquita plantain chips & olives as the appetizers.  Both were good, but next will order something else like the ceviche or marinated cheese (I had appetizer envy of the table next to us).  For dinner we had the Ropa Vieja (skirt steak) & Masitas (spicy pork w/ rice & black beans).  Both were excellent.  the pork was very flavorful and not too spicy.  The Ropa Vieja was tasty as well. Service was really good. The waitress was the one who recommended our dishes and she was right on. Definitely try the Mojitos. Again, not normally a big fan of the mojito, but really enjoyed it.
There are many reasons why I should like this place: - I keep coming back with friends and coworkers - well within yupster Palo Alto - I enjoy the basics of Cuban food - pork, rice, beans, crusty bread. Unfortunately though, there are many reasons why I really don't: -  Wow.  This place is pricey.  $11.50 for a small bowl of pulled pork and rice (Masitas).  Delicious, but given the simplicity of the dish, there should be at least 50% more food for the price. - Why are you so freakin' stingy with the bread?  For a party of four today at lunch, we were given exactly four pieces of crusty bread.  These are four crostini-sized pieces of bread too (read:  TINY).  After we devoured our four measly pieces, the busboy promptly took away our bread plates and our dipping oil, never to be seen again. - Brown paper table cloth covers?  This is not the ghetto dimsum place in Chinatown we're talking about.  This is a place that serves $8 mojitos and $5 for a plate of olives.  At least give me the white tablecloth! Bleh.  This place is way overrated.  Come here to see young, well-heeled tech types who can expense their lunches and Palo Alto ladies-who-lunch.  Yelpers, you've got this one wrong.
Double Date! My first time eating Cuban food! Quite the experience! Looking in I wouldn't think it was as big as it is. It is a lovely place to have a date which was what many of the patrons were doing. For appetizers: EMPANADAS: shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilis, pepper jack, cabbage salad, coconut-roasted jalapeno sauce  10.00 - I liked the pork. It was soft and went well with the outside. MARIQUITAS PLANTAIN CHIPS: black bean salsa  6.00 - My first experience out of many with plantain. They love plantain! Tasted like a healthier potato chip. Complementary Bread - Tasty bread with this unique sunflower oil. Entree: BISTEC DE PALOMILLA  18.50 marinated skirt steak, moros y cristianos, plantanos maduros - More Plantanos! Taste like a fried banana but less fried. I was imagining a piece of steak but it was more like pulled pork but with beef. It was soft and took up more than half the plate. I loved the rice! Dessert: HAVANA BANANAS caramelized sweet bananas, walnuts, cinnamon, vanilla ice cream  9.00 - More bananas! I am going bananas! haha no. It was very tasty. Came out pipping hot and the ice cream was a nice balance to the heat. I loved the walnuts! It was a good experience. I've learned they love bananas more than veggies cause there were no veggies on any of the entrees.
Been to a Cuba restaurant in Omaha. much better than this one. We ordered seafood paella for two, tastes not as good as it looks. tastes like road-side food.  certainly not worth 48 bucks! bottom line: order something else and good luck.
First time here and it was absolutely fantastic! I had no idea I was in love with Cuban food O__O;; Went with 3 of my co-workers and shared every dish: Appetizers: -Crab cakes -Croquetas -Pan Roasted Mussels Entrees: -Arroz con Pollo -Masitas -Bodeguita Seafood Ajiaco The appetizers were delish; -crab cakes were so-so. it was a mini lump of crab meat along with some corn salsa that was really good and gave the crab cakes some flavor. -croquetas: looks like a mini cheese stick but inside it's super soft [potato] with a crispy covering. really yummy! -pan roasted mussels: THE SAUCE on this is amazing...!!!!! the mussels aren't completely cooked (which i liked) and again, the sauce is superb. we finished all of it by continually asking for more bread and using the sauce as a dip :) overall this was my fav. appetizer Entrees were amazing as well: -Arroz con pollo; the chicken was cooked just right and had the right amount of flavor. came over a bed of rice and some carmelized bananas or platanos... but they taste like bananas so i'll just call them bananas -masitas: shredded pork over rice w/ some carmelize onions that i feel like were sauteed in alcohol. super delicious!!! the pork really melts in your mouth and it had a hint of spicyness but  not much -bodeguita seafood ajiaco: would have been more amazing if we hadn't ordered the pan roasted mussels because there were a bunch of mussels in this!! the sauce was good! it was thick/creamy--kind of reminded me of a chicken masala curry; overall i'm really impressed with all the dishes and i will definitely be coming back here. the drinks also looked amazing but we had to drive so we couldn't really order much!
Very cool place for a date- the setting inside is very romantic at night. The food is really good, the servers really know the menu and make great recommendations.  The mojitos are THEEE best. My favorite for date night is the paella and the mussels and then for dessert- Chocolate Rum Cake.
The Rum Diary.  VIP's at the table, discussion overflow regarding banks, the government, deals in the multi-millions, lines of business, however concentration be damned interspersed between words I was able to follow, a series of events were playing through my mind that had me weaving in and out of the conversation like a drunk priest avoiding a DUI checkpoint on Christmas Eve.  Truth be told, it was good to feel once again, if only for a week.  To like someone and feel that they genuinely like you back is without a doubt the greatest feeling in the world, better than any drug, when you click with someone on all levels, its like riding on your own cloud 100,000 feet above sea level.  To those who experience this with someone on a daily basis, color me extremely jealous, for the world is yours.  The tails to that quarter is liking someone who doesn't feel the same: It is a feeling of helplessness, like dropping from that cloud at 100,000 feet into a swimming pool full of fertilizer.  Face first. So you get up, wipe the shit off your face, and start over, hopefully to better results next time.  Wash. Rinse. Repeat.  And it was about this time, right after the first Mojito, that the bats started to appear overhead.  My internal monologue kicked in and advised me that I should eat something, as the plantain chips, while tasty, just weren't cutting it.  Diet be damned for a day, besides, it will be the only solid food I've eaten in three days, if I lose weight any faster my co-workers are either going to think I'm dying of a leg infection or I'm smoking crack, with neither of these options presenting a favorable projection of my long term viability within the organization, so for tonight, I'm going all out, bring me fried pork, fried cheese, fried pickles between two loaves of fried bread, my long lost friend the Cuban sando.  Fast forward 10 minutes and two mojitos later and there she was, all dressed up and ready for the prom, and I think I ate it without actually chewing, it was good, I mean really good. I've had better, but not many.  The interior has this sort of Florida's idea of Cuba in Tampa motif, and the exterior to match.  The two times I've been here it has been crowded as all get out, but the staff is great at managing this madness.  One especially cool feature is a cigar smoking room and patio out back, with a humidor full of cigars, if you're into that sort of thing.  They will even let you take your drinks back there if you order them at the bar.  All in all a very unique place, great for business mixers and as equally a cool place to ponder some of life's greatest mysteries, such as why could we not have met two years ago, and if everything happens for a reason why does whatever divine being that is at the cosmic controls obviously dislike me?  At the river of indifference, its time to paddle upstream. (Re-posted by request) Soundtrack:  The Shins - "New Slang" http://www.youtube.com/w...
I STILL love this place! I've been to Bongo's and Lario's in Orland and Miami, Florida, and still find this place to be the best. I'm not sure that it's 'real' Cuban food, but damn good! I've actually since sent back food one time - just once! My fish felt was overcooked. They gave me a new plate with TWO filets! Unbelievable! They were delicious as well!
This place is delightful! For lunch, I don't think you could ever go wrong with the special - I had... Read more 
Wow, this is my new favorite place!  Came here w/ some friends and everyone loved their food. Like we cleaned our plates! The ambiance was nice, great for date. Mojitos were delicious, perfect, not too sweet. Dessert was amazing- chocolate rum cake!!! Ok, can't wait to go back. Someone take me on a date here please!
After nearly 8 months of going here, all I can say is dinner was a blur but oh do i remember the havana bananas.... Mmmm.
I absolutely love this place. It's a great place for dinner after work. And I don't mind crossing the bridge after a long day of work just to come here. I originally came here because I had a big craving for plantains. And when I got here they had such a wide variety of dishes that really peaked my interests. I ordered the Coconut Curry Shrimp dish with a side of plantains. And it was ssssooooo yummy. My friend had the Coconut Crusted Fish (forgot which kind of fish) and that was really good to. Service was good, although our waitress seemed a little new; she didn't know much about the food. However, she still was really nice. I will be coming back really soon.
The first time I went here was with such a high expectation because of the raving reviews on yelp. Unfortunately, my experience was not as good as most other reviewers. It was on Friday and since we didn't make a reservation we were seated in the bar area. There was a live music being played, but we were seated too close to the music that we felt it was too loud. The tables were very close to each other, there was no privacy at all and in general the bar area was very loud. The tables and utensils didn't look clean ... everything looked greasy. The menu was small, but I was very excited to try their food. I ordered the steak & Shrimp dish and it was just ok, I wish there was a stronger Cuban flavored. The portion was small and it was more towards the pricey side.We also ordered the croquettas as appetizers and the portion was smaller than the pictures on yelp. Was it because there were only the two of us, so they only gave us 4 pieces? If we're paying the same price, the portion should be consistent. The second time, I was there with some coworkers to celebrate a birthday. I had the arros con polo ..it was ok..nothing special..although the portion was actually large for lunch. However, the other orders (my coworkers') were small and everyone finished their plate...which is a bit unusual because I usually have a much bigger appetite than they do,.. well the portion is just a bit small...and we all paid about $15 to $18 per person for lunch.. certainly NOT CHEAP!. Also.... ... we realized that they charged the tax after the mandatory 18% tips (we had 6 people in our party)... I do not think it is correct to charge sales tax on service!! We were not too happy about that..but since we were celebrating a bday we let it slide. I will look elsewhere to find tastier Cuban flares...unfortunately to me, LBDM just doesn't deliver...
I came here for the first time for dinner and really enjoyed my dining experience here. The restaurant was cute and cozy inside and the service was exceptional. Let me warn you, their drinks are super, super strong. If you want to get drunk in less than 30 seconds order their Stroh Rum Punch. They bring it to you in this tiny little glass and at first you think to yourself, this looks like a large shot, not a drink. Well folks, that's because you should drink it like a shot. It's so damn strong that you can't really sip the darn thing. Just shoot it or drink it fast. As an appetizer we ordered the Shrimp Ceviche. Now, I would order that again and again it was so good. The combination of fresh shrimp, lime juice, coconut milk, black beans, cilantro, red onions and peppers were outstanding. The dish is a little salty, a little sour, a little sweet, and a little spicy. Great flavors! We also ordered the Shredded Pork Croquetas. Those were pretty tasty as well, but I'd have to say that the shrimp ceviche dish was better. For an entree I ordered the Ropa Vieja which is shredded skirt steak, peppers, tomatoes, served with spiced yellow rice and plantanos maduros. The shredded steak was very flavorful and tender and went really well with the fried plantains. I'm not a huge fan of rice so next time I'd probably ask for extra plantains instead of rice. This is definitely a great restaurant with delicious Cuban food. I'd like to come back here again and try their mojitos because I hear those are awesome.
Good place.  I had the lamb special with sweet potatoes and asparagus.  It was all pretty good.  Lamb was cooked very well.  The portions were not very large though. The service was pretty rushed and they did miss a few things.  I had the havana banana for dessert.  It was more soupy that I was expecting.  They did a good job of selling it though. Prices were a little high for the small sized portions.  I'd go back, but not in a rush.
If you do have to wait - it will be worth the wait.  We had a reservation for 8 so we were fine.  But the place was totally packed, even for a weeknight.  And I can see why.  Every single dish we had was savory, tasty, yummy, well prepared, well presented - everything you would want in a semi-casual, fun atmosphere type restaurant.  I'm no expert on Cuban food, but I am now a fan of it.  We will be back for sure.
Written in 2003. It's "International Girls' Night Out." Accompanying my cosmopolitan Shanghai self is Sonja, refined German blonde, and Jess, charming British brunette. We're set for Palo Alto's Cuban extravaganza, La Bodeguita del Medio with a 7:45 res. Excited to see the girls, I arrive a quarter-hour early. The parking is right outside, though I must be lucky considering the hip joint commands its own lot in the rear. Celebratory Latin music pours from this convivial place quaintly named "the little store in the middle of the block." The walls are decked with Cuban paintings and paddle fans circulate above the candle-lit tables. I sense a lot of activity in the air even before my eyes land on the crowded and lengthy bar. At 7:35, 2 hours after Happy Hour has started, its throng of patrons is impressive; this is an obviously popular rendezvous. I search for a seat at the bar. Hostess Allison wonders if she may help, but before I can say no, the bartender plops a glistening Mojito in front of me. "Courtesy of the bar. We're extending Happy Hour." I taste the sweet combination of rum, lime, sugar and mint. Suddenly feeling blessed, I turn to introduce myself to a man seated beside me, and welcome a conversation about the history of LBDM. Over 50 years ago, this restaurant's namesake thrived in Havana and has since claimed worldwide fame with its Mojito formula and the patronage of Hemingway and Neruda. The PA restaurant opened a decade ago. Though not related to Havana's original, the mimic offers a similar sampling of cigars, cocktails and the celebrated Caribbean seafood. Sonja calls my mobile to announce her arrival. I excuse myself from the Cuban history expert; the bartender is too busy bruising the mint to catch my grateful smile. We spot each other in almost identical Chanel jackets and laugh hysterically. Then Jess lights up the entryway in her smart Chloe dress. Together we look straight out of a Vogue ad, and start to feel accordingly haughty. We check in with Allison, who makes us wait while she roamed twice around the main dining room. The delay baffles me, since of the 30 tables several looked immediately available. Finally, she seats us, throws down our menus, and hurries away to the imaginary beckoning of more important guests. Ever haughtier, we are starting to get offended. Our waiter, Todd, nervously introduces himself-fumbling with his apron-and walks away with 2 orders for Mojitos. The gossip begins: Maybe she's swamped, Jess speculates about our graceless hostess. Maybe I upset her by skirting her podium for the bar, I suggest. No, Sonja proclaims, it's only because we're richer, skinnier, and much prettier than she is (and in Sonja's case, blonder too). And the socially inept Todd? He's intimidated by the Vogue girls. Now Todd returns empty-handed and asks for IDs. We wonder whether Allison sent him. Sonja is annoyed; Jess is in disbelief; and I cannot fathom why I must show ID not 15 minutes after the bartender himself gave me a drink. We understand the policy, but this formality only aggravates us. Darn it, we're entitled to drinks swiftly and without delay! The tip-o-meter is making its way towards 0. "What a wait foul," Sonja huffs. "Even before I turned 21, I was never carded, especially when I was dressed up, especially in a classy restaurant." Jess insists it must be because we're the only dateless women here. We look around at all the couples... "Discrimination!" we chant. For appetizers we settle on sharing the peel-and-eat spiced shrimp, rum-infused oyster shooters, and plantain chips with black bean salsa. Entrees: the spice-dusted snapper, the seafood enchilada and ceviche, and the Yuca crusted mahi-mahi. Todd is aghast at our appetite. We're in for an aquarium of a feast. For too long, our feast is limited to scribbles on a menu. 20 minutes pass without a sign of water, bread, but most importantly, our drinks. As my drink bottoms out, our disdain overtakes us: the atmosphere seems to fade; the music becomes monotone; the crowd looks contrived; and the art on the walls turns kitschy. Despite being full on our annoyance at the service, our meals are a welcome redemption. The fish is fresh; the spices powerful yet subtle. The cuisine is very coastal, quasi-Caribbean, with a California twist. We're getting that international, Caribbean feeling we intended, but with an enjoyable West Coast familiarity too. Notwithstanding, the ineptitude of the wait staff continues. Our water glasses are never filled; there's no offer of fresh pepper; no check-ins by Todd. Despite the delectable meal, we resolve that we won't be returning anytime soon. In our last contempt of the evening, we leave no tip, but scribble a few frenzied words for the future improvement of Allison and Todd. I leave a nice word for the bartender, though.
This place lived up to expectations... and then some! We had tried to go here a few weeks ago without reservations on a weeknight - no dice!  We tried again this Thursday and were seated easily - perhaps it was the rain! First, location and logisitics.  Located on California Ave in Palo Alto, LBDM is close to El Camino and has tons of parking scattered all around it.  Several restaurants, bars and coffee shops surround it so you can start the evening early (as we did at Antonio's Nut House where XT graced us with her presence for a short time). ~ 5 stars for accessibility and parking The restaurant is quite spacious - it is divided into a bar area with some seating and then, you walk through a curtained doorway into the main dining area which is comfortably lit and laid out tastefully.  You could stage a business dinner or have a cozy dinner with someone special and enjoy a lot of privacy in both cases.  Comfortable seating, great ambiance. ~ 4 stars for restaurant ambiance Mojitos!  The mint was FRESH - this is a key decision factor - and that mint was probably plucked that afternoon - I have to go back during the day to see if they have their own garden, I would not be surprised.  Did I mention the mint was fresh?  Oh, man!!!  Delish!!! ~ 5 stars for the mojitos Appetizers - there were 4 of us - we ordered an order of the empanadas (waiter helpfully informed us that the order came with 3 and that he would instruct the chef to add a 4th - heck, yeah!!!).  The menu describes it as "shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilis, pepper jack, cabbage salad, coconut-roasted jalapeno sauce"  For $10, an excellent value - the pork was tender and the chillies and the jalapeno sauce gave it a nice bit of a kick!  We also had the croquetas ($8.50) which are "crispy fritters with potatoes, queso, green onion, and a tamarind-chipotle bbq sauce".  The dish reminded me of an Indian appetizer called a "vegetable cutlet" - it was great - very enjoyable - be warned - the sauce is on the spicy side! These along with never ending plates of bread and alive oil made for a sterling starting experience! ~ 4 stars for appetizers Finally, the food!  Two of us at the table did not eat shellfish so the others were considerate enough to order a minimal amount of shellfish.  We had an order of the Tierra Y Mar ($25), a skirt steak with a side of tiger prawns, mashed potatoes - it came with a green sauce which the menu revealed as an avocado-cilantro pesto.  I tried a piece of the steak and it was delicious - thinly sliced, cooked just right with a hint of red in the center - the pesto sauce was interesting and added some texture as well. We also had an order of the Masitas ($18.50) which is spicy roasted pork cubes served on white rice and black beans.  It was smothered in cilantro (I love cilantro but this was a bit much LOL)  I liked the pork a lot though it was chewy in parts.  The rice and beans were tasy but the flavors did not seem to blend very successfully - it appeared that the pork had just been spooned onto the rice and bean mixture instead of allowing the dish to cook in unison - I would have enjoyed it more if the pork had time to infuse the rice a little bit more.  A successful concept but execution could have been better. We also had the Ropa Vieja ($18.00) which is another skirt steak, but shredded and served with vegetables and rice and a cool looking plaintain chip (deep fried) as garnish!  Cool presentation!!  The steak was fabulous - I enjoyed it a lot! Last was the special for the night - a fish entree (can't remember if it was a snapper or tilapia) - it looked great, with a creamy sauce, some healthy looking greens and a green sauce.  I tried a bit of the fish and it was cooked beautifully - flaking easily with a fork - great texture - not too chewy but enough so you knew you were eating some good protein!  I'd try this again the next time for sure. ~ 4 stars overall for the food, 3 stars for the Masitas. We passed on dessert since MChiu and I were eager to get into the cigar bar and smoke a cigar and have some after dinner drinks.  MChiu got a bourbon (Maker's Mark) while I got a single malt (Lagavulin) and we each got a Padron cigar and settled down and regaled ourselves with stories (Thanks Denniseo for putting up and inhaling all that second hand smoke!!!).  The cigar lounge is great (though it could do with better artwork!!!!!) - in the summer, there is an outdoor area which would be wonderful on a warm summer night - I look forward to that!!! ~ 4 stars for cigar lounge! Overall, great evening with good friends.  It's always welcome when the food and ambiance make the experience with friends seem better and more memorable.  For this and all the reasons described above, I give La Bodeguita Del Medio 4 stars. 4 solid stars overall! # 49
Service, food, ambiance- all 5 stars.  would recommend reservations next time. Also get the cafe con leche after you've had the wonderful arrozo con pollo and ropa viejo. That coffee will warm you all over. Will be back again for sure.
I was here w/ Seong P. and 2 others for book club last Saturday.  Seong made a good call with ordering mussels which had a beer'ish, lemony flavor.  Even when we were done with the mussels, we didn't want the waiter to take the bowl away so we could soak our bread in the broth.  I would go back for those mussels alone. My only real gripe was the paella.  First off, I'm pretty sure it's not supposed to be liquidy...Spanish paella definitely isn't.  On top of that, I don't understand why these types of restaurants still charge $20+/person.  We're in California, home of the small plate and communal eating.  Even though there are 4 of us, it doesn't mean we need a huge pan of rice...we just want a little taste.  We were hoping to get away with a 2 person serving, but the waitress ordered a 3 person serving costing $69!  In Spain, 4 of us shared a 2 person pan, but you do feel a little guilty about it.  The point is I shouldn't feel guilty about wanting a smaller portion cuz I'm almost always on a diet! But overall, I really enjoyed the meal.  The ropa vieja was yummy and came with what else but the paella saffron rice.  But even with the paella, we each spent about $40 including alcohol and tip...so not bad.  I didn't realize until after I read more reviews when I got home that the mojito glasses were souvenir glasses for us to keep... that would've made me feel a little better about spending so much on the paella.  Obviously, I'm not over it...
Came here for dinner post shopping at Stanford on a Saturday evening. Take Yelp's recommendation and make reservations prior to coming. This restaurant is hip-happening! The staff was friendly and attentive. The restaurant vibe was chill and lively. The restaurant was clean comfortable. There was a singer/guitarist in the bar area who played occasionally. We couldn't hear him that well in the main dining room which worked out since we had tons to converse about during our meal. Their mojito is yum and the food is definitely two thumbs up! The four of shared the masitas, ropa vieja, paella and a side order of plantains. Masitas - spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans & caramelized red onions: the pork was tender but wasn't too flavorful. when eaten all together it's yums! -and yes for those who know me well, i don't eat beans but the ones that came with this dish were delish! Ropa vieja - shredded skirt steak, chilis, peppers, plantains & yellow rice: my favorite! the tender shredded steak was seasoned perfectly. the plantains were sweet and had the right texture. Seafood paella - plenty of chicken, mussels, clams, shrimps & chorizo: i've tried paella from several restaurants and i have to say that this place makes it pretty darn good! the portion for 2 ppl was more than enough for the 4 of us. Can't wait to come back and try more of their signature drinks and dishes!
Oh La Bo... how I love thee... We shared dinner here with Dave's parents and as always La Bo never fails to amaze and satisfy us! Drinks - we had their house sangria....2 words = Super Good! For appetizers we shared: EMBUTIDOS: cured meats from spain's famous free-range "pata negra"    12.50 - very very good CROQUETAS: crispy fritters with chciken,potatoes, manchego, pimienton, green onion, and a tamarind-chipotle bbq sauce  8.50 - not their greatest but not bad either. Entrees: CARIBBEAN CURRY  22.00 sauteed shrimp, spicy coconut curry, plantains, yuca, greens, hot peppers, white rice - Dave's dad and I LOVE this dish -the flavors are so well balanced and the portion is large. I've had on several occasions and it is consistently good. TIERRA Y MAR   25.00 marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted tiger prawns, sofrito mashed potatoes, avocado-cilantro pesto. This is Dave's Dish! The coconut crusted toger prawns were succulent and tasty and the skirt steak was cooked to perfection. SPICE DUSTED SNAPPER   24.00 pan seared snapper, boniato mash, wilted greens, pineapple-habanero chutney - Dave's mom had the fish of the day dish, she said it was very very good and she would most definitely order it again. Dessert: HAVANA BANANAS caramelized sweet bananas, walnuts, cinnamon, vanilla ice cream  8.00 - the caramelized bananas were warm and paired with the cold vanilla ice cream- created a mouthful of deliciousness! MR. JOHNSONS' CHOCOLATE RUM CAKE callebaut rum sauce  7.50 - Mom and dad shared the rum cake and I tried a bite -it was quiet good. Overall the food was fantastic, the ambience warm and the service okay. So you say why the 4 stars... well it would have been a 5 star review had our server brought us the fresh bread basket he talked about, had the service been a little smoother, hadn't told us they were out of items..had paid a tad more attention to us. That being said, we will return to La Bo again as we do enjoy their mouthwatering, every so tastey, culinary creations.
Make sure to make a reservation.  This is one of my favorite places to eat a nice dinner.... Read more 
We had a fantastic time!!! Lovely atmosphere, great service and really excellent food! We ordered Mariquitas, Croquetas, Cubano Sandwich and Empanadas, which were so amazing and unique! Definitely a favorite!
If you're my friend, then you know I'm a huge sucker for balls (pun intended) and potatoes. Combine the two and you get LBDM's croquetas - the perfect pile of golden bite-size balls on a plate. These glorious fritters are crispy on the outside, filled with mashed potatoes on the inside, and accompanied by a flavorful, tangy sauce. Paired with some shredded carrots on the side and you've got your roughage for the day. No traffic jam in the backdoor. Excellent! Since we had the paella which "serves two" according to the menu, I did not have a chance to sample any of the other entree items. But that's okay, because the paella dish was huge and filled with clams, mussels, chicken, olives, and more! The restaurant was also able to accommodate my no-chorizo diet and serve it on the side. Suany liked! Of course, I couldn't resist a delicious mojito but only one because I'm a good little girl like that. Where's my treat?
When I heard, "I know this great Cuban place in Palo Alto, they make one of the best mojitos." My initial reaction was, "What? You just said, 'Cuban' and 'Palo Alto' in the same sentence." For all the non-believers, La Bodeguita was a delightful surprise. They have a bar area separate from the main dining room, a walk-in cigar humidor and cigar divan in the back. Upon walking in, a row of glasses with mint leaves line the bar, ready to go and the glasses never sit there for too long. After a day of rainy day shopping in Union Square we found 2 seats at the bar, at 5:30 this place was empty but after 6, a steady stream of patrons already filled the dining room. Casual crowd, ranging from families, to groups and couples. Everyone's said it. I'll say it...they serve great mojitos. There's a reason why many bars don't make proper mojitos - they are a pain to make. But here, it has the right balance of rum, muddled mint, soda water, lime and sugar (although no longer made with sugar cane). To compare, this place  trumps Havana Mania in Redondo Beach in all aspects, the quality of food and drinks, service and ambiance. The food, one dish was a hit, the other a miss. Overall 3 stars: - Spice dusted snapper: pan seared snapper, boniato mash, wilted greens, pineapple-habanero chutney $24 - Ropa vieja: shredded skirt steak, peppers, tomatoes, spiced yellow rice, plantanos maduros $18 The ropa vieja is highly recommended, well flavored, a nice comfort dish. I wouldn't order the fish again, the sauce was much sweeter than I expected, especially for an entree. If you can get over the minor touristy bit with the hats, shirts and mojito glasses for sale and a server who sounds a bit too rehearsed, the food, ambiance and mojitos more than make up for it. And I'll admit, I bought a few mojito glasses to take home. La Bodeguita, with a location in Havana and one in Palo Alto... can you open one in LA? But until then, when I'm visiting Palo Alto I'll make sure to stop by.
You'll walk in and likely find a long line of Mojito glasses in various stages of progression along the bar. Why? Because these are some of the best Mojito's you are likely to find anywhere. After being seated you'll be served by an excellent wait staff. The drinks and food are constantly coming in and you shouldn't have to wait long for anything. So what about the food, you ask? Well, that's probably the best part. Everything we've eaten here has been outstanding. Be it the mussels, empanadas, or entrees like the braised pork or steak, I just don't think you can go wrong. What's the catch? Well, this place serves huge portions at seemingly high prices. The trick is to eat family style by splitting the entrees as each should easily serve two. Finally, be prepared for crowds at peak times because this place is very popular. Make reservations or go during off times.
This restaurant is, hands down, the best one I've been to in Palo Alto. It looks unassuming from the outside, but once you step in, you discover that the decor is pleasantly eclectic. Brightly-colored paintings cover every wall. The restaurant was packed at 8pm on a Thursday in a town that eats painfully early, but we managed to get seated without too much trouble, without a reservation. Our waitress was terribly sweet. We decided to share the croquetas and the bodeguita ajiaco, a giant seafood stew with bars of yucca in a spicy tomato cream sauce. Both items were splendid. The crisp croquetas came with a spicy sauce that perfectly balanced the starchy, cheesy insides. The entree was the best thing I have ever had in Palo Alto. Ever. The lobster tails were sweet and fresh; the shrimp weren't a bit overcooked; the yucca was just heavenly. We ended up being way too full. The bodeguita ajiaco could easily have been split among three people with an appetizer or two to help out, but the food was worth gorging ourselves on. The restaurant was a bit loud (maybe not ideal for a date), but otherwise, I have no negative things to say about the place. Go here. I plan on going back soon to try out their paella.
Five stars if I'm reviewing just the mojito. It was crisp, refreshing, exactly like it's supposed to be. After the nasty, syrupy monstrosity they served me at Cascal in Mountain View, I was so ready for a good mojito and La Bodeguita delivered. The Dark & Stormy (ginger beer and dark rum) was also really good and pretty freakin strong. I was impressed with the specialty cocktail list and probably would've drank myself all the way through it if money (and the ability to walk out unassisted) were no object. Pork empanadas were an excellent starter. $10 and you get three. Since we had four in our party, the server offered to add a fourth, but we had one vegetarian in the group so it wasn't necessary. The server's attention to detail was appreciated though. Also had plantain chips with black bean salsa and the special plantain-crusted calamari, neither of which was particularly good but not bad either. I had the Ropa Vieja entree, shredded skirt steak with peppers and tomatoes on yellow rice with plantains. An enormous portion, enough for dinner and a (big) late-night snack. And it was delicious both times. The menu selection isn't huge, but it's decent. Seafood-heavy. For a true vegetarian, the only entree choice is the veggie plate, but there are also salads and some soup choices. Great service. In addition to being attentive, our server had lots of personality. Nice mood lighting, cuban music playing in the bar... cool place overall. We made a reservation for four last minute on a Fri night and got the most baller table in the place, the curved corner booth. Do: Make a reservation and have a mojito. Don't: Freak out when you see the price for the Bodeguita Ajiaco and the paella. They both serve two.
UPDATE: Okay - I have to change my rating to 3.5 stars (down from 4.5) since all the other Cuban options in the Bay Area are crap. . I came here last Friday with a bunch of friends. The new things I tried were: Crab croquettes - VERY good Pork dish - good Seafood ajiaco - This was okay. It wasn't as fresh as it could have been. Wasn't very satisfying to me. Overall, this night, the food was not up to par as it usually is.  The plantains were not ripe enough. Also, I tried the Ropa Vieja which is still one of my favorite dishes here, and I'm happy to say that I have figured out how to make this dish so I guess I won't be ordering it here anymore. =) Since we came here as a group of 7, we were told that we would have to get kicked out by 815. We didn't get served dessert until then, so we went past our time. I literally just put my jacket on and picked up my purse when one of the blonde hostesses came up to me and RUDELY told me to get out. I said "we are done and leaving right now." Then as we walked out the door, she went up to another hostess and was like: Hostess 1: "I had to have a little talk with them" Hostess 2: "Oh did they leave" Hostess 1: "Yes." Hostess 2: "THANK GOD!" I'm not much of a stickler on service, but some of the ppl I was with are. Needless to say, that was uncalled for. I mean can't ppl talk shit about customers after they leave? LOL. But anyway, I will probably come back for lunch since it's half the price and the same portions - maybe not so much for dinner. -------------------------------------------------------------------------- CEVICHE - This was okay, but I've had better. They need to up the lime. PAN ROASTED MUSSELS - I LOVE THIS appetizer SO MUCH. The sauce it comes with is sooo good. We never let the waiters take our plate away until we are done dipping our bread into the leftover sauce. I could drink it like soup! The citrus and garlic flavor is perfect. FIDEOS CON CAMARONES  - Wow, butter, seafood, avocado on pasta. I would prefer more "al dente pasta" but maybe it's not supposed to be like that. ROPA VIEJA  - Probably one of their most popular dishes. I just don't get how they don't serve maduros with this during lunch. I had to order a side of it. For dinner they serve the same amount but w/ the maduros for almost twice as much... ARROZ CON POLLO  - Good, kinda like Pio Pio in NYC. I don't think they have the aji sauce though. TIERRA Y MAR - skirt steak and prawns. Seasoned and prepared very well. THE CUBANO SANDWICH  - My friend loves these and he said this is great here. KEY LIME TART - Tangy, sweet, and light. MR. JOHNSONS' CHOCOLATE RUM CAKE - If you like chocolate... I mean REALLY LOVE LOVE chocolate, then order this. This is REALLY thick and RICH. One bite, and I was done. HOUSEMADE FLAN - great, fresh flan with a twist of orange in it. HAVANA BANANAS - Love this dessert. Has that kick with all the cinnamon added. CAFE CON LECHE - Delicious. I like it here. HAVANA SUNRISE - We always order this drink when we come eat here. SANTIAGO COOLER - Yummy! NOTE: Closed on Sundays.
I am upping the stars on my previous review.  I had come here a few weeks ago for my "going away" lunch for work.  My boss loves this place and even though she asked me where I wanted to eat, I still suggested this place because she'd 1) veto my choice or 2) go to the place I wanted to go to and then complain about why we didn't go to La Bodeguita. I ordered the carne asada sandwich with a side of greens.  The beef was tender and moist, however, they slathered on this chipotle adobo sauce which just over powered the meat.  Let down there. The Havana Banana dessert saved the day.  It is is an absolutely rich dessert with ice cream, caramel, and other good stuff oozing out.
Great place for lunch!  Service, ambiance, prices - all wonderful.  I just ordered the wrong thing.... Read more 
I came here for dinner last night with 2 friends (one of whom was fellow Yelper Vicky L.). Pros: -Plantains - yum! -Ropa Vieja - loved how juicy the skirt steak was -Our waiter was great - super friendly Cons: -Two hours after we had first arrived, we had finished our food and were in the middle of a great conversation (after having not seen each other for a few months)...when a staff member approached and asked us to leave. Apparently, they only let you have your table for 2 hours and kick you out after 2 hours. This was also not mentioned to me when I had first made the reservation. Not cool. -My mojito was too sour. I asked for more sugar, which improved the flavor slightly. I hear the tierra y mar and masitas are supposed to be delicious (and authentic), but I didn't get to try those this time. This is a decent Cuban place, but I was a bit turned off by the fact that we got kicked out after 2 hours while still in the middle of our catch-up session.
I've passed by this gem so many times saying, "I / We need to eat here one of these days!" That day came and it was quite an enjoyable experience. It was a warmish day and it was definitely warmish plus inside the restaurant; I'm wondering if I would want to eat there in the summertime... I started with a Mojito (I've just started drinking these) and it was not nearly sweet enough for me and I had to add sugar to get it up to my liking. As an appetizer we shared the Empanadas and they were delicious. My entree was the Tierra Y Mar (skirt steak, coconut-crusted tiger prawns, and sofrito** mashed potatoes). VERY good food!! **I had never heard of sofrito until I started watching the PBS cooking show hosted by Daisy Martinez. She is the cutest thing ever and she says, "Sofrito!!!" with such flair and passion that I've been curious to have something with it as an ingredient for years. The service was tentative with good intentions. I'm not sure if our servers were new at the restaurant, but they seemed, as I said, tentative, as well as nervous. Nothing was wrong with the service but it wasn't POW! I look forward to dining here again.
Satisfaction!!  Score!! This place did not disappoint, especially the much talked about Tierra y Mar (steak & shrimp).  It really is that good!  The steak is so tender and well cooked.  The shrimp are almost mini lobsters and they are lightly sweetened and battered.  It is freakin fabulous!  As usual, my only complaint is that the portion could have been bigger for the $25 entree. The Arroz con Pollo was delicious too, but I'd definitely just get the steak & shrimp every time.  The shrimp cerviche was perfectly flavored too, but nothing out of this world. They also have a huge selection of rum, which my dinner companion happily tried.  Not for me, but was supposedly good. The atmosphere is also very cozy and romantic, but can be a bit loud.   It's great for date place, but can also good for a larger group dinner too. Overall, it's a definite repeat on my list!  :)
Have you ever taste a victory dinner? Trust me it taste really good. THANKS DAVE!! I had this place booked marked for awhile now and since I won our bet, it was a perfect opportunity. It is a cute little Cuban restaurant and I think a good place to take a date too. This is what we ordered. EMPANADAS - Delish and perfect in the right amount of spice. I thought it might be to spicy but was not at all. The black bean salsa that came with it was so good. PALMITOS SALAD - This was good. It came with Hearts of Palm and the grapefruit add a difference in the salad. ROPA VIEJA - The meat was so tender and full of flavor. I would say this is the best dish of the night. ARROZ CON POLLO - The chicken was not bad. It was so tender that it fell off the bone. Its much milder in flavor than the Ropa Vieja but still very good. For Dessert our server Chris (by the way was very nice and attentive) suggest us order the Banana Havana. I am sure it is good but I am kinda banana out from eating all the plantains we had on our dish. We end up ordering the Key Lime Pie and Flan. The Flan was much more dense than expected but it was creamer too. The Key Lime had a perfect blend of lime and sugar. The crust was so good. Overall dinner was wonderful and I am a big fan. All the food was good. Will be back and when I am better to definitely try there mojito
I will NEVER go to this restaurant again and I encourage you to do the same. My friend made a reservation for 6 people on Saturday night for 6:15 p.m.  At the time the reservation was made, my friend was told that we had to finish our meal by 8:15 p.m.  While we found this request unusual and off putting, we knew dinner would not be prolonged since we had two children coming with us. We timely arrived for our reservation and sat down. When we got to the table, our friend realized that we had miscounted and we actually had 7 people.  Seeing that the table had ample room to accommodate us, we grabbed a chair from another empty table.  At this point the restaurant was half empty. Before we had a chance to tell the waiter that we grabbed a chair, a woman approached us in a very agitated state.  She began to abruptly chastise us like school children for adding a chair to the table.  She told us that we might have to leave because there may not be enough chairs in the restaurant.  How ridiculous!  I have never experienced such hostility by staff member at a restaurant.  Last time I checked, the customer is always right.  We were all dumbfounded by her insulting conduct. Shortly after she turned away from us in a huff, the hostess appeared and also said that she needed to make sure they had enough chairs in the restaurant to accommodate our party.  Later she returned and said we could stay.  (How nice!)  I explained to her that the first woman who talked to us was extremely rude.  The hostess told us the woman was the OWNER!!!!  I could not believe it.  An owner should know better. My biggest regret of the evening was not leaving when the owner gruffly berated us.  Had the owner come over and apologized for having a temporary loss of sanity and for treating us so poorly, I would not be writing this review.  The owner walked by our table multiple times during our dinner and shot dirty looks at us.  Unbelievable! To be even handed, our waiter was extremely nice and attentive.  The food was good, not great.  I ordered the chicken.  The chicken was cooked properly but the garnishes were cold when they arrived at the table.
Short and Sweet: Best Mojitos In Town. Totally a great spot to grab a bite (great Cuban) without the hoards of people that traffic University Ave. Its places like this that are bringin Cal Ave back! and oh, just because anecdotes make for great reviews, I walked in and sat down (waiting on my date) -- the waiter brought me over a cuban fashion designer's lookbook from this past season to browse through while I waited. Did he just know I worked in fashion? Luck? Regardless, I was super impressed that in the swamped bar one of the waiters was that attentive! (and the designer who I don't remember had some great stuff too!) Besos
The line was out the door at 7pm on a Friday night, which is prime time for La Bodeguita Del Medio.  The place itself is small, with 3 tables outside, a formal dining area, and a pretty good sized bar area with tables and bar seating.  The bar is open to anyone, and people kind of hover in anticipation of a table.  Interestingly, by about 8:30, a lot of tables opened up, so I guess it really is the post-work rush. Everyone starts with a mojito, which is their signature drink.  They have lots of other cocktails and wines, many from California. We started with nice, crusty bread with a spicy tomato oil for dipping.  The oil reminded me of the residual reddish oil in your bowl after you've finished your red sauce pasta. We also had the conch and shrimp stew, which was a nice thick and slightly chunky puree of vegetables and seafood with a tomato base.  It was slightly creamy and had a lot of seafood essence.  The palmitos salad was nice in that the frisee and mixed greens were chopped very small, good for bite size.  However, I expected hearts of palm in the "palmitos" salad, and I though the menu description mentioned it, but all it had was candied nuts, grapefuit, and avacado.  Everyone there seems to order a salad, though.. The 2 of us shared the paella for our main.  Everyone says it's big enough for 3-4 people, but we finished it without any problem.  I'm pretty full, but I think it's actually good for 2 people, especially if it's 2 guys.  It has a generous topping of clams and mussels.  The saffron flavor is mild, and the dish was actually much better accented after adding salt from the table.  There are also chunks of white meat chicken and chorizo.  Since my first taste of paella in Spain, I've been longing for the nice crust at the bottom.  I had high hopes for it when I first saw the pan, but the rice actually had a lot of residual broth in it, which was fine for flavoring, but I just expected something different, texture-wise.  I do like how the pan keeps everything piping hot, though. We were too stuffed for dessert after finishing off that paella.  Most other tables opted for the banana dessert, which looked good. Service is pretty attentive, even though they're really busy, and water is filled quickly.  Also, the manager/owner came to check in a lot, which was nice. This is definitely some higher end Cuban.  The food isn't bad, and you pay a bit of a premium for the location on the peninsula.  Like most of the places on California Street, food is solid but not spectacular; however, I do enjoy the ambiance/small restaurant feel.  It's a nice change from the other run-of-the-mill suburban restaurants.
4.5 Stars if I could. My boyfriend and I wanted a romantic dinner date for our anniversary before we both leave for college, and we achieved just that at Bodeguita Del Medio. I suggest reservations beforehand, because the restaurant is very small, and fills up quickly! The ambiance is great for dates and get togethers with friends and family. Though if you're looking for a quiet, peaceful evening, this may not be the restaurant as it can get loud during dinner time. The service was amazing! My boyfriend and I had our waters filled at least  5x each. Everyone who worked there greeted us and put forth effort to provide us with great service.  We had the croquetas as our appetizer, and the paella for 2 as a shared entree. Both plates were delicious! The croquetas had a creamy potato on the inside. The paella had some delicious spices to it! It was nice to have a paella that didn't skimp out on the meats and seafood, and wasn't bathing in oil. It was a bit pricey, but it was good for us to take home for lunch the next day. Overall, I'd be glad to come back here!
I don't smoke, but the moment I step in (especially if you enter through the back humidor), I get a hankering to sniff a Graycliff like I could afford to pick up the habit. First things first: Arrive about 10 minutes prior to the rest of your party and take in the color, cultural warmth and spices at the front bar. Unwind with a mojito, maybe 2, as you conjur up ruminations of taking your next vacation to Havana.  The restaurant is insulated enough that you almost forget there's a Quizno's across the street.  When you're finally seated, enjoy the bread and hot chile dipping oil with an order of the crab cakes, then the crusted goat cheese salad...the play of crunchy/soft textures of the plantain crust on the fried goat cheese is wonderful and the sherry vinaigrette, a tart kick. The Masitas are really tender.  Between the generous portions of rice and black beans, it could satisfy any rapacious appetite.  Tierry y Mar, Ropa Vieja, Ajiaco - all good selections. It'll be challenging, but you'll have to exercise self control since you absolutely must leave room for the housemade Havana Bananas, which is caramelized sweet bananas, toasted walnuts, with a dollop of vanilla ice cream dusted with cinnamon.  And I don't mean to be presumptuous, but believe me, this last one has the makings of becoming the next month's lustful craving...
I like!  Ricky Ricardo's got nothin' on me!  I've never had Cuban fare before but I will be back to this unpretentious restaurant in the heart of Palo Alto.  My guest and I had the Maraquitas Plantain Chips as a shared starter and Arroz con Pollo and Tierra y Mar as our entrees.  To drink, a lemon drop and two Sierra Nevadas.  It was all very good and the portions were decent.  I'll be back!  Good ambiance too.
My favorite restaurant around! Awesome mojitos and really good food. Friendly and accommodating service. I get the coconut curry everytime and it's always amazing. I've also tried a chicken dish or two and was also impressed. I just wish they were on OpenTable so reservations were easier (I've been stuck sitting behind the bar, which is kind of loud). NOTE: Come in the front door to avoid the gross cigar garden - bleh!
A last minute dining decision led my dining companion and I to La Bodeguita Del Medio. Located just off El Camino Real, the place is a little slice of Havana in Palo Alto. The bar area was lively and packed. Unfortunately, there were no more tables available in the dining area unless you made a reservation so we had to wait for a table in the bar area. No matter. A couple of alcoholic drinks were ordered while we waited for a table to open up. My mojito was watered-down and could have been more livelier with more rum. After 15 minutes, a table by the window opened up and we were ready to start indulging in some delectable Cuban cuisine. Our order consisted of: Croquetas: Crispy fried potato balls combined with manchego cheese. I thought they were a little bland. The tamarind-chipotle BBQ sauce solved that problem. Tierra y Mar: Deliciously marinated skirt steak + zesty avocado-cilantro pesto = perfection. The server said they cook it medium-rare. I thought to myself, "That is the only way to cook steak.". The tiger prawns were huge, succulent, and flavorful. Loved the crispy texture of the coconut coating which provided a sweet background. Plato de Vegetales: I only got a couple bites of this dish. Usually I'm skeptical of vegetarian dishes, but this dish was well-prepared. Black bean cake was the "meat" of the dish and was dense but was quite pleasant tasting. The sauteed vegetables were cooked to a perfect al-dente. The environment in the bar area was lively with people conversating all around and enjoying themselves. There was a live band playing that created an upbeat and joyous environment. I could not have been more happy with this place and look forward to coming here again to have another marvelous Cuban dining experience.
Don't let me near their Rose, I could easily drink a bottle. Their chart topping Ceviche soaked in some kind of coconut milk and served with these yummy 'plantation chips.' I know the banana chips are called something different, but plantation chips sticks in the same way that 'Dark Vader' and 'Light Savers' shall never be corrected in my Star Wars vocabulary. Lunch here is quite nice, dinner being more semi-formal. Either way the food is fantastic, Cuban is usually off my radar because its not often one comes across it, but it's welcome variety that I categorize with Peruvian, Brazilian or the Spanish Tapas genre.
It's as if there were an embargo on flavor.  Things started out inauspiciously, with a decently spicy Dark and Stormy, and a pair of mediocre mojitos.  We diagnosed them as excessively watery, with old, flavorless mint and possibly too much lime juice.  Since they take such pride in the drink, we felt compelled to tell the server how disappointing they were, and he said that the restaurant had *never* gotten a complaint about its mojitos and that they were regularly told that they were better than what you get in Cuba itself.  I find that difficult to believe, but sad, if true. Entrees continued down the same unpromising path.  Croquettes tasted only of mild processed cheese (like fried velveeta) and were mysteriously served with barbeque sauce, though the accompanying carrot slaw was pretty tasty.  Steak and coconut shrimp were just fine, although neither element was anything to write home about.  Indeed, I was amazed by how little taste the steak had, though I liked the texture of the crunchy coating on the shrimp. The biggest disappointment was the Cuban sandwich.  The key to a good Cuban sandwich is balance-- the rich ingredients (two kinds of pork, melted cheese) are counterbalanced by spicy mustard and salty, crunchy pickles.  It was impossible to taste the mustard on the sandwich (if it was even there) and the pickles were thin, scant, watery, and tasteless.  A Cuban sandwich without pickles and mustard is barely more than a grilled ham and cheese sandwich (a fine thing in its own way, I guess).  What is worse, there seemed to be a double or triple serving of cheese on the whole thing, thoroughly overpowering what little mustard or pickle flavor there might have been.  We peeled off wads of excess melted cheese, and still the whole thing was out of whack.  By this point we'd given up on substantive complaints about the food because it seemed pretty clear that the menu was designed for people with bad taste.
If Hemingway recommends their mojitos, how can you say no??? Ok, I know that he actually wrote about the "real" La Bodeguita in Cuba, but the mojitos still rock at this one.  Bartenders at other places usually hate or have no idea how to make a proper mojito, because it takes just the right combination of muddled mint, real sugar cane, and simple syrup to go with the rum.  Since La Bodeguita serves so many, they have setups for mojitos already lined up at the bar, with the muddled mint seeping nicely with the sugarcane. The walk-in humidor and cigar lounge are great as well.  I actually think it's pretty charming that you have to bus your own tables, since the waitstaff can't go into the smoking area unless they're "volunteers." Nice place to relax over a cigar with friends and unwind after a hard week or have an informal team meeting.
Pay attention. I'm going to tell you the secret to enjoying a Cuban restaurant. Ready? OK, do a bit of homework and order something that's actually Cuban. The end. For example, if you go to this place and order tacos (not Cuban but Mexican you see) don't be dissapointed if they don't turn out hot enough.  In the same vein I wouldn't go to a French restaurant to eat ceviche. Capisci? Typical Cuban dishes that Bodeguita does very well: Appetizers -mariquitas, fried plantains, croquetas, and empanadas, black bean soup, Entrees -ropa vieja, masitas, arroz con pollo, ajiaco, Cuban sandwich, paella, snapper, bistec de palomilla** **Understand that not everyone in the world likes to eat something that looks like it may get up and run away (aka a bloody steak). In the Caribbean we like to pound our steaks until they are pretty thin, marinate them for a long time, and cook them well done. The 'barely cooked' theme (heck not even a hint of red) doesn't do well with the scorching heat. For desserts you have to have flan and the key lime tart. If they happen to be offering anything with guavas, have it and like it. And of course please do try the mojitos and daiquiris which although cannot be made with Cuban rum as originally intended for obvious reasons are pretty freaking good and it only takes a couple to give you a nice buzz. Oh yeah our waiters have always been very nice and accomodating.
This is the sort of "hip" restaurant you take clients to when your company's footing the bill.  (Like too many of the restaurants on Cal Ave).  It's bland, expensive, and overly slick.  The food's inoffensive, but portions are tiny, and it's WAY over-priced.  Also, at a supposedly "Cuban" restaurant, I'd expect them to make a better mojito. And what's with all the Hemingway cheeze???  (Yeah, yeah, I know he liked Cuba and all, but all the Hemingway stuff makes it seem a little too much like a theme restaurant . . . )
Drink:  Havana Sunrise.. a little less sweet than a mojito..the grapefruit gives it a refreshing kick. Entree:  The Tierra Y Mar (steak/shrimp) is great...The waiter told me that the staff gets to try a meal once and week, and he always gets it. Delicious!  Soft juicy meat, crispy shrimp, and tangy sauce. Fun fact:  There's a letter from Bill Clinton complimenting the restaurant's cigar selection posted on the wall (kind of on the way to the bathroom).
Well, since its a little tricky to hop on a plane and travel to Cuba I guess ill have to settle for La Bodeguita. My little taste of Havana right here in Palo Alto. The food here is second to none, no competition around. I went here for lunch and the menu selection they offered was perfect. It wasn't to overwhelming and they seem to focus on the delivering the best bang for the buck. The prices were down to earth and my wallet can agree with me on this one. BISTEC DE PALOMILLA was what I ordered- Nicely cooked, marinated skirt steak. Scrumptious black beans mixed with rice. They gave a healthy portion of plantains that complimented the meal and left me craving for more. The lunch portions are just right so I didn't have to loosen my belt or have to be rolled out to the car in a wheelchair. It` was the perfect size for lunch. My only regret was not ordering the classic Mojito. Will I go back? Hell to the yeah. Been back already and ate like it was my last meal.
Holy crap this place was awesome. Between the three of us we had the following: Pan Roasted Mussels: So great, the broth was heavenly, we were sopping it up with our bread like it was the best thing in the world. Marinated Olives: I love olives, the funny thing about these was that it was a bunch of little olives and one giant mutant olive in the middle of the bowl. It made us laugh. Plantain Chips: Served with black bean salsa - very tasty, would definitely order again. Ropa Vieja: This was delicious, the meat was so tender and tasty, this plate was all but licked clean. Masitas: I loved this, it had a really nice bite to it, the meat was super tender and flavorful and the sweet caramelized onions added just exactly the right balance to the dish. Cubano Sandwich: I didn't actually try this one, but my friend seemed to enjoy it quite a lot and it looked really good, the sandwich was absolutely packed with meat and it was huge!  Plenty to take home for lunch the next day. Coconut Sorbet: There were bits of coconut in it, not like flaky gross bits, but sweet, tender bits of coconut, the sorbet was creamy and light at the same time, it was a really nice end to the meal. Key Lime Tart: Also really good, but I liked the sorbet better. And assorted cocktails (my personal favorite was the dark and stormy). Clearly this was a ton of food, so we rolled out the door very well satisfied, at a cost of about $55/person for that much food, that's not a bad deal. While this place is a bit outside my usual stomping grounds I know I won't be able to resist coming back. Next time I have to try the arroz con pollo!
I'm writing this based on memory -- and since I last dined there in August, 2000, that memory's a touch rusty. This was pretty much what you'd expect for a Palo Alto restaurant -- nice decor, good service, tasty food, way overpriced.  I had some kind of rack of lamb or something that I really, really loved.  We also had ceviche, I think, that I also enjoyed. And the mojitos were the best I've ever had.  I probably was way too drunk to drive home, which didn't stop me, sadly. The prices, though, were a touch stupid.  Again, what you'd expect for the PA.
It's a nice lunch spot on California Ave. It looks small from the outside, but it's actually fairly big inside which is great because there's less of a wait. There was actually no wait on a Thursday around 12:30 PM for two people, but we might have taken the last table. Here's what we tried: - CROQUETAS ($8.50) : This was recommended by the server, and it was a great choice.  They were potato fritters with cheese inside served with a bbq sauce.  Great flavor~ I liked the carrots with some white sauce that it came with too. - ARROZ CON POLLO ($11.00) : This cuban style braised chicken was really good.  Like the other reviewers said, the meat was very tender and basically fell off the bone.  Even though it's white meat, it wasn't too dry.  The fried sweet plantains served with them were delicious too. Big pieces that were just a little sweet.  Nothing special about the rice, but I liked the fact that there was just the rice amount of rice served with it.  I don't like it when restaurants serve a little bit of meat on a giant mound of rice. - ROPA VIEJA  ($11.50) : The shredded skirt steak was really flavorful, and it went great with the rice and beans. The food, price, and service were good.  The only complaint I have is that the menu seems to be in a foreign language.  It was very difficult to understand because even some of the ingredients were listed in Cuban Spanish, such as the "moros y cristanos" = rice and beans, and "plantanos maduros" = plantains.  It would have helped if there was some translation.
I've been down Cal Ave. hundreds of times, but somehow totally missed this place. When boyfriend took me here on a Friday night, we were excited to find a busting little place filled with trendy young yuppies and old graying yuppies alike. The problem is that La Bodeguita del Medio is entirely too Palo Alto. Everything costs twice as expensive as it should, and the food is good but really not that great. We ended up here on a Friday night at 9, hunting for a place that was still open. Luckily no wait, or this rating would have gone down another star. The Masitas (spicy roasted pork with black beans & rice) that I had was good, but most definitely not worth almost $20. I did really like the onions on top. Boyfriend's Ropa Vieja was a similar story. The Mojito that he had (and I stole) was a great pairing for spicy meat. I can see this as a potentially good lunch place, but it's just not worth it for dinner.
Awesome, Cuban food with big portions. The mojitos are fantastic. Not as sweet as the traditional ones. I quite liked the slight difference. We didn't have a reservation and were offered the ability to eat at the bar or wait for a table in the relatively small main dinning area. We choose the bar and were quite pleased. Although there was a live musician, he kept the beautiful guitar music to a level where you could enjoy both him and your company. The quality of the music was excellent. If you want the dinning area make reservations. The bar tenders (there were multiple) were cute eye candy and just the right level of chatty and competent. Tthe bartender is your waiter if you are eating at the bar. The bar was busy yet they managed to engage at all the right times and bring out food both for us and the many other patrons quickly, from what we saw. The food wasn't as hot as I expected from other Cuban restaurants. They are happy to provide jalapenos and other means of adding heat on request. The desserts all look amazing and the couples next to us assured us that the taste was equally as good. We shared a Key Lime Pie. Just the right tart flavor and a fruit sauce and real whipping create which balance the flavor perfectly. In all an excellent place to go. I'll be back for sure.
I had seen this place before last year and was curious about their menu but never really got around to venturing in so I was just in luck when my friend decided that we should give it a whirl. We ordered the Pork Empanadas for an appetizer - spicy yet very tasty. The sauce and beans it came with sat really well together. I ended up choosing the Platos de Vegetables (it looked good!) and she ordered the Rojo (steak) entree. Now, I am not a vegetarian by all means, but this dish was SUPERB! They had circled the plate with sauteed zucchini and squash and put a "goat cheese chimmichurri sauce" over it and 2 black bean cakes over a mash of some sort. It was to die for good (Hers was good too but just salty)! I tried the El Presidente and the Hemingway cocktails and I preferred the Hemingway - very nice, smooth martini like drink. Definitely a place everyone should try at least once.
I love this place so much, I'm updating my already glowing review. We had dinner here with a friend on Saturday evening. Almost every table was full, and there were some very large parties as well. I was really impressed that the service was still so attentive, and the food still came out in the expected amount of time. A lot of time service and food can really fall behind when a restaurant gets slammed. Obviously, they're used to this, and everything was top notch. I had different drink from last time...Can't remember the name,but it was kind of like a lemon drop, but less sweet. We shared the empanadas again, and I had the same entree as before, (ahi, with boniato mash,spinach,and spicy avocado/tomato chutney type thing on top.) I LOVE that they have a main dish that is so flavorful, and yet pretty healthy (for a meal that I didn't make myself.) Everything was stellar, and I can't wait to take more friends here!
We had dinner here last night with a total of 8 people. Service was great, and the food was pretty... Read more 
I called ahead to make a reservation and was told I really didn't need to make one, but I made one anyway. Upon arriving, we were told to wait because no tables were available... Um... Ok.. Waited for 10 mins then we were finally taken to an open table. Ordered the coconut shrimp ceviche to start and two entrees for our main course. Our entrees were brought out BEFORE our appetizer. I was pretty pissed about this. Especially since our entrees are hot and savory and our appetizer was cold and a bit sweet. The two don't go very well together. We tried to eat the ceviche first, but since our main dishes were getting cold, we decided to just eat those and worry about the ceviche later. As was to be expected, this place is pricey. Yeah, it's fancier than your hole-in-the-wall cuban eatery, but $18 for arroz con pollo?? It wasn't even close to the authentic arroz con pollo that I'm used to. Service was not very good. And I'm still pissed about how the food came out. Won't be back.
You can't get lost trying to find this place. It's not hard at all. Seeing all the three/two star reviews makes me want to give it less stars...but why should I? I LOVED this place. Yes...this place gets crowded later on, but I got here for an early dinner with a friend. We got here at 5, a half hour before they opened, but were able to sit in the bar area (that is SEPARATE from the dining) and order drinks and appetizers. Once 5:30 rolled around we moved to a table for dinner. The food was absolutely fantastic for both my friend and I. The Tierra Y Mar was fabulous. Yes, it was 22 dollars and not the biggest meal, but it filled me up perfectly. So incredibly yummy. If you aren't sure about this place, sit in the bar area, order some drinks and appetizers and enjoy the ambiance. Yes, it's a little pricey for some, but it is GOOD. Get there early to avoid the loud atmosphere. It's worth it. Oh yeah, and get a Cuban Sidecar. Delicious!
What a hidden gem in Palo Alto! The atmosphere was really cozy and quaint. There was a musician in the bar area playing his guitar, candles on the table, darker lighting, quiet ambiance that allows you to have a conversation without screaming or reading lips....it's a romantic place to bring a date for sure. The service was excellent. Our foodserver was attentive, friendly and professional. I had the key lime martini, and it tasted exactly like I was sipping on a key lime pie. I couldn't really taste the alcohol because it was so sweet, which can spell t-r-o-u-b-l-e. :) There was even graham cracker crust around the rim of the glass - what a nice touch! For dinner, I had the tuna, which was tastey. My friend had the spicy pork, which was tender and flavorful, but not too spicy at all. You may want to bust out the tabasco sauce or habanero if you want to spice it up. :) We didn't have dessert there, but the menu had a good variety of desserts to choose from. The check came quick, and there wasn't much waiting to get it settled. Overall, it was a great experience and I really liked the restaurant. I'd give it 4 whoppin' stars! Food was good, drinks maybe even better, and the company was the best. :) I'd definitely recommend it!
Alas, my eloquent friend in a previous review paints an accurate picture of one of the WORST restaurant experiences I have ever had, bar none.  I can't believe most of the other reviews have been so favorable. Maybe if I had ordered a mojito (or 5) it would have numbed my senses enough to get through the relatively short dining experience.  I think we were in and out in about 75 minutes and from beginning to end, literally, it was one jaw-dropper after another.  Everything from the hostess that didn't appear to have time to honor our reservation to the tongue-tied waiter that struggled to get his foot out of his mouth. 3 out of 4 of the people in my party had flavorless and/or overcooked food.  Although I will say that the Masitas, as accurately reported by others on Yelp, was divine.  I cannot deny that, and we all agreed.  Good thing the waiter had enough sense to return promptly to the table to verify that my friend did, in fact, want 1/2 an order of Masitas wrapped up.  Maybe if he had asked her in the first place... Ay, ay, ay.
Pretty good overall.  This is based on price of items, proximity to the house, quality of ingredients, preparation & flavor. -Crab cakes w/blue crab, old bay, cilantro pesto, red pepper sofrito, roasted corn salsa, good, I liked that the sweetness of the crab was not masked by sauces.  The grilled corn was fantastic. -Skip the Caesar salad, not enough oomph in the dressing & leaves were a bit wilted. -Spice dusted snapper w/pineapple-habanero chutney, not spicy enough and I didn't like the sweet flavor from the pineapple in combination with the spices. -Tierra y mar, marinated skirt steak cooked perfectly, the coconut crusted prawns were delicious! -Paella, loads of protein: chicken breast, chorizo, clams, mussels, fish & prawns on spiced yellow rice, tasted even better the next day after all the flavors muddled together. A few misses, but they are overlooked by the better items encountered.  I know, Cuban cuisine isn't known for their Caesar. Next time I'll catch a margarita or some of their famous concoctions.
Cuban food is something that I always crave, yet can't ever seem to find.  My friend Paul recommended this place and so we three hungry souls went.. Started off the evening with a mojito - yum!  The dining room opens up into an airy room with high ceilings and exposed fans.  It set the right mood for what we ordered: CEVICHE: house-cured shrimp, key lime juice, coconut milk, black beans, cilantro, peppers  11.00 -  Smallish serving, but very good.  Loved the plaintain chips (we didn't order the appetizer version, but if it's anything like what's in the ceviche - definitely try it!) CROQUETAS: crispy fritters with potatoes, manchego, pimienton, green onion, and a tamarind-chipotle bbq sauce  8.00 - Eh, I could have passed on this.  It was good, but a little too fried. CUBAN BLACK BEAN SOUP vegetarian  6.00 - I could live on this soup.  It's very simple, but delicious. GRAYCLIFF CONCH/SHRIMP CHOWDER dairy-free  7.00 - Save your bread for this.  Red sauce - not too thick, really good. MASITAS  11.00 spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans, cilantro, rioja carmelized red onions - The contrast of the sweet onions with the saltiness of the pork (wasn't too spicy) = perfection.  The meat was melt-in-your-mouth tender (for both this and the chicken). ARROZ CON POLLO   10.50 cuban style braised chicken, plantanos maduros, yellow rice - We ordered an extra side of plantanos (around $4) and while it was more mushy than crispy, I still liked it.  The chicken (fell off the bone) and rice is comfort food - the Cuban equivalent of fried rice or noodley soup. The wine - Dehesa Gago "G" - Toro  Spain  6.50  26.00 A great rec that I need to go buy more of!
3 1/2 stars.  Lunch review Over the years I've eaten lunch here a couple dozen times.  Today four of my work-friends and I arrived here shortly after noon.  After we were seated, one of them suddenly remembered he had an important 1 PM meeting about 20 minutes drive from here.  In the past, lunches here have been served at a rather leisurely pace and we all knew this was going to be a problem.  We told the waitress that we were in a rush. She said this was no problem and sure enough got out of there in half the time it would normally take and my friend got back with time to spare.  In spite of our reminding her several times that we were in a rush, she was friendly, cheerful, and polite.  After today's experience, service here gets 5 stars from me, at least for today's server! I had the salmon salad with greens, asparagus, red onion, and sherry vinaigrette which was good.  It was supposed to come with olives but mine didn't.  That's a minor detail though I do love good olives.  In the past I've had most of their other lunch entrees including the  arroz con pollo (chicken, plantains, and rice), masitas (spicy roasted pork and red caramelized red onions), ropa vieja (shredded skirt steak, peppers, tomatoes), and bistec de Palomilla (marinated skirt steak and plantains).  Most dishes come with rice and beans.  All these dishes are good, though some are subtly flavored which is my kind way of saying some are rather bland tasting to me.   My favorites are the ropa vieja and the masitas. Acoustics here are bad.  Everyone is trying to talk louder than the people around them so they can be heard.  Eventually everyone is screaming and all the sound is reflected from the mostly bare walls, ceiling, and floor. In summary: 3 1/2 stars for food 5 stars for service 1 star for noise 4 stars for atmosphere 3 stars for value If I had a couple mojitos I would probably give it another star but we had to go back to work.
It's not traditional Cuban food, it's Cuban-fusion, but it's very good.  To start, the mojitos are delish and SOO easy to drink ... be careful, you can drink them way too fast and you'll be on your ass before you know it. The food is good, not excellent, but good.  The croquetas for instance aren't traditional, but they're yummy nonetheless.  The salads are always very fresh and good, especially the green salad with the fried goat cheese, mmm.  The Cuban sandwich is average ... sometimes the roasted pork is dry and you don't get enough of that delicious mojo criollo (creole marinade) taste when you bite into the sandwich. The best dish on the menu is the Ropa Vieja ("old clothes" in Spanish) hands down; it's the shredded, slow-cooked beef, served with white rice.  It's very good and it tastes exactly like my daddy's ropa vieja.  For a truly authentic Cubano experience, I suggest you order a side of black beans and plantains to go with your ropa vieja ... then you put a little bit of everything, beef, rice, beans and plantains on your fork, and put it all into your mouth at once - so good. Also, I love the Cuban music that plays incessantly, and the occasional live Cuban music ... that old man with the guitar is so cute.
Great food! I've been there about 5 times and it's great every time as long as I don't have to wait too long to get seated.  I really dig the bread and their dipping sauce. CERVICHE  - Great starter to share with someone. TIERRA Y MAR - Get it everytime and it's always good.  Sounds like there are some mixed feelings on this.  Give it a shot. MOJITOS - I can't really say they're the best I've ever had but they're pretty darn good.
I was facebook stalking a friend who'd gone home to south america over break and saw an mouth-watering photo of homemade paella. Later that night we were going out to dinner in Palo Alto and - lo and behold! - Yelp gives me a Cuban restaurant with paella! That was all we got, and it was pretty damn awesome. No need for photos.. there are plenty uploaded. But I definitely second the girl who says the paella for 2 is more like paella for 4. It was almost too much for the 3 of us to finish it (but don't worry, we did). The flavor was really good, the chicken tender, sausage awesome. I'd say the mussels/clams could've used more flavor (they were just placed on top of the mix & steamed so you had to take out the meat and mix it with the paella) and it was a little on the oily side. A little pricey but you do get a good amount of food and it was damn delicious. Hopefully I can go back to try some of the other dishes too.
My girlfriends decided to try this place for our monthly dinners and it was a great choice!  How often do you have Cuban food??  I can never remember the name of this place though.. I referred to it as La Boogie Cuban food. woops! We went on Tuesday evening and the place was pretty busy for a weekday.  There are two different rooms and a cigar lounge towards the back.  I really want to go check it out but realize was not going to smoke a cigar so passed. We didn't have reservations but we were seated right away so that was nice at prime time dinner hour at 7:30pm. The waiter was very personable and kept referring to us as girls.. what are you girls having.. how did you girls like the food.. etc.  It was cute. It just shows how impeccable the customer service was.  Our water was constantly being refilled. Also another example of great customer service.  We ordered Empanadas and the waiter said there is only 3 in there would you want to add another one?  Because there was 4 of us.   That was considerate!  Vs us getting the order and awkward cutting the 3 pieces to make it even or someone missing out. Empanadas were great!! Pretty big size with sauce drizzled on it.  Also some veggies on it too. I ordered the Plantain Encrusted Goat Cheese Salad. It mainly contained spinach, pine nuts, and was pretty sauced up.  I would have liked it to have less sauce but it was still really good. My friends ordered Chicken and Rice that came with plenty of plaintains which looked yummy. I would def want to try this place at lunch because I hear there is a completely different menu. its somewhat pricey but it is Palo Alto.  My salad was 11 dollars and had no meat versus my friends were about 25.  There are also seafood dishes for 50! I totally like the ambiance though.  I dig it.  They also boxed up my food and wrote the date and what it was.  The little things!
I came here for dinner last week and I left very full. Everything we ordered was delicious, from the mussels to the ropa vieja (because nothing's better than eating old rags, right?), to the olives, to the cubano sandwich, to the coconut sorbet.  And that's just the food. The cocktails were also muy delicioso. We arrived around 6:45 on a Thursday to a packed restaurant, but with great luck our friend was here a few minutes before us and was able to grab a bar table. The service was a bit slow to start out, but once our waiter came by for the first time it was perfect. Man, I want to go back to try the arroz con pollo right now!
I have to say if this review was just apps & drinks, I would easily give it 4 stars. Pretty mellow ambiance with great bartenders. The drinks were very well mixed--flavorful, but I still managed a buzz after 2. The mojitos are good (they don't lose their flavor in the alcohol, nor the alcohol in the flavor), and some of the other drinks (like the stroh punch) have some real ass-kick in them. Drinks are a bit steep ($7 a pop) but so well-executed that I can't complain. Apps-wise, the plantain chips & black bean salsa are delicious and I highly recommend starting your meal off or complimenting your drinks with some. The serving of empanadas is small (3) but worth every bite. If I go back I would venture to try the ceviche. As for the main dishes...I got spoiled living in Southern Florida and having endless opportunities for an inexpensive overstuffed, porktastic sandwich with a side of beans probably ruined me a bit; I can't say I've found a cheapie type Cuban place this side of the Mississip. The authenticity of the food was mixed; some dishes were fabulous and others left a bit to be desired.  Without the sweet Cuban bread, I would have believed the Cubano sandwich came from the Quizno's across the street. The paella was good, but not amazing--which at that price ($46, serves 2) it should have been. Everything was presented in eye-catching fashion, however. Sum of the story: a great place to have drinks and apps when you're looking for something a bit more upscale, but save your meal dollaz for somewhere else down Cal. Ave.
I'm a big fan of this Cuban restaurant nice intimate  atmosphere with low lighting at night with a  very comfortable vibe lunch: if u want to mix things up they have great sandwiches with bolder flavors than your everyday deli sandwich drinks: Cuban restaurant, have to have the MOJITO!!! starter:  you wont be disappointed with the pan roasted mussels. the chili and orange flavors compliment each other well with a making a sweet spicy broth. main: i come hear for the TIERRA Y MAR  a great filling dish of  marinated skirt steak (who doesn't love some good asada) , coconut prawns and sofrito mashed potatoes. very colorful dish both by taste and presentation. and i love the mashed potatoes there's a very sweet and rich flavor to it......good portion walking away not hungry or too full. desert: caramelized bananas or the flan and a small glass of rum ends for a great dinner.
More like 3.5 if it wasn't for the price....the food was tasty, and the portions were impressive. Empanadas: 3 empanadas served with cabbage - really good, for about $9.5 Marinated cheese: a small dish full of cubed cheese in olive oil and rosemary. Interesting. $5. Platos de vegetables: Really good, with tons of ...something that looked like mashed potatoes but tasted sweet. I actually finished the entire plate..and now my stomach hurts. Very good. Surf and turf dish: I only tasted a bite of the steak, and it was pretty damn good skirt steak. Some beef/rice dish: really good!! I kinda wish I ordered this instead of the vegetarian plate, just cuz it was so flavorful! flan: I guess I'm not a huge fan of flan...it was just normal. more dense than i imagined..no taste of rum, just orange.
3.5 Stars to be exact. Had an early dinner with a friend on a Wednesday and was very happy with the quick and friendly service. I have never had Cuban food before so I don't think my judgment is 100% fair. The menu is one page and the entrees are mod to high priced. This was a little discouraging to me since the only two entrees I was interested in ordering were priced at $20. Too much for this college student. My friend and I decided to order 3 appetizers; croquetas (anatomically shaped potato fried dumplings with chili sauce) meat empanadas, and crab cakes. All three appetizers were excellent but the portions were somewhat small for two average sized individuals.
My gf and I came here upon the recommendation from a friend and a few locals said it was good too. It better be... Nice Cubano estilio decor, easy on the eyes and low lighting adds to the mood. Main room shares with a bar and back room is explicitly for eating. They also have a cigar "divan" which is available for private parties. We had a couple of cocktails that were pretty strong and flavorful, go for the Ti punch. We agreed upon the Empanadas as the app, I ordered the Tierra y Mar and my gf got the Ropa Vieja. The empanadas were pretty good, kinda like a chimichanga but not not as heavy. The pork inside was well spiced and seasoned. Next came the main course. The tierra y mar looked absolutely delicious! HUGE plump prawns shoved into a bed of sofrito mash w/the juicy and tender steak resting nearby. The steak was exceptionally marinated and cooked to perfection. My gf's dish was quite large and looked equally enticing. The ropa vieja was excellent! The seasoning and simmering really brought out the flavor and texture of the meat. The plantains and rice were tasty too. This was some of the best cubano food I've had in a looooooooong time. Fidel and his bro need to kick the bucket post haste so I can get down there and gorge myself! Until then I'll have to come here when in the area.
I loved the food! Some questionably cuban things: spicy black beans?! No Tostones (maybe it was just that day)? But all in all a great experience. Great atmosphere too.
MWA's, Giant Cubano Sandwich and Plantanos Maduros Mojitos Without Alcohol = MWA's were refreshing and a good choice when you have a busy afternoon in the office.  The Croquetas were ok but the Empanadas filled with pork, roasted chili's and pepper jack cheese were particularly tasty.  The Cubano Sandwich was a huge grilled buttery delight filled with ham, roasted pork, swiss cheese and dill pickle slices. Plantanos Maduros (side order) were a tad dry but just the right touch of sweetness  and gave us fun memories of our Miami business trip earlier this year.
This place is freaking amazing. All I have to say is go Yuca yourself up. The food, service and prices are great. Yummmm more Yuca!
Between the bright decor, yummy sents, great presentation and charming Cuban atmosphere - I wanted to love this place.  It had been a few years since I'd been here and I still left feeling like it was overpriced and just pretty good overall. On a Monday night this place was still pretty packed for dinner around 8pm.  There was 5 of us and we were placed at a charming, intimate booth in the back with recessed lighting and plenty of room.  The booth was comfy, the table settings nice and it feels pretty nice.  The ambiance is just so nice and comfortable!  Great for a group or an intimate date! The hostess seemed like a sweet young girl but I could hardly hear her as she said she would go set up our table - while nice, I guess I expect a bit more pazazz out of a hostess.  Our server was just ok, he seemed a little lost throughout the meal and wasn't great at recommending things, describing the specials or encouraging our group to order.  He was ok but didn't really come back to check on our table nor did he add to the experience.  It was just ok service. The food: Chicken Croquette Special - three tiny piece for $11.50 - while very flavorful and good the dish was way too pricey.  Three little sticks. Pork Empanadas - pretty good with a flakey texture but a little bland for what I would feel empanadas would taste like.  The black beans and purple cabbage served with it were fresh and tasty though. I got the Tierra Y Mar for my entree - The steak was a bit chewy and more on the rare side than the medium well but had a decent marinade for a tad zesty flavor.  The coconut shrimp while big and meaty were a bit dry and much too covered with friedness.  The mashed potatoes were really good though, creamy, bold and a hearty portion.  The sautated asparagus was good as well and crisp.  The pesto/avocado/cilantro sauce though just didn't deliver - I felt it should have been more bold or a chunky sauce.  And at $25 a plate it was way over priced for just ok food. We also all shared a terrific Redcliffe wine for $26 a bottle which was not only reasonable but light, refreshing and fruity. Great ambiance, ok food, pricey but overall a good meal shared with friends.  Would I go out of my way to come back, no.  Recommend to friends, maybe.
My friends and I were so excited about finally getting to try this restaurant. We were extremely disappointed from our initial contact with the rude hostess to having our waiter remove my friends dish (which was half eaten) without asking if she wanted to keep it... The hostess, instead of asking us if we had reservations, as she'd asked the gentleman in front of us, said "Hi." and then "Can I help you?" as if we were lost... The waiter asked one of my friends if she was over 21...and since she is 35, she expressed shock (happy shock)...and it seemed to throw him off, so he went into a speech about how "white people do their thing..."  and about how "Asians feel this certain way" (my friend is Phillapina.).  All 4 of us were so taken aback, none of us could repeat exactly what he'd said or even what he'd implied but it was bizarre. As for the food...it did not make up for the poor service.  In general, the plates were small servings for large prices.  The crab cake appetizer was tasty but was an unimpressive crusty deep fried ball instead of the light version i was looking forward to.  My grilled prawns were overcooked, rubbery and flavorless (with out salt, anyway)  My friend got the ahi tuna special and remarked that her's had little flavor also.  The side dishes were equally blasse...some sort if cuban tuber that tasted like a mild sweet potato mash and roasted corn...The only dish that was flavorful was the pork with rice and beans...which, although full of flavor, you can get in any good taqueria for a fraction of the cost that La bodegita charged. All in all, a huge disappointment.
Yummy!  If friends were visiting town, I would definitely take them here to experience a great restaurant in the Peninsula. MOJITO (5/5)-- Definitely get a mojito to quench your thirst.  PLUS, the tall glass that the mojito is served in is  SUPER cute.  The mojito is slightly sour yet sweet and has just the right amount of crushed mint to make this a refreshing drink!  This place has the BEST mojito cocktails-- definitely check it out.  If you're a lightweight, get one mojito to share with another person.  :) ROPA VIEJA (4/5)-- delicious and solid!  The skirt steak is marinated and cooked so that it's super soft and tasty.  My bf got this, and I was eating his more than my chicken (see review below) entree. ARROZ CON POLLO (2.5/5)-- As much as I like this chicken entree here, I feel like the chicken isn't as flavorful and satisfying as other chicken I've eaten (even those Costco or Whole Foods rotisserie chickens have more flavor.)  Sometimes the chicken would be a little too fatty, which makes more work for me because I'll have to trim off the fat from the chicken.  Other than that, the chicken is juicy and tender. PANKO CRUSTED MAHI MAHI SANDWICH (3.4/5):  The reason why I'm giving it a 3.5 instead of a 4 is because the mahi mahi looked so tiny!  I split the sandwich with my friend, and I was left wanting more.  The mahi mahi is a little cut of fish that's lightly breaded.  It tastes great with the tartar sauce.  I only wish the restaurant / cooks would be more generous and give you enough of the mahi mahi to fill the sandwich bun. GRILLED CHICKEN BREAST SANDWICH (2/5)-- Very good.  But if you're going for meat, I took a look at everyone else around me and it seems like the pulled pork sandwich (Cubano Sandwich) is king.  The grilled chicken breast sandwich tastes like every other grilled chicken breast sandwich and wasn't very outstanding.  Pass. CHILI SAUCE w/ BREADS (4/5)-- This is SO addicting to eat with your breads.  :) The venue is awesome.  A good tip I received from my friends is to come for lunch-- the menu is the same for dinner, the portions are good (except for the mahi mahi sandwich) and the prices are cheaper than dinner.  During dinner, you get the same menu but you have to fight the dinner rush, which is constant throughout the evening.
Came here after work with some friends. I absolutely loved the food and drinks! The mojito was not too sweet and my hemmingway cocktail was fantastic (...definitely didn't need dessert after that one). We sampled a bunch of the appetizers and I really thought all of them were delicious! The empanadas were flaky and the filling was divine. The shrimp ceviche was unlike any I had ever had before -- great flavors and tasted awesome with the plaintain chips. The plaintain chips were very thin and salty (not like the double fried and pressed ones my grandma used to make which are even better), and the black bean salsa that they come with made me want to eat the entire plate! My one suggestion -- come here seeking out true Cuban cuisine and you will be surprised by the creativity and flavors that they infuse with the traditional recipes. I loved the salsas and sides (that carrot coleslaw  with the empanadas was sooooooo good!). Definitely hope to come back here -- although my time in the bay area is growing short....
Muy Excellente! 4.5 stars. A bit pricey but everything was terrific. We had: Mojitos (minty fresh!) EMPANADAS: shredded picadillo pork, roasted chilis, pepper jack, cabbage salad, coconut-roasted jalapeno sauce. (Mm) EMBUTIDOS: cured meats with hard cheese from Spain's famous free-range "pata negra"  (Mm) CROQUETAS: crispy fritters with potatoes, queso, green onion, and a tamarind-chipotle bbq sauce (MMmm) MASITAS:  spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans, rioja caramelized red onions (MMMMmmm) TIERRA Y MAR: marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted tiger prawns, sofrito mashed potatoes, avocado-cilantro pesto (OMG MMMMMMmmmm) ARROZ CON POLLO: cuban style braised chicken, plantanos maduros, yellow rice (MMmm) HAVANA BANANAS: caramelized sweet bananas, walnuts, cinnamon, vanilla ice cream (STFU/OMG I want more MMMMMMmmmm) HOUSEMADE FLAN: infused with santa teresa orange rum (MMMmmm) Look: if your mouth isn't drooling or your pupils aren't the size of dinner plates, you are a zombie. Everything above was perfectly done, plentiful, and one of the of the best all 'round dinners I can remember.
Wow.  Where to begin.  Should I start with the decor? The three different rooms: a bar area, a dining area, and a smoking area.  Each with its own style yet all connected to the whole.  How about the service?  Friendly, attentive, fast, all during a fairly full house But since we're here for the food, let's talk about that.  Easily the best Cuban restaurant I've ever been to.  I ordered the Tierra Y Mar (Surf and Turf) which consisted of a marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted tiger prawns, sofrito mashed potatoes and avocado-cilantro pesto.  The steak was perfectly done, tender, juicy and well seasoned.  The three HUGE prawns were absolutely delicious, with plenty of coconut to taste.  The mashed potatoes were orange and very smooth.  Absolutely great course.  We also ordered a side of fried plantains and for dessert I got the Havana Banana which came with vanilla ice-cream.  Both were sweet, perfectly fried without being overly breaded.  A despite being fried still seemed pretty light. They also have an extensive selection of rum and cigars, but I didn't try any so you'll have to try them out for yourselves.
Came here for dinner with a friend, walked in without reservations, and lucky for us we didn't have to wait to be seated! The place was practically packed by the time we left, so it was good that we came early.  I was very impressed with the food & service. We received our waters and bread immediately & they refilled our cups quickly and checked on us often. For starters, we had the plaintain chips de pollo along with sangria, the weekend drink special, and boy was it refreshing! For our main dish, we shared the Paella de la Bodeguita (which supposedly serves 2, but easily could have fed a party of 4 or 5). The dish consists of clams, mussels, prawns, fish, & chicken with spiced yellow rice & green olives. OMG...one of the BEST paellas i've ever tasted. It had tons of flavor and just enough spice. We were stuffed, and barely put a dent in our dish. We were even able to take a hefty portion each home.We ended the night with the coconut sorbet, which was yummy as well. I wasn't dissapointed in any dish we ordered. Will definitely be coming back here if i'm in the area and i would definitely have the seafood paella again!
Been wanting to try this Cuban place on California St. in Palo Alto for a long time and finally had the chance for lunch. It's a cozy and comfortable place with an unassuming storefront right next to Izzy's bagels and basically across the street from Jin Sho. I've only had Cuban twice in my life but they offer a wide range of Cuban items for lunch - anything from the usual Cubano pork sandwich with pork, ham, cheese, and pickles to arroz con pollo (which I didn't know was Cuban at all - thought it was Mexican?) to fancier steaks and seafood cooked Cuban style. The masitas (spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans, cilantro, rioja carmelized red onions) came highly recommended and I liked it a lot. It didn't look all that special - mainly a pile of pork with sauce and black beans over white rice but it did taste very flavorful and had a hidden spicy kick. I liked that dish a lot except that the pork pieces were a bit more fatty than expected (but maybe that's how it's made). Service was very friendly and they filled my water glass many times. Nice place for a business lunch and it doesn't get insanely crowded and loud at lunch like Joanie's or Brioche down the street. Bottom line: Great place to try out Cuban food. If you are new to Cuban cuisine, I suggest coming here for lunch first to try it out since dinner prices are definitely a lot higher. (Lunch: $7.50-$12 per entree and dinnr is $16-23 per entree).
The starters were yummy but the rest of the meal was middle of the road quality. The steak was tender and it was seasoned well but nothing special. The shrimp had a nice crunch to it. Pleasant experience
Been here for lunch three times now, and every time I loved it. First visit was pretty funny.  I made a bet while totally wasted at Rosatti's.  Then I came here to pay my bet and almost got wasted again.  The mojitos are hella good!  I had to control myself since I had to go back to work.  Had the crab cakes and some soup.  Then chilled in the back "cigar" room.  Prices also really decent. Second time I had a Cubano Sandwich.  You know its good when I eat mustard and don't complain.  I don't even eat mustard with my hotdogs.  The Cubano is also very elegantly cut diagonally, making it easy to eat without stuffing your face.  Today I had the Mahi Sandwich.  Lightly breadly then deep-fried with mild seafood sauce on top of a bed of mixed greens--also good, but I prefer the Cubano. Waitress today was extra nice and upbeat.  I like that.
We went there for lunch for a friend's birthday. Our waiter was a complete waste of space. Took him over 10 minutes to bring us water and bread. He took an order for 2 Heinekens which never came, because it turns out La Bodeguita doesn't serve Heinekens! Then of course, the crowning touch, cutting up my friend's birthday cake and returning it to me in a box instead of serving it to us, then wanting to charge us $2 each for a dessert fee. (Also I asked him to cut it into 6 pieces, we ended up with 8.) Overall, a very memorable experience. Don't get me wrong though, the food was oh so good! I recommend the skirt steak, medium rare.
I've been here for lunch with my department and after work drinks/dinner with friends, and this place never disappoints. They are known for their mojitos, but their other cocktails i've had are pretty damn good too. Tonight i came with a friend to celebrate a small victory and we shared the paella. Good god it was huge! The menu said that it serves 2, but it could have easily served 3 or more, and it was phenomenal. But most food here is really great: shrimp ceviche, roasted pork, cuban sandwich--i don't think they've ever gone wrong.
AMAZING! Its always nice to go to a restaurant and be on the same page as the waiter.  He was super sarcastically funny!   Small little place, if you are driving by, you might just miss it, but you wouldn't want to miss out on this place. To start off, we ordered ceviche, which was amazing and super fresh.  All the ingredients were fresh and just made the food come alive in your mouth! (that's what she said hhaahah) WE ordered the paella and the tierra y mar.   Paella was dee-lish! Huge pot (says it feeds 2-more like it feeds 4) filled with chicken, sausage, clams, mussels, olives, shrimp and rice!  it was a littler more wet than i am used to, but still great! the Tierra y Mar, ( i thnk that is what its called)  was a steak (like skirt steak) with their version of mashed potatoes and cooked to perfection asparagus.  all drizzled with a cilantro cream sauce.  (i'm salivating, just writing this!) THE DESSERT was the best part!!!! we got this banana/caramel dish.  Reminds me of Bananas Foster.   It was banana slices in caramel sauce with walnuts and a scoop of ice cream to top it off.  It was great!!!!
This is a restaurant that I will use any excuses to go to, i.e 3 of my birthdays, my friend's brithdays, date nights with my fiance, etc. You get the picture. We always end up getting the same dishes no matter how often we go there but I'm sure the rest of their menu is great, too. Hope this helps. Mojitos, don't forget to start with this as they will definitely put you in a good mood! CEVICHE. We've eaten ceviches in Mexico, Peru and Argentina and this is right up there. ROPA VIEJA  since the skirt steak has been shredded, you can taste all the all the seasonings and flavorings in each piece. So good!!! MASITAS  the roasted pork again is superbly tender and infused with the right seasonings, not the tough and bland at some other places and slightly sweet from the carmelized onions. Great and interesting combination of flavors. It's not spicy at all. ****************************************************** CARIBBEAN CURRY  FYI - I would stay away from this dish as it wasn't very flavorful. Having grown up on Thai and Indian curry, this was pretty bland. My friend ordered this. It was her first time there. Tsk Tsk.
Wow.... this place is finger licking good! Everytime I go there I am always completely satisfied with my order.  La Bodeguita is by far my favorite Cuban restaurant in the Bay Area. I have ordered several plates which have all been amazing. If you are in the mood for meat I would suggest going with the Ropa Vieja. In the mood for Poultry, I would try the Arroz con Pollo. If you are only into white meat like myself you can ask the waitor to make sure that is all you get. If you are in a seafood type of mood I would go for the Fish tacos or as listed in their menu Pescado con tortilla. Always start of with one of their appetizers.  They are all amazing. I always seem to get the Black bean soup. If you are in the mood for some great Cuban Cuisine La Bodeguita is the place to eat!
My Meal: skirt steak and prawns Appetizer: croquetas I wanted to try a new, nice restaurant in the Palo Alto area, so I did a search on yelp and found La Bodeguita. The reviews were so good I had to try it. And I have to say, the reviews are dead-on. This place is great! The food is awesome. I loved the appetizer and my skirt steak was perfect. :) The prawns were so good, and I loved the mashed potatoes. Yum. :) I always know when I'm eating good food because I can't stop eating even though I'm full. :) The atmosphere is very romantic. The tables are widely spaced, so I didn't feel packed in like I do at some restaurants. This is the perfect place to come for a special occasion. If it wasn't so pricey (I'm a student!) I would come back all the time!! :)
YUM!!!! I hardly give 5 stars to restaurants I've only dined at once, but I can safely say it's one of my favorites right now.    I'm so glad my boyfriend  (actually he was my bf during dinner..but became my fiance a few hours later that evening) loves trying new cuisines, especially for his birthday, so he chose this restaurant for dinner. He totally picked a winner! I can't wait to go back! I was originally going to pick the ropa vieja but he wanted to order that, so I decided to order masitas. Ooooh it was sooooooooo extra yummers!  My df actually said that he would order the masitas when we come back.  It was perfectly spicy - it wasn't making my mouth burn or anything, but definitely had a kick.  For appetizer we order the croquetas. I'm not quite a cheese person, but it was good. Next time I want to try the empanadas.  We shared a palmitos salad, it was very good. Service was excellent as they they just knew when to refill the water or when to check up on us.   I'm definitely a fan. :)
I will never believe anything the man says. First of all, I asked him what appetizers he recommends and one included the Camarones.  He said that on a spicy level of 1-10, it was a 5.5.  Oh no it wasn't!!  It was more like an 8 which I am perfectly fine with when well equipped.  This came out of left field and left my lips burning from the habanero.  Oh boy, the flavor was good though and I was not mad at him.  The shrimp was so succulent. Then I got the Arroz con Pollo - Cuban style braised chicken, spiced yellow rice, plantanos maduros.  Get anything braised here and you will leave satisfied.  You really can't go wrong with this dish or the Ropa Vieja.  The chicken was so tender and just fell apart with the touch of my fork.  Compared to my friend, I got a LOT of bananas and they were big too.  Lucky me! I thoroughly enjoyed this meal and love the casual but slightly urban feel of it. On a side note, you can access the bathrooms by pushing a door and then it seems like it's for multiple people but it's really for one (you'll know what I mean if you see it).  I walked in on an older Filipino woman who was so shocked that there was no additional door in front of the actual toilet.  She was so adorable. Overall, there were funny and friendly people all around.
I have really started to like this place, first just as a bar and lately, as a restaurant. The drinks here are great, they have good cocktails and a nice wine selection. The dishes too are amazing. The only thing I'm not a big fan of is that the place can be a bit snobby. As in....you can't get a table (even on a weeknight) without a reservation (?), or at least that's what the hostess tells me. Went there on a Monday night at 5pm with three people. When asking for a table the hostess showed us to the tables in the bar while all the tables 'behind the curtain' were empty. For now, I'm willing to give her the benefit of the doubt. I find the bar waaaay more fun anyways as many nights they'll have live music.
It is really amazing to find such a phenomenal Cuban place this far from Miami.  The place is named and fashioned, I think, after a real little bodega in Havana or someplace.  The simple, underspoken sign hanging over the sidewalk looks just like the one for the little place depicted in (recent!?) photos of Cuba inside the restaurant. I've only tried one thing, since I've only been there once: el cubano, figuring I had to start with the absolute essential, classic bit of Cuban food you can.  That did not stop me, however, from plunging my fork into all of my comrades' plates.  All were wonderful and my dinner companions were quite forgiving of my gluttony. Beautiful cocktails and desserts, too.  Not a bad table in the whole place.  This is a cozy, underspoken, little bodega in the middle (peninsula) and is a classic that runs on a well-deserved reputation.
Pretty damn good spot for lunch. Prices are about what you might expect in yuppie Palo Alto, but here the food is worth it. I've been here twice so far and really enjoyed both my dishes. The skirt steak is very tender and comes with delicious fried plantains. The steak was a little bit bland for my taste, but after adding some of their hot sauce, it was perfect. The pasta dish, fideos, with shrimp was also very tasty. And the Masitas is YUMMIE! Looking forward to coming back here.. hopefully will get a chance to try their mojitos someday too.
As much as I try to give a select number of places 5 stars, I couldn't resist. For dining options in Palo Alto, this is my hands-down favorite. La Bodeguita hides in an unassuming spot on the quiet side of Palo Alto. You can cozy up in the back corner under hazy light and soak yourself in mojitos. Or, you can join the more rowdy crowd that gathers at the bar for sports. A great ambiance either way. The empanadas were definitely tasty; I loved the flavorful dipping sauce, and even the garnish was good (a well-marinated, cold carrot/black bean salad). Not the most filling app (3 for $9.5), but worth it for the flavor. I ordered the Masitas ($18): a low but wide clay pot of the most delicious shredded pork over rice, beans and onions. My dining companion ordered the Tierra y Mar ($23) at the recommendation of the waiter. Even if the waiter was simply trying to recommend and expensive dish -- it was sinfully good. I managed to steal as many bites as I could; the prawns were sweet and tender and the steak had marinated to perfection. And, the tipping point for me always lies in the details. I asked them to wrap up my left-overs; and the kraft box came out labeled with the name of the dish and the date. My inner nerd squealed in excitement. They like to label things as much as I do! Jeez, I am a serious dork. Nerdiness aside, I highly recommend La Bodeguita for a cozy dinner date for two or dinner parties (hint... hint... my birthday is in March!!)
Since I want to bury my previous review quickly, I'll be eating and reviewing a lot this weekend :p It got off to a good start...I called the day before for a reservation, in the morning when closed, so left specifics as asked, in a message. A few hours later they promptly called back, and even acknowledged my  specific table request..I was pleased they at least recognized it, and they got a few points for that right away. My first time on College Ave, and wasn't sure what to expect. I saw several parking spots and got rock star parking right in front. I was ahead of my dinner companion - my good karma continued, two bar stools where available, so I grabbed them, pre-ordered two mojitos and the empanada to start. Service was prompt and friendly. The mojitos were tasty, although not very strong. I had 3 or 4 over the evening with little impact. The empanadas were freakin amazing. The breaded part was perfectly cooked, flaky and yummy. The outside was drizzled in a awesome coconut jalapeno sauce that had a nice bite to it. The inside was generously stuffed with tender pulled pork. I lived in Mexico for 18 months, and this was one of the best empanadas I ever had. Bravo. We tallied and chatted a bit too long which was almost a mistake. We were seated (my table request seemed to have been forgotten.)  Kitchen closes early here so we had to make quick decisions for dinner. We had the Ropa Vieja (shredded skirt steak) and the Carribbean curry. Both were really good, and in generous portions, we were both pleased and impressed. The shredded skirt steak was a first for me, and very good, something I'll need to find a recipe for and recreate in Guillermo's cocina. The curry was also very tasty..... Service was very very attentive, we never waited for anything...something I didn't notice at the time, but writing this realize and appreciate. We were 2nd last to leave, and the server told us the bar stayed open a bit longer. Calif Ave looked like a ghost town. (ahhhhhh someone please open more Peninsula and South Bay cocktail joints!) so we stayed for one more mojito. I like the bar alot. I never did see the touted rum and cigar bar. Next time. This is a great place....I try to not hand out 5 stars easily, and kept wanting to give it 4....but I can't put my finger on any reason I can't give it 5, especially in light of all my other recent dining experiences. So  five it  is! and I will *definately* be back. soon. Viva la Cuba
Came here for my second time last weekend. I had really enjoyed the food the first time, so I took a lady friend of mine with me seeing as how she had never had Cuban cuisine. We walked in around 7pm, and asked for a seat for two. It was warm out, so I wasn't too disappointed when the hostess told me I needed a reservation for indoor seating. We were seated outside by the door, at a table that hadn't been completely cleaned up and had no utensils or menus. We waited literally 10 minutes before even being given a menu to look at. We quickly figured out what we wanted, but waited another 10 minutes before a server came to take our order. I saw a waiter wait on the table next to us at least three times, but completely ignored us. Finally a server came by, and asked us if we wanted to order food. Yes, we want to order food. We're at a restaurant. The food ultimately came and was quite delicious. If it weren't for the service, I would have given 4 stars. The Empanadas are a must have starter, delicately cooked and packs a bit of spicy kick. The Arroz con Pollo is a staple of many Latin American cuisines, and was prepared masterfully. The Caribbean Curry dish was fantastic, although a bit of an unexpected item on a Cuban menu. The Verdict: Great food, subpar service.
OK, it has to be said.  I have been to quite a few Cuban restaurants, and every time I am left with the thought that Cuban food is just plain booooring. Sure, the mojito was pretty good.  But then all I got was was basically a plate of beans, fried bananas and some pork for some outrageous sum of money.  It was basically the kind of stuff you can get out of a cucaracha food-mobile in LA for $2.  Considering the amount of pretension that this place exhibits, I was very disappointed.  Also, my vegetarian girlfriend had basically one choice on the menu ... typical for snooty restaurants, but still disappointing.
Great food, great service!  I had the tierra y mar (surf n' turf) and shared a side of plantains... absolutely loved every bit of it! My gal pals had treated me here for a belated birthday dinner.  The attentive waiter had quickly accommodated our request to move away from a big loud party seated next to us.  They were so loud that my gal pals and I couldn't hear us talk.  That's no lie even though it did help us get a closer table to where Ronnie Lott was dining with a female companion.... I will definitely visit again!
Wasn't sure why I associated Cuban food with spicy food there was nothing on the menu that was spicy on any level. But I wasn't disappointed with the mahi mahi crusted burger, banana chips w/ black bean salsa, and braised pork shoulder. Waitress was great she gave us suggestions and favorite things on the menu. Banana chips w/ black bean salsa - good, crispy appetizer but it was not evenly salted and the black beans weren't blended so it was tough to scoop the salsa out with a tiny banana chip Mahi mahi burger w/ papaya sauce - I enjoyed it, the fish was cooked through, crusty, the sauce tasted more like mayo the papaya didn't really do much. The bun they used is too thick - maybe a thinner bread would be better because I had to eat it as an open faced burger. Braised pork shoulder - This was the best dish out of the three. Great flavor, soft, sweet and juicy. There were interesting things on the menu i.e. rum tasting and cuban cigars. So probably would be coming back to try those out someday.
I come here for the Mojitos, which unlike their food, are made strictly according to the  traditional recipe.  No Strawberries, coconuts, mangos, pineapples, passion fruit, or other such ingredients or frilly concoctions.. They're made just right, not sickeningly sweet as served in other places. Their Mojitos are so popular, they have an assembly line right behind the bar countertop where you can see them being made. They use real mint leaves, Bacardi Limon Rum, Club Soda, and use a Muddler to crush the mint leaves with the sugar. Also have a pretty good assortment of rums from other Caribbean countries, i.e. Dominican Republic, Trinidad, Jamaica, Barbados, etc. Sorry, no "Caribbean Club" or genuine "Havana Club" rums from Cuba, thanks to the Embargo. We'll have to wait for Obama to lift it. BDM is usually packed until 10 PM on weekends. Mixed crowd, mostly couples, although there are some singles, and there seems to be a local gay women's group which gathers in the cozy Cigar Room to puff away, one night a week. Nice to take a date here, but if you remain indoor in the Cigar Room, be ready to dump your reeking clothes in the washer after you get home, ha! There's an outdoor smoking patio in the rear,  cool during the warmer months, and if you don't want your clothes to stink, yet enjoy tobacco, use this section. I usually eat at the bar, as there's more "ambiente" there. There are also some nice tables, but choose the ones closer to the kitchen, else you will not be able to have a conversation with your date or table mates, as they have a Cuban guitar player on weekend nights, and he can be loud if you're seated close or next to him. Have never eaten in the main dining room, as it's usually full. Service is fair to good, varies according to who's taking care of you. One of the bathrooms is heated very warm, nice if you have a cold-sensitive butt or maybe they expect people to get butt nekkid in there. Maybe some do...Who knows, as it's an open-minded crowd? As other have mentioned, food is "Cuban-inspired" which for the most part, has nothing to do with classical Cuban cuisine. I know what I speak of, as my Mom's Cuban. Cuban cooking should be tasty and inexpensive. I don't think one should pay $18 for what is a simple dish of "Arroz con Pollo" (Chicken & Rice) with some charred plantains, but this being Palo Alto, somebody has to pay for the prime rents along California Avenue. I have also had the "Masitas" (fried pork chunks) which were good, and the Conch Chowder, The best dessert are the "Havana Bananas,"  but they add some spicy walnuts. Ask them to avoid putting these in, as spicy anything doesn't belong in desserts, especially not in Cuban cuisine. Forget about the outrageously-priced Paella" at just under $100 for two! The Cuban Sandwich (roast pork, ham & cheese sandwich on toasted french bread) comes close to what I get in Miami, but it's hard to mess it up. If you want REAL, Home style Cuban food, go elsewhere. But if you want genuine Mojitos with mostly Cuban-inspired cuisine, you've come to the right place!
Good seating, attentive service, and delicious food. Stand outs were the mussels and paella.  Shrimp ceviche and crab cakes were average. I'd come back.
I'm going to try and not repeat what everyone else has repeated already. This place rocks!! The bar area is actually really cozy. Some nites there's a guitarist who comes and plays some good music. The food is to die for! The seabass special or the flatiron steak are two perfect examples of well prepared dishes.  The Mojitos rock- tart and not too sweet. Top off dinner with a visit to the back- the cigar lounge and you've had the complete experience.  I absolutely love cigars and this place has got a walk in humidor with a selection that some cigar stores would kill for.  No joke.  Check it out!  Just writing this review is wanting me to go grab a stoogie!!
For now i'm going to give this place a 3, only because i went there to smoke a couple of stogies. I did try their rose sangria which was tasty and refreshing. Next time I go there I'll be sure to have the food. pros- great ambiance for having a stogie in the back. i felt like i was on vacation for some reason.... nice clean place. Back patio is very comfortable for those who want to have a cigar, there is also an indoor area where you can smoke.
I came here for dinner the other night and had paella and another seafood/saucy/rice dish with lobster and mussels.  It was delicious and the portions were HUGE.  4 of us couldn't even finish 1/2 of the servings. Service was attentive and I loved the pre-dinner cocktail and cigar I enjoyed on the terrace before dinner.
I like this place for a couple of reasons: 1) the bar and 2) the cigar bar (ventilated and with a... Read more 
How to make your boyfriend forget he had a crappy day at work: 1. Take him to La Bodeguita on a Friday night without reservations and even though the dining room as well as the bar are packed, they make sure to seat you within 10 minutes (3 minutes record time for us). 2. Order him rum or rum-based cocktails. He started smiling by round #2. 3. Order the Embutidos (cured meats plate) and the Marinated Cheese with rosemary oil. Guys love meat and cheese. Throw in some spicy shrimp on top of spicy sauce drenched baguette and they get really excited. 4. Finish with the Masitas (spicy roasted pork). If you're guy is carb-conscious, ask the server to substitute the rice and beans for a yummy bed of steamed veggies. 5. Pay the bill - a guy deserves to be taken to dinner every now and again :) 6. Go home, share a glass of Cognac and call it a night! Success rate: 100%
Chef Lord Stevenson has blessed this fancy wine and dine with some of the most amazing cuban inspired food that I have tried in a long time. My wife ordered the ROPA VIEJA, which she enjoyed thoroughly. The shredded skirt steak was extremely tender and palatable, basked in medium spicy peppers and zesty tomatoes. I personally thought it tasted like sloppy joe's sauce "with a kick". Note: I love sloppy joe's sauce. Wife kicked me down some of her amazing plaintains off her plate, definitely recommended. Holy moly: I ordered an amazing sandwich called PULLED PORK SANDWICH, holy moly this thing was good! A hefty roasted pork topped with dill pickle and jalepeno slivers on cuban bread. It came was a delicious tangy tossed salad. It was like a mexican torta, the bread was very fresh and soft. If you are looking for some amazing latin cuisine for lunch, you will not be displeased with the dishes here. The prices are great and the ambiance is very lush and sophisticated. NOTE REGARDING SERVICE: I removed 1 star from my review because the staff during lunchtime was not the most pleasant experience. First, it took 10 minutes for the waitress to take our order (despite the fact we got seated immediately and that three different waiters walked past our table, this infuriated my wife). Second, a waiter passing by came to our table... only to kindly ask my step daughter to eat her bagel outside due to health department issues (not even a "we'll be right with you" oh hell no). Third, the waitress who waited on us didn't seem like she was happy to wait on us, seemed rather bothered or distant. The food will definitely make up for lack of hospitality. I hope that our next visit will be a more hospitable one. HOSTESS AND BUS BOYS: Amazing and attentive. WAITERS: Needs work, kinda rained on our parade.
I've been meaning to try La Bodeguita Del Medio for the longest time.  A bunch of my Yelp buddies have given the place four star reviews so that helped sway my decision on finally checking out this place a few weeks ago. I knew before seeing the menu that I was gonna get the Arroz Con Pollo ($17.5).  He got the Tierra y Mar ($25).  To share we got the Croquetas ($9)  appetizer & he drank the Santiago Cooler ($9) & I got the Coco Spritzer ($8).  The Croquetas are fried potato fritters with cheese and a tamirand-chipotle bbq sauce.  This however tasted more cheesy than potatoey and the sauce tasted like marinara to me...so this was so reminiscent of mozzarella sticks.  I liked it though!  His drink had two types of rum, including dark rum mixed with juices.  Mine was Bacardi coconut with pineapple juice & soda water, surprisingly his tasted fruitier than mine even with the dark rum float!  My chicken was very moist and served on top of yummy rice along side sweet plantains.  I just wished that they gave a better cut for the chicken, it was the breast where the wing connects and was hard to get some of the meat out. His Tierra y Mar was a yummy twist on surf & turf.  The steak was a thin skirt steak served with coconut crusted shrimps with asparagus drizzled with a nice cilantro pesto sauce.  I still liked mine better but his dish had nice flavors too.  Our waiter wasn't very talkative and could have been a little more attentive but the food makes this lesser traveled part of Palo Alto worth a trip back.
I have been here several times in the past, but the last two times, it was for the cigar room in the back. So now that it is the summer time, the back porch at night is actually really nice.  It's nice that they have this in the back, and even nicer that they actually let us bring booze back there to compliment our cigars.  Only thing is that I hate seeing people leaving their glasses behind, as I did this last time I was there.  They always tell you at the bar to please bring the glasses back to the bar since the employees can't go into the backroom area, but so many assholes leave their drinks behind, that I wonder when will be the day that they just decide not to let you bring your drinks back there, or if there ever will be a time that they can't serve drinks because all of the glasses are in that room. So I usually have a mojito there since that's what they are known for, and I don't feel too guilty about asking the bartender to make one.  (I've heard several bartenders say that they hate making mojitos because of the grinding)  I am not a person who really likes the sweet drinks, so I can't have too many of these, but it is definitely a refreshing drink... :D
Muy bueno!! Started with the Marinated Cheese.  Oh thank heaven for lactose tolerance... it was delicious. Entree I had the Arroz con Pollo.  It was definitely some of the best chicken I have ever had.  It was tender and juicy and super flavorful.  The rice was great; but I just can't get used to the weird texture of plantains. My date had the Tierra y Mar.  Of course I had to try it.  The steak was melt-in-your-mouth incredible and the shrimp was crispy goodness. 2 thumbs up for the mojitos too!
Had a lovely birthday dinner here!  The food was universally delicious (especially the paella), the mojitos refreshing and the ambiance casual yet festive.  Judging from the large crowd, it seems many others have discovered La Bodeguita's charm. Unlike other reviewers I found the service to be more than adequate.  Glasses and bread were refilled quickly, the food and appetizers came out in appropriate time and they were very helpful in cutting up a birthday cake for dessert. The ambiance and price point lends itself well to a variety of occasions - with the mains in the high teens / low twenties it makes a nice "dinner out" with your partner or friends, but it also has a few larger round tables that make it great for family get-togethers.  Additionally the large separate bar area is a great place to stop off after work and grab a drink and snacks or for a more casual meal. All in all, a great find!  Look forward to coming back
I'm not sure I would consider Bodeguita authentic Cuban, but I love some of the seafood dishes here!  (Not that I'm an expert on Cuban food but after having gone to Versailles in So Cal, it's really hard to find it comparable since the flavors are so different). My must orders when coming to Bodeguita del Medio include the Bodeguita Ajiaco and pan roasted mussels.  Not only is there a plethora of seafood in the ajiaco dish (lobster tails, prawns, mussels, oh my!), but they throw in yucca and plantains which is total icing on the cake for me.  The dish is supposed to feed 2 but seriously, you have to be 2 very hungry people to completely kill off that dish.  And the meal wouldn't be complete without the chocolate rum cake.  It's rich and decadent, just as chocolate cake should be. I've also tried the paella (presentation great) but I still prefer the ajiaco over this.  The tumeric flavor is on a strong side for me.  But don't get me wrong.  If our group orders the paella, it's not too much tumeric to keep me from still stuffing my face with it! The few dishes I didn't care for were Arroz con Pollo (bland), shrimp empanadas (the pastry dough is too heavy for me) , coconut shrimp (should be called blackened shrimp). And if you're looking for a strong drink, the Stroh Rum punch at 160 proof will make anyone a light weight.
Had a work-dinner here last night, and was quite excited to try Cuban food.  Plenty of drink selections at the well-stocked bar, specializing in many many varieties of rum.  Of course started with mojitos, and then tried several different "signature" drinks.. also some 18-year old rum neat... quite nice... after dinner, had some dessert ("Havana Bananas") + after dinner drinks, and then retired to their cigar lounge... interesting way to end a dinner! Onto the dinner itself:  we started with several appetizers (smoked meats from Spain, fried plantains, shrimp empanadas).. all were delicious.. my entree was "Masitas" (basically spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans) in a big bowl.. delicious.. pork was very tender and flavorful. Ambiance is quiet and it does sort of "transports" you to a Cuban evening (not that I have been there, but it seemed proper) Service was also very good quick. It's in Palo Alto, about a mile from Satnford, so if I'm ever in the area, I might stop by again, for some more of the tasty food and excellent drink choices.
We originally had reservations for 15 guests at Tamarine but the plane crash induced blackout changed all that. We didn't find out til 5:30 that Tamarine was closing its doors for the day and immediately began frantically calling any local restaurants that would take a large group of people that was celebrating an engagement dinner. Not easy. Thank God for La Bodeguita as the graciously took our party in, let us set up shop with decorations and such for a wonderful night of good food and celebration. We just about ordered every appetizer on the menu and I must say that the mussels were very memorable. Perfectly cooked mussels is rarity... The Arroz Con Pollo was delicious and the chicken breast was not dry nor over braised so that the meat still held together. Bodeguita Ajiaco was a mound of seafood heaven and the broth was awesome. My one gripe would be with the Paella. I guess I don't like having large chunks of dried red pepper flakes in my rice but maybe that's just me. Personal preference I guess. Overall, great meal and grateful for their willingness to take such a large group on short notice.
I've waited many years to come here (I'm not even exaggerating!), so it could be years of hype that may have made my meal less impressive. While the food was decent, I felt it was unimpressive. I came for lunch - my steak wasn't salty enough, and the pork shoulder was pretty small. The fried potatoes were interesting, and the ceviche was pretty good. If I return, it will be for their famous tequila and mojitos.
A sure win I take people to make an impression again and again. Even took my mom out here for her birthday :] Love their chicken entrees. Cooked to perfection locking in the flavor without drying out the meat. Just tried their fish and pork cheeks last week. Definitely recommend the fish. Crispy exterior but breaks apart softly into your mouth. Pork cheeks were very tender but the sauce was a bit overwhelming. Drinks are solid. Not too sweet. And gotta love them strong. Mojito is a good starter. Be warned the place gets busy. I've never arrived without a reservation or flexibility to sit at the bar.
A solid spot for decent Cuban fusion food.  I always order the Arroz Con Pollo or the Ropa Vieja because of the sliced plantains that come with each dish.  Also had a chance to enjoy a cocktail from the bar as I arrived early.  Although my tendency is to order mojito...I decided to order the drink with three kinds of rum and orange juice, something with the name "Punch" in there.  Holy crap...it's a strong drink...this drink will definitely screw you up and get you on your way to getting plastered.  My group also ordered the Croquetas last night and I liked that it was a light appetizer option to have before the heavy food arrived later. I definitely will go back to this restaurant as well as the others on California Ave. in PA.  It's a low-key alternative to the crowd to the downtown area.
Came here with my family last night.  It was delicious!  Everyone seemed to enjoy their meal.  We are chinese so we did everything family style, so I got to try a lot of the dishes. My favorite were: Ceviche, pan roasted mussels (damn that sauce is good!  I could straight up drink it as broth), Tierra Y Mar (skirt steak cooked perfectly with yummy avacado-cilantro sauce), and spice dusted snapper (pineapple-habanero chutney) yum yum!!!! What I could have done without: paella (mediocre), and mojito - I'm a lightweight and I didn't even get buzzed or asian glow off this drink.... :/ All in all i would definitely come here again for a celebration.  On the pricey side but my brother paid :)
my spanish class during senior year of high school assigned groups of us different spanish-speaking countries, and our job was to prepare a traditional meal from that country and bring it for the entire class to enjoy.  My group had Cuba, so we made ropa vieja, some plantain-based dessert, and something with rice and beans.  That is about the extent of my knowledge of traditional Cuban food...thus i'm a far cry from expert. but i've eaten at la bodeguita twice, the first time ordering the ropa vieja (obviously i had to compare their version to the culinary skills of a bunch of high schoolers), and most recently I had the masitas.  I cannot speak for the authenticity of the food, but both times I was thoroughly impressed...and yes, their ropa vieja certainly rivaled our version.  I also like that both times I left feeling stuffed, thus the prices reflect the quantity as well as the quality.
Finally got to try LBDM after being thwarted a few times for attempting to dine as a walk-in. Despite making reservations for 8pm on a Thursday, we still had to wait a few minutes for our table. AMBIANCE: I think they were aiming for "dim and nonchalantly-sexy," but to me it seemed to be mostly dim and lacking sexy. Although the dining room is quite spacious, the tables are actually placed fairly close together, allowing you to easily sneak a peek at what your neighbors ordered. It was also kind of loud in the dining room... enough so that it could be slightly distracting. SERVICE: Our waiter was very friendly, and came to check up on us a few times, but seemed to be a little forgetful. One of the busboys was extremely eager to clear off our plates, even though I had told him I wasn't finished. FOOD: I'm going to take a wild guess and say that the food tastes MUCH better when you're drunk off mojitos. Sadly (or not?) neither of us ordered an alcoholic beverage with our meal, so we tasted everything without being under the influence. - Empanadas: They're ok, but I was NOT a fan of the texture. The dough was mushy, the shredded pork inside was mushy... everything was mushy. It gave the impression of being undercooked. I didn't like the taste of the coconut cream sauce stuff that was drizzled on top despite loving coconut. - Ropa Vieja: I was not impressed with this dish. It is beef on rice. I get it. Its comfort food. I wasn't a fan of the meat to rice ratio-- waaay too much meat, not enough rice... no veggies... nothing. J thought that the flavors were too heavy... you can only eat a couple of bites before being tired of the monotony. On the plus side, the plantains were delicious! - Caribbean Curry: Um. This was also a less than impressive dish. The shrimp in it was perfectly cooked... so tender. However, the plantains were hard and had a chalky texture.. what a turnoff. This was also an overwhelming dish in the flavor department. Too much of the same heavy flavored food. I guess my main gripe with the two dishes we ordered is that it was too much of the same taste/flavor on one plate. Its impossible to finish the entire serving without getting tired of eating it. Anyway, 3 stars seems fitting. I'm definitely not a fan, so not 4stars, but it wasn't so terrible that it should get 2.
I loveeee this place, try the Arroz con Pollo, tastes very authentic. Not so hard to get a table here but if its crowded you can always go to the bar. Their sangria is amazing and the mojitos are superb. Not so pricey for we had which included 4 drinks, 1 appetizer and 2 entrees, came up about 80 with tax. Waiter was very helpful and quick. Was fast service, and they made sure we were ok. They have a cool cigar room in the back and a little outdoor patio if you would like to smoke. This place if very cute for a date and the food is real cuban.
The seafood paella for two was all we needed for a savory, spicy, and wonderful dinner.  It's def a must try for your next date night and don't forget to order their classic mojito to start which was ever so sweet and minty. The ambience was great; good crowd, dim lighting, colorful artwork, live music in the background, and attentive service.  La Bodeguita has all the ingredients for a fun night out!
I went here for a celebratory lunch today. The service was prompt. We started with the plantain chips, which were thin and tasty. I had the panko crusted mahi mahi sandwich, which was ok, nothing special, very thin on the fish and a lot of bun. The mango spread didn't taste like anything at all. Overall, everyone seemed pleased with their sandwich/salad selections, but I suspect that they really shine with their more unusual and/or traditional dishes, and I'd like to come back here for dinner, although it is pricey. When it came time for the 4 of us to figure out the bill, they were happy to let us use multiple cards, and even brought us a calculator to figure it all out, which was very nice. The service was great, the place was friendly, and we were in and out in an hour, even with deliberating over the menu and the appetizer, so that's a plus!
I went with a group and we shared everything, so I got to taste a lot of its signature dishes.  My favorites include the carribean curry, paella, and plantain chips with black salsa. Everything was yummy here, but nothing exceptional.  It is a good place to come with a group of friends for a casual dinner.
Yes Palo Alto has managed to suck the life out of one the most vibrant cultures and made it seem "themey." This restaurant could have been located in Disneyland aside from the lack of kids and excess of yuppies. Don't get me wrong, I enjoyed the Mojitos, very much so in fact. I believe if I enjoyed a few more Mojitos my experience here would have gone from 3 stars to 4, maybe 5. However I wasn't that drunk. Here's the breakdown: Alcoholic Beverages- awesome, everyone raved about their drinks and how smooth and boozy they were. (Beware, 3 Mojitos = $21.00) Appetizers: We tried a bunch and my favorite was the plantains with salsa. The marinated cheese was like going to Wholefoods and getting a sample off a little tray. Don't waste your money. Entrees: My fellow diners very much enjoyed the Paella. The Goat Cheese Salad looked yummy, heard the Cubano Sandwich was good, the Black Bean Soup was pretty average and the Crab Cakes, which is what I had, were  good, but nothing to write home about. Dessert: Skipped it, we were too poor at this point to buy anything else. Overall I'd say just go and drink. Maybe split an appetizer with a friend. Then with the money you saved catch a raft to the real Cuba.
Very flavorful food. Went there for lunch and had the vegetarian black bean sandwich. The black bean patty was very flavorful with cilantro and cumin seasoning. Really yummy! Would not hesitate to go back again.
A little bit of Havana in Palo Alto! Why haven't you tried this place!!! La Bodeguita Del Medio, like other great restaurants on California Ave. (i.e. Palo Alto Sol) is often overlooked simply because it's located in that "other" part of Palo Alto and not in downtown on University Ave. Whether you come here to dine on rare and killer cuban food, chill in their masculine and cool cigar room, or discover what a great mojito really tastes like... La Bodeguita Del Medi is the place.
yeah.. this place was pretty good..... I've been there 2 times now for lunch, and had 2 different things, and they were both pretty good. On the pricier side of lunch for me (stuff is $8-15) but I didn't feel like I got jipped, rushed, or that the quality was undeserving. Give it a shot if you are looking for a change.
Great place!  Been here maybe 3 or 4 times and can't wait to go back.  Best cuban food in the south bay.  I know, it's a low bar, but still these guys do the job.  The food is great from the Paella to the pork to the purple mashed potatoes that came with my flank steak.  Just good stuff.  Ami is a vegetarian and there are not many options for her (cubans love their meat), but there is one dish she really likes here. What I dig even more than the food is the drinks.  Anyone who knows me knows I like a good well made drink.  Two stand out in my mind in the south bay - the Manhattan at Il Postale and the Hemmingway here.  Just outstanding.  The last time Ami and I were here we made it our mission to drink every single cuban drink on the menu.  If you choose to accept this mission as well, know that you will have a good time and know that it will probably take you sitting for awhile at Antonio's down the street drinking some water to be good enough to drive.  Better yet, rope someone in the be your designated driver. Anyway, the one questionable area of this restaurant is the service.  I've had two great waiters here who made good recommendations, were quick to serve and were just fun and friendly to talk to.  I've had one bad waiter and it's always a bit of a trying experience to try to make a reservation (phone system is bad, they don't call you back and they have somewhat of a bitchy attitude. Bottom line: You can't beat the food, you can't beat the drinks and you definitely can't beat the combination of the two.  It's just a bit pricey, but hey you'r worth it every now and then, right?
A friend just introduced a group of us to La Bodeguita recently. Can't believe I've never been here. Loved the warm feel of the restaurant, the music, the ambiance. They also have a cigar bar in the back for you to enjoy afterwards should you so choose. Brilliant idea. Our waiter was Wes, one very cool dude who provided great service and knew the menu well. We were all very pleased with our food and drink. They were serving a blood orange sangria that night. HELLO, tastiness. It was sweet with a little hint of cinnamon and spice. It has the potential to be one of those ninja drinks that sneaks up on you because before you know it you've down a bottle's worth and can't see straight. We ordered empanadas and plantain crusted calamari for appetizers which did not disappoint. I had the Tierra y Mar which is a cuban take on surf and turf. Very good. A friend had the Ropa Vieja which was awesome too. Somewhat like carnitas but with beef so how can you go wrong with that? And to top off the dinner, Wes was very sweet and brought a birthday dessert out for us. It was vanilla ice cream swimming lazily in a liquid pool of caramel and walnuts. There could be other ingredients in there but we wouldn't have noticed because we were considering using straws to drink up the caramel. Needless to say, I will return here again.
I am so glad to have found this wonderful Cuban restaurant. My fiance and I love coming here on our date nights because the food is Amazing and there service is impeccable! You are always greeted with a smile and the staff makes you feel at home....Literally:) My Favorite appetizer is the shrimp ceviche. I have tried many versions but the black beans and coconut milk add the perfect balance to the citrus shrimp. Definitely try Tiera y Mar and my Fav Ropa Vieja. Well i can go on and on about how Delicious their food is, but i know whatever i try i can't go wrong. All the food has great flavor and goes hand in hand with a traditional Cuban Mojito!!! You Got To Try It:)
I love this place! The atmosphere, ambiance etc is really very relaxing. I really appreciate the laid back yet upscale feeling. Mojitos were ordered immediately actually before i even sat down! wow super tasty by far the best I've ever had...believe me I've had a few! We had to order the empanadas, tender pork with a light hint of roasted chili's and a very interesting coconut jalapeno sauce...excellent. You have to try the Ropa Vieja...I'm pretty sure it was skirt steak... not usually my preferred cut but in this instance when paired with that awesome yellow rice and plantains it was almost embarrassing how fast i was eating! Salad...i really enjoy a nice fresh salad...kind of a palette cleanser for me. Frisee,avocado,grapefruit and spiced walnuts...perfect. I'll be back!...I have to say probably one of the tastiest meals I've had in a long time.
So delicious! The Bodeguita Seafood Ajiaco was fantastic, and the portion was huge; 3-4 people easy.  I can't wait to come back and try everything on the menu.
For someone who has never tried Cuban food before the food was excellent, I think I had the empanadas as an appetizer-delicious and almost perfectly cooked, and the Ropa Vieja for the main course. Three starts for the absolutely HORRIBLE service.  I feel like the place is only good for a few people dining, not the small group I was in.  They called to make sure that we were coming which was great, but they made it sound like if we all weren't there by the time of our reservation (they have a 15min grace period which I guess they ignore) they would give up the seats. From the moment we got there we all felt like we were being rushed out.  The waiter was obnoxious and interrupted the conversation many times or hovered over the table and rudely tried to rush our eating.  I understand that it was packed, but we made a reservation and for it being a nice restaurant, I would like to enjoy my food instead of shoveling it into my mouth.  I think the manager and our waiter started to clear our tables before we were finished just to hurry the process along. Good food, but I don't know if I will be back just because of the service.
I went here last night and had the best time.  Perfect Monday night dinner with cigars afterwards.  The food was SO DELICIOUS!!!  I had the plantain crusted goat cheese salad, which was very yummy, and the Tierra y Mar- marinated skirt steak, with coconut crusted prawns--the prawns were so big and tasty!!!   I had a taste of the spicy roast pork- it was so good!  The ceviche looked great- it was swimming in coconut milk.  I did not have room for dessert, but they all sounded fabulous. In the back they have a cigar room and patio.  Large humidor to select your cigar- be sure to at least pet the alligator in there...  I smoked two- a Graycliff and another one (I forget the name) but it was a little sweeter.  Fabulous!  The people I went with made it a terrific night- I want to go here every Monday from now on.  It was a very relaxing environment after a long day at the office. Yay!  This place is definitely worth going to!!!
As the first Cuban place I've been to, this place has set the bar! It's hard to notice from the street but this place is definitely a hidden gem. Although I don't smoke, it's pretty cool that they have a cigar bar and a separate area for it. I love the ambiance, with all the candles giving off a warm atmosphere. We started off with the croquetas -- SO good. Perfectly fried with a crunchy exterior and a creamy warm interior. And that sauce has some kick to it. Speaking of kick, the bread & chili oil! Unexpectedly really addicting to eat... probably why I got full and couldn't finish my food! We ordered the chicken & rice and skirt steak. Deeeeeelish. Although chicken & rice seems ordinary, it was very tasty and definitely not your ordinary chicken & rice. The steak was perfectly cooked and the shrimp that came with it was really good too. MOJITOS!!! I LOVE mojitos. And they happen to make AWESOME mojitos. Every table I saw had at least one mojito for every person, if not 2... or 3! Haha. The bar area was poppin -- seems like a popular place for after work. Definitely coming back!
I went there with my g/f last night for dinner. I ordered the chicken dish which comes with rice and fried potatoes. I've had many chicken dishes from various restaurants and I have to say that this chicken dish was probably one of the best i've ever tasted. It had so much flavor and didn't lack any dryness on any cut of the chicken. The spices within the dish worked very well My g/f ordered the masitas (spicy pork) with rice. She enjoyed the meal as well. I had a small bite of the rice and it had a nice kick to it. Make sure to ask how spicy a certain dish is if you're stomach can't handle it. Think of jamacian food spicy but a tad on the mild side if that helps The waitress was classy and food arrived very quick. The only small knock at this restaurant is their reservations system. This place tends to make an enormous amount of reservations and always gives them the priority. It just feels weird when you step into a restaurant and the hostess tells you that it will be a 30 min wait when there are literally 6 open tables For instance, we arrived at 6:40 pm. They seated us immediately but told us that we would have to leave by 8 pm due to another reservation. It wasn't a big deal since we ate within 1 hour but it just gives the place a different feel when they literally have to force you out due to time constraints. But overall, the food was exceptional
This place is a breath of fresh air in a smog of upscale cyborg Americana. The atmosphere is truly unique, and everything about the establishment, from the decor to the menus to the smoking room in the back, suggests that great care was taken with every single decision made. The Mojitos are fantastic, the service makes you feel immediately welcome, and it's a great date alternative to the cheesy and unimaginative Il Fornaio down University Ave.
This place is great! I liked it much more over the Mexican place nearby *cough* the plantains in the dishes were great.  The best plantains I've tried--still greasy, but not overly so.  Plump and juicy.  The crunchy plantain chip is also great. For an app, empanadas are nice.  I love the nice twist of coconut sauce on them and didn't find it heavy.  Yay for savory with a bit of sweetness.  Below the empanadas are some average black beans with some kind of pickled veggie thing--nice acid to balance things out though.  I also appreciate that they served this with the other entrees since they thought I was getting the app as my whole meal. Both ropa vieja and masitas are recommended.  I enjoyed the ropa vieja a little more though.  Both dishes had a lot of meat.  I didn't detect much spiciness though (then again I like things really spicy :) Next time I would try their arroz con pollo and desserts, and maybe their ceviche.  And their soup.  And their salad sounded awesome too (but I'm biased since I love anything goat cheese).  Meh, I should just come back and try everything. They also have a really good guitar player. It was pretty crowded but service was still pretty good.  The only downside is their higher-ish prices, but it's definitely worth it once in awhile if you're too lazy to drive to SF for similar quality.
I could easily sum up this review in one word: DELICIOUS. But ... I need to kill a few minutes this morning so I'll write a few more words. Made reservations for 6:30 on a Friday night.  Got there right on time (and even found a parking spot right out front) and was seated right away.  The place was almost at full capacity.  The first thing I noticed was that it was super loud so maybe it's not the best place for a romantic date.  That said, both the service and food were fantastic. I now have a new favorite drink and it's not a mojito.  It's called a Coco Spritzer and it tastes like summer in a glass.  Coconut rum, pineapple juice, soda water and crushed ice.   For appetizers we had the shrimp ceviche which was awesome, but I felt a bit mislead and was hoping for it to be a touch spicier (the word habanero threw me off, I guess).  We also had the marinated cheese (mmmm!) and olives (not so mmmm, I'm not an olive lover). Our main course was the Paella for 2, but it EASILY (and I mean easily) would have fed 3-4 people.  It was super yummy and if memory serves me correctly, the description mentioned squid, but there was none to be found (phew).  Only tasty mussels, clams, chicken, shrimp and some type of sausage. There were so many other things on the menu that looked delicious and I can't wait to go back and try them all! So yes ... 4 stars because I'm definitely a fan.
Went here last night after a spa day and OH MY! I found my newest fav Cuban restaurant! I read a whole buncha reviews for this place so I decided to make reservations and check out what the hype was all about. I'll quickly review what everyone else already has. 1. Mussels are one of the best we've ever had! We basically let our bread soak up all the juice and would scoop up the extra juice and slurp it ;P Tons of flavor which I love. 2. Fresh empanadas out the oven is something you can't sleep on. I even found out I like black beans! Definitely had a nice blend of spicy and sweet. 3. Shrimp ceviche was refreshing with the plantain chips but the mussels and empanadas outshine this app mos definitely. 4. Masitas was extremely tasty on the palate. The spicy porky was so damn tender and mixed with the rice, black beans and sweet onions was heaven! 5. Tierra y Mar was extremely delectable. Everything on that plate went hand in hand and straight into my mouth with glee! 6. Havana Bananas for desert was the icing on the cake. Piping hot and I loved that they didn't skimp on the toasted walnuts. Verdict: I LOVEx3 this restaurant! I had a party in my mouth the entire time with each dish. The big plus is that our waiter was on point with checking on us, suggestions, etc. I'm smiling as I type this review ;)
I've been here 2x for dinner and really liked the food here.  The restaurant is pretty small and the staff is very friendly, especially our waitress who we kept asking for suggestions on what to order and what was most popular there.  Here's the skinny on the dinner: Drinks: We were pretty indicisive, so we asked her to bring out their strongest cocktail and their most popular.  We got their Stroh Rum Punch (strongest) and the Manhattan (most popular - other than their mojitos).  When she brought it out, it looked as if someone already drank half of the Manhattan... but surprise, surprise... there really isn't much of a mixer in there. Just 3+ shots of different rums. Nice!  The drinks were super strong, but managable. Food: For appetizers, we got the shrimp ceviche and the shredded pork croquetas.  Both were decent, but the shimp was probably the better of the two.  For entrees, we got the Tierra y Mar (3-breaded shrimp, some sort of steak, and mashed potatoes) and the Ropa Vieja (shredded skirt steak, plantains, and yellow rice). All in all the food is pretty good here, but it can get pricey.  We had 2-drinks, 2-appetizers, and 2-entrees and spent over $100.  So for the money, I don't think this place is worth it, but it's definitely one of the better places to eat in Palo Alto.
Wow. This was my first time experiencing Cuban food, so I was a bit hesitant about what to order.  I decided to keep it traditional and order the ropa vieja, and it was amazing.  Tender with incredible flavor, I ate the whole thing.  I NEVER finish anything when I go out to eat, so that's saying something! The decor is nice and the seating is cozy (in a good way).  It can get a little packed during lunchtime, so make sure to come either early or late. I can't wait to go back again!
LOVE this place!  I haven't been back in a while and it's killing me. The skirt steak is the best in the area - hands down.  The quality of the food is outstanding, the drink selections are amazing, and the staff is always friendly.  The chili oil dipping sauce they serve with the bread is so good, my girlfriend and I have tried to figure out a way to take it home with us. I read a review that says since the drinks have 2 pages and the food has one page, that shows you where the focus is.  Well, if you are truly a "foodie", you'd understand that a limited menu means the cooks are focusing on quality dishes as opposed to 2 pages of choices where the quality can waver.  It's a small restaurant, you can't bog the kitchen down with 2 pages worth of selections.  Besides, it's not like Cuba is known for their fettucine alfredo and bacon cheeseburgers...what else do you want them to add to the menu?  And, last time I was there, I can recall at least 15 dishes to choose from.  If you like red meat, they've got it; if you like pork, they've got it; if you like seafood, they got it; if you like vegetarian, they've got it. The only reason I took a star away is the prices.  Yes, I know it's quality food and it always tastes amazing.  But it seems like they are taking advantage of the fact that they are a unique restaurant in the area.  I always compare them to Cascal - and I think they beat Cascal hands down.  But, I could justify spending $80 for 2 at Cascal more than Bodeguita - you get more portions and more selection at Cascal.  And quite frankly, the only "true" comparison between the two is the Latin influence.  But it's all I've got to work with in the area. But that's only worth losing one star - so I still highly recommend this place!
The empanadas were a great start to our meal. My entree was the arroz con pollo and my wife had the masitas (spicy pork) and both were tasty as well. A nice restaurant, with good service, and tasty food. TRIFECTA!
The food here is pretty decent, but the prices are a bit on the high side for what you're getting.  The paella was decent, but I've had much better paella for less money than I did at La Bodeguita.  In addition, the conch/shrimp chowder was rather disappointing.  It's more of a puree as opposed to a chunky chowder and I like some heft to my chowder. Despite some of shortcomings in their food offerings, their mojitos are really good.  There aren't many restaurants in the Bay Area that serve a better mojito.  It's worth stopping by La Bodeguita for after work drinks or if you just happen to be in the neighborhood.
Cuban food in Palo Alto - it's pretty much what you would expect. I am always stunned at how Cuba is a poor country, but places serving their food abroad charge a fortune. That goes double for this place. The big deal here are the drinks. You get 2 full pages of drinks on the menu and 1 page of food. That should also tell you where the focus is. The food was okay. $24 for a bland (yet tender) skirt steak (thank God my companion showed an ounce of his hispanic heritage and asked for limes. Limes and salt totally saved that), 3 cocunut shrimp, orange potatos and asparagus. The presentation was beautiful. I can't deny. Oh yeah, I wanted to order the cuban sandwich, but asked for it without mustard, the bartender was all, they are premade and we can't adjust that. WTF? Is this SFO, where the food is trucked in? Everyone doesn't eat mustard, but maybe in hella whitebread palo alto they do. I don't know. We also had the empanada appetizer, okay, but not stunning. 10 bucks for 3. The sauce was interesting (in a good way) I thought the service was nice until the bartender copped a tude when I asked for less head on my chimay. I can't vouch for the authenticity, the drinks were okay, I can't wait until that damn embargo on Cuba drops and we can import some cuban rum. OMG, it's gonna blow your mind people. The nicest thing about the place was the man singing songs in spanish while playing the guitar, in an amazingly silky voice. We racked up a pretty high alcohol bill, but nothing was spectacular. I was so excited, but ended up being a little let down.
Food: 3 Service: 2 Decor: 3 Atmosphere: 3 I met a few good friends here for an early dinner last night.  We snagged an outside table, which was a mixed blessing because our server appeared to forget about us a few times; most egregiously, we waited about 20 minutes to get our check and then another 15 minutes to get our cards back.  Luckily, it was a pleasant evening. This is not authentic Cuban food like you'll find in Miami.  Thematically, it's headed in the right direction, but the yuca and plaintain chips were too dry, the masitas (roasted) pork wasn't juicy or spicy enough, the ceviche was bland.  We ate everything because we were hungy but not because anything was irresistable.  If you want a reasonably healthy take on Cuban, maybe you'll really dig this place. As for the much-celebrated Mojitos, I wasn't impressed.  I have had much better at many SF bars and restaurants.
I guess I am with the many who want to like this restaurant but are put off by some aspect of it.  Maybe I was just looking forward to trying it too much and for too long. Summary: Unless you just have an insatiable craving for Cuban, try any one of the other great restaurants in the 10 mile radius. Overall for our lunch the food was good, not as expensive as I expected, though also not very large portions.  I liked the ambiance, but the place was too loud, even being half full, for serious conversation.  The service was friendly but mediocre. Food: Ropa Vieja: Very well cooked, barely adequate portion for lunch.  Rice and beans were well done.  Overall flavor was OK. Feta salad: Really good, though seems really expensive for what you get Habanero chowder: Tasty.  Note, not spicy Service: Slow but friendly but.....What is up with the bread?  After the waiter apologized for getting to our table late, we explained that we were hungry, and could he please bring some bread.  We got 5 little pieces for 3 adults.  Then, when our lunch came, we asked for more bread.  We got another 5 little pieces, all ends.
If you're a short little girl like me, you should probably share a dish with your other short little friends rather than ordering your own. This place gives pretty ample portions The pork masitas was decent but certainly not memorable and certainly not palate stimulating.  I got bored of it after a few bites.  My friends had the vegetable plate (the sweet potato mash was really good!!!) and the curry (pretty good, lots of shrimp).  And since it was their 10-year anniversary, they comped some pretty decent croquettes and some not-so-decent-and-very-chewy mushroom empanadas. Don't order the plantain chips unless you like chewing on stale cardboard with a little salt. Oh yeah, and our waiter kind of abandoned us.  We probably waited at least 15-20 minutes for our check.
Tried out their lunch menu the other day and all 4 of us were impressed with our picks. I had the Pulled Pork sandwich:  The meat was very tender and I enjoyed the spicy sauce.  I could have done without the caramelized red onions.  A friend of mine was telling me her husbands favorite thing to order at a Cuban place was the pulled pork so she wanted to taste it.  My response after I ate the whole thing...... Oops, I am sure he would enjoy it as much as I did. The others had the Grilled Chicken Breast sandwich and the Panko crusted Mahi Mahi Sandwich.  I did not try these but they were raving on how good they were. I hope to try out their Mojitos and their dinner menu next.
I had the Coconut Curry, it was not good at all, it was more on the heavy side, smells a bit of stinky.  The portion was big, so I boxed the rest to go, a few minutes later, I could smell the stinkiness out of the To Go box.  Of course it stunk my car as well.  We also had the Croquetta (fried potatoes) for appetizer, it was alright.  All in all, the bill came to be quite high.  Food was average (mine was a bit of smelly), it came to be about $45-50 per person. You can eat at a Michelin rated 1 star restaurant for that kind of price! btw, after you finish eating their food, it took a really long time to digest and it doesn't make you feel too good.  I had to drink lots of mint tea to ease the stomach and the digestive system. I will not go back to that place again.
I had a better than expected experience here... App: Habanero Shrimp - good but not as spicy as expected Main: Cubano sandwich: decent, the dressing on the salad it came with was really good Ropa Vieja: very good, steak was tender and flavorful Mojito: weak and disappointing Not sure if I would make a huge effort to go back but if I was in the area then maybe. Oh and I heard the owner address a large group near us because a few ppl were running late and they were only given a 2 hour time slot...I felt bad for them because I overheard that some kids were taking the bus which they missed and it was a birthday dinner for college kids who probably would have liked to relax and eat and drink. Not cool.
The only reason I'm giving this place any stars is because the first time me and my boyfriend came here, the food was http://bomb.com . Decided to come back here a second time with my parents because once a week I take them out for dinner to a spot they wouldn't usually go to. Anyways. Before we even got to the restaurant I was hyping it up, telling them that the food here was hella good. Unfortunately, they have yet to try the food here. Actually, they probably never will. Why? Because we walked out of that damn restaurant before we could even be seated. I understand the concept of waiting. I also understand the fact that whoever puts their name down first, gets seated first. BUT, let me just get to the "but." We arrived at the restaurant around 7pm, and at the time there were only about 2 parties ahead of us. The hostess had informed us that there was a 20 minute wait, and we were fine with that. After about 20 minutes, and hella people coming in and sitting before us, the hostess had told us we were NEXT. Mind you at this point there were hella tables open already and the people whom those tables were reserved for, were about 30 minutes late. Anyways. 10 minutes later, more people come into the restaurant. More people get seated. I'm sorry, didn't you tell us we were NEXT? Like I said, I don't mind waiting. I don't mind that some people came before us. But what I do mind is that you tell us we're next when in fact next means we still have to wait hella longer. So what does this idiot do? She decides to try and seat us at a table that is clearly too small for even 2 people. Uhh no, there were 3 of us, honey. Not all 3 of us are gonna fit. Some waiter gave us each a free shot of Jameson to ease the wait but at this point we were already hella annoyed by the hostess. After about an hour of waiting and being "next," we decided to just walk out. The hostess here at the front has no sense of logic and no idea how to run a damn seating chart. Hire someone more competent, please.
I've been here a couple of times and have been very pleased with the food. I'm half Cuban/Half Puerto Rican, so I have higher standards... My aunts and grandma are great cooks!!!! Oh, how I miss their cooking!! Anywho, start with Croquetas for appetizers!! I've had "authentic Cuban croquetas" (as far as authentic as it can be in Puerto Rico or Miami, hehe), and these were YUMMY good!!! Not like the ones I was used too, but certainly worth going again just to have some more :) Last time I went I was feeling a little bit more adventurous, so I had the Caribbean Curry... and was VERY pleased. Be prepare to share if you are not used to eating a whole lot. For a more classic Cuban Dish try Ropa Vieja. Service was good and environment pleasant. Really nice place to go out on a date!
3.5 stars .. We headed here for a lunch today and just barely beat the rush.  Small, quaint place.  Service was good and fast until we wanted our check. Overall, not bad but nothing completely memorable. *empanadas - kind of spicy but tasty, only came with 3, the better of the three appetizers which we tried *plantain chips w/ black bean salsa - standard, nothing special *croquettas - tasty but I liked the empanadas better *pollo con arroz - doesn't live up to the hype, chicken was tender...overall it wasn't bad but it wasn't great either *cuban sandwich - my friend had this and said it was ok *chowder - kind of bland for me but my friend enjoyed it *we got a key lime tart for the bday girl but unfortunately it wasn't good way.too.sour even for a lime tart
This place is awesome, we went with a couple of our friends and we got the booth in the back, the restaurants atmosphere is so fun and relaxing. The food was so good! For appetizers we had the shrimp ceviche, yum...we also had the potato croquettes, which were really good too. My hubby and his friend had the tierr y mar, which was delicious! I had the special which was coconut crusted tuna, which I had to finish the tuna it was so good, I wanted to finish all the potatoes but there was no way I could. My girlfriend had the carribean curry which was really good, not too much curry, which I like. The cigar lounge in the back was fun, we had some wine while the boys had some cigars. We will definately be back.
I looooove this place! The paella is the best I have had in the Bay Area and the mojitos couldn't be better. Some of the waitresses are a little moody but once you try the food you forget about the bitchy staff. It is a bit small so reservations are a good idea.
Evidently La Bodeguita Del Medio is cuban influenced but not authentic, BUT it is very well worthy of my craving of gorgeous Caribbean cravings. There's nothing about it that I would change and I think it's one of the best California fusion Spanish cookery restaurants ever! Today, I had a jolly server who recommended the red snapper dish to my companion and let me tell you, the plate left no scraps behind! The red snapper was grilled with coconuts and spices, giving it a semi sweet and spicy flavor; and lay atop of a bed of generously butter fried spinach. Gah! it was great :) I had my usual plata vegetables - is no where to believe is vegetarian! I has a flavor untasted before like a squared bean baked or cooked consistent savory texture on top of mashed potatoes, squash, and other veggies drizzled in green cream. Wow, every time I am appalled by it! Just go there and have fun :) Not many places have a humidor and costumed lounge for smokers. I believe this is the #1 well Cuban influenced restaurant ever!! Even compared to the one I went in Orlando, FL.
I've been here a few times now and have to say I've enjoyed every visit. Then again, each time it has been for a special occasion with great company so who knows! The ambiance is nice and cozy yet still on the upscale end. The mojitos are tasty but not too strong which is great as an aperitif before dinner or if you're driving. Their corkage fee is $20 which I guess is typical for this area but they have decanters and will volunteer to decant the wine for you so that's nice. In the past, I've had the slow cooked pork and it was amazing. The ceviche is great and their palmitos salad is very tasty. Last night though, we tried the seafood stew for two with the lobster tails and it was just ok. I liked the creamy yet zesty sauce and the lobster was well cooked but the rest of the dish consisted of 40% muscles and like 10% shrimp and 30% hard, dry plaintains. I'm not a huge mussels fan and the plaintains were really really hard so after chomping up the lobster, there wasn't too much to enjoy. We tried our friends paella though and that was pretty good though pretty greasy which surprised me. I usually find paella more on the dry side and if anything it can be a bit brothy. I've never had it with oil on the bottom of the pan. Overall, a good dinner but not the best on the peninsula.
I had the Arroz Con Pollo. The chicken was tender and practically falling off the bone. i didn't really need a knife to eat it. However that wasn't my favorite entree; I loved my sister's cuban sandwich! I'll be coming back here to try one of their many appetizing items.
Wow. Excellent food and service. Definitely going back with friends.
I have not been to Cuba, but imagine that they must have brought a little bit of Cuba to Palo Alto. We got a whole bunch of appetizers and they were all really really good! The spicy dipping oil for your bread had a great kick. My firends got a vegetarian dish and it was great. I am really looking forward to coming back for the pork!
I'm from South Florida which is about the closest place you can legally get Cuban food in the US so i consider myself a quasi expert. So I was pretty excited to get some Cuban food and decided to check out LBDL. In a nutshell: great service (the Cuban accent of our server was nice), interesting menu, nice decor with the whole cigar rolling motif, but the food was NOT authentic nor were the prices. My gripe: I've had ropa vieja (the gold standard) for $4 at the MIA airport that tasted 20x better than this stuff that set me back $18. Don't mess with a classic dish! I was too scared to try the flan and didn't want to be disapointed twice. It would be more appropriate to call it a Cuban-fusion or Nuevo-latino joint which could justify the astronomical pricing and odd flavors. I have a feeling that 98% of the patrons had no clue what they were missing out on and were happy to pay the bucks to have something as exotic as 'Cuban' in CA where Baja Mex rules.
I had a bad experience and several good ones. First the bad. I went with my lady and her friend  we stood right next to employee who takes your name for the next table. We put our names on the list and then we waited, we waited and waited. By the way we were the only ones waiting unti about half a hour passed and a couple came into the place. They talked with the employee and she said they could sit wherever a place came available.  When a couple at the closest table to me started to pay their check the second party went up to them and asked if they could take the table since they were about to go. I asked the employee who was still standing there if anything has become available and she said that she doesn't find the tables its self serve. (by the way it's not self serve except the bar) I ended up going up the couple that had just got a table and asking very nicely if I could take the table since we have waited and since the fucking bitch(i said this) never sat us. I think because of my choice of words and crazy eyes they were more than willing to give us the table.  The waiter that night was great by the way.   !} On to the good. Most of the time when I go here the food is great it is awsome even and I have never come here and had it been bad. The service is somthing else but if you can come here and put that to the side the prawns the steak and polo and empanada and drinks are greatttttttttttt.  Bring a date if you can or get a small group of friends. I think this place is expensive. For me and my laddy, drinks appetizers and food it was close to 90.00 bucks out the door. But you get what you pay for.
My wife and I came here for "date night" a couple weeks ago and really enjoyed the ambiance, decor and the food.  Parking was easy and the service was above average.  Our waiter was very friendly and give his personal recommendations when we couldn't decide between dishes. Overall great experience at la Bodeguita!
When I moved down to Palo Alto for grad school, I was totally unexcited.  But La Bodeguita made me happier. I rank this as the best restaurant in Palo Alto.  I've been here several times and have tried a few of their dishes (almost all of the their appetizers and maybe 3-4 of their entrees).  The best thing I've had their is one of their recent specials -- seared tuna with...  goodness, I cannot remember.  You can't get it now anyway.  So, my regular menu item favorite dish is their masitas -- pork on white rice and black beans with carmelized onions.  It's so good that I really can't convince myself to order a different entree.  A shame, I know.  But I am willing sample my dining companions' entrees. I always jump ahead.  Let me go back to their appetizers, in order of preference.  Mussels:  heaven, and their broth is the best thing ever.  I seriously want to just drink it.  Croquetas:  softly crunch yet creamy bites of yum.  Ceviche:  better than Limon's.  OK.  I realize I just can't do this to myself; writing about them is driving me crazy!  THEY ARE SOOOO GOOD. Dessert.  I've had the key lime pie and banana fosters.  Both are heaven.  Make sure you save room. Drinks.  Mojitos are the staple.  They're a little weak.  So be careful b/c you'll drink them like water and have a nice little surprise at the end of your meal ("I drank 8 mojitos?!").  If you sit at the bar, you can sample their rums, too.  I think they have a more formal rum sampling during dinner, too. So, go go go go go go!
The Masitas and Adobo Chicken sando will make you think they stole your momma.  Great flavors, awesome rum selection, bar service is always stellar for lunch. Smoking room in the back is a great get away for long lunches or an after work cocktail or 5.
I'm going to keep this short, since I didn't really get a chance to sample everything. The masitas was very tasty, would have been even better with some kimchi. The flan was kind of myeh.  Didn't like the citrus so much.  Texture was so-so, and there was just somthing missing. Had a decent cafe con leche. Looking forward to going back and trying more eats.
There's so much to love about this place - consistently good service, great wine list, and the food! Oh, the food! Most of the time we just order a bunch of small plates, and then we roll around on the ground and cry and pray to the gods that we had room for more. Of particular goodness are the oyster shots - a raw oyster in rum with horseradish on top and a spicy salt rim on the shot glass. If you leave without trying this, well, I guess we all take responsibility for our own actions in life, don't we? This is a good date place, but I prefer it with a group of friends when you want to sit around and laugh and catch up. Either way, it's a good idea to make reservations. UPDATE (6/1/07): Oyster shooters no longer on menu, but the Ridge "Three Valleys" Zin is still only $8 a glass, so I guess I'll keep coming back. Try the "Tierra y Mar" (yes, turf n surf).
The "little bar on the middle of the block" serves up a famous Mojito with style. In fact, they're addictive and I couldn't help saying yes to our server when he asked if I wanted another...thank god, he didn't come back and ask me if I wanted a third, because I wouldn't have been able to say no! We had appetizers and salads, didn't try any of the entrees because we just weren't feeling an interest in any of them. So, we tried the shrimp ceviche...seriously yummy and not too sweetened by the coconut milk, the crab cakes....the corn salsa was spicy and I loved it but my friend thought it was a bit too spicy so I guess that's a bit of a personal preference, the palmitos salad was interesting, definitely not my favorite....it had grapefruit, frisee, candied nuts, and something that tasted like artichoke hearts (marinated in the same flavorings) but wasn't artichokes. The combination wasn't particularly tasty to me. The other salad we ordered was simple and tasty but overdressed. It was the goat cheese salad, with arugula and a vinaigrette. Yummy, but better ask for the dressing on the side next time. Even though I wouldn't call the food impressive or even necessarily four star worthy, the ambience, service, bar drinks and prices certainly make up for it. And when you go definitely check out the cigar room. It's not too smoky inside, has plush couches and a big screen tv, perfect for sipping a few mojitos and letting the night salsa by you and your friends. On Saturdays they usually have a guitarist playing Salsa music so it will really get you in the groove!
La Bodeguita del Medio, I like it.  Don't love it.  The food is solid, but not exceptional.  It is fun because it is different, but it is not to die for.  I've gone to some lunch meetings here and the place is busy.  I've been for dinner and the ambiance is nice.  But it's not a place to travel to. The drinks are good, I like the mojitos.  The meats can be dry from time to time...other times they can be savory and moist.  Depends on the day or the chef or something. If you are local, it is fun to change it up and have some decent Cuban.  Suerte!
My girl Kelly is a local and picks good places. I love cuban food and there is no mojito that I'm not a fan of...seriously.  It's quaint and off California (which i affectionately call "near the Edge" from the old school 18 and up days) . I enjoyed the Hemingway cocktail and Mojito very much!    The plaintain chips with black bean salsa give had a nice saltiness.  I enjoyed my Tierra Y Mar- the skirt steak was nice and tender and the coconut crusted prawns were delicious. I would love to have had plantains but my generous table mates had the arroz con pollo and ropa vieja and are nice sharers. All the food was good but the best was the dessert. Four girls digging into a mix of sweets: Havana Bananas, Key Lime Tart, and Chocolate Rum cake.   A good night out- good food and conversation and hilarious conversation with the girls.
English: "Come in, come in and have a seat" Spanish: "Entre, entre y tome una silla" And back to English: "Between, between and drink a chair" The atmosphere at La Bodeguita Del Medio is very intimate and cozy.  I met an old college roommate for dinner here last night.  Not thinking that it would be busy on a Wednesday night we didn't bother with reservations only to find the main dining area was full when we got there.  I felt left out that I couldn't be seated behind the velvet curtain but at least we were able to snag a table in the bar.  They serve the full menu in the bar so no biggie. I was a little surprised at how expensive the menu items were.  I wanted to try the empanada but $10 for 3, I'll pass and wait till I go with the husband so he can pay.  ;-)  I ordered a mojito, which was good, not overly sweet like some I've  had.  For dinner I ordered the masitas.  I must remember to try to steal their recipe for it the next time I'm there because the sauce was sweet and spicy and so delicious.  I'm eating the leftovers as I right this review and I'm having a hard time multi-tasking...its that good.  The portions are large so come prepared to eat and I highly recommend making a reservation so you can be seated behind the velvet curtain.
I like this place a lot because it is close to where I work. It is the place where my old boss took me to for our first lunch and also the place where we went for her to say goodbye to me. Sad. I do like this restaurant for its food. All the apps are delicious. I like the empanadas the most, I could eat those empanadas all day long and never get sick of them. Even the cabbage that's underneath it is AMAZING. I hear the mojitos are delicious, I've never had one (during work hours), but I do know that a lot of people head over here after work to get some drinks on. You can't go wrong with any of the entrees - their sandwiches are so tasty! The tortillas con pescado - YUM!. The Cuban sandwich is a "lick your fingers" type of sandwich. Oh, the crab cakes, yeah, what about them crab cakes.. you have to order it! If you are near Palo Alto, Mountain View, Sunnyvale, Menlo Park - this place is definitely a great place to grab some Cuban food.
I went here a couple nights ago with a friend. He just got back from a long time abroad in Japan, so I wanted to pick a restaurant with a something I knew he couldn't get in Japan. Cuban fit the bill. This was my second time here. The first being quite a long time ago. Food was good both times. Only knock I have on La Bodeguita is that their menu doesn't seem to change very much over time. I appreciate originality. In any case, food is still quite good. Atmosphere is even better. There was a guitarist playing in the bar area. We opted to sit in the dining room because the music would make it harder to talk. It was a good choice despite the fact that most sitting in this area were much older or were families. Honestly, I didn't intend the man-date atmosphere. It was pretty intimate with the dim spot lights and hush conversation. Haha it's OK we're comfortable...
EVERY employee that we encountered was wonderful, from the hostess to the bussers to the server. It was warm enough to eat dinner outside- a magical night indeed. Avocado grapefruit salad- get it! From reading the reviews, we decided that the  Tierra y Mar was a must. It was tasty but the must have is the slow roasted pork over black beans and rice with caramelized onions. Let me tell you, it made me forget all about the steak and shrimp. The sweetness of the onions really complemented the spiciness of the perfectly tender pork. You cannot go wrong with this dish. Alas, we had to get to a movie so we didn't have time for what I'm sure are some amazing desserts :) (If I go a few more times and the service and food are consistent, I can see this place being added to my 5 star list.)
Totally dig this place. The first time we had dinner here, I came with a big group of people. We ordered everything except the marinated olives for appetizers, a couple of entrees and every desert on the desert menu. I can't believe I am saying this myself, but everything we had was good, especially the pan roasted mussels, tierra y mar, masitas, plato de vegetables for vegetarians, housemade flan and key lime tart. It didn't burn a hole in our pockets, but I did have to take a deep breath when I saw the bill. On a regular occasion, I will just get the Cubano sandwich. It is $9.00 and absolutely delicious.
I'm not sure if I'm biased... it's hard to tell. I just rented Bueana Vista Social Club... about old time cuban singers... awesome movie.. highly recommend.... however......I'm supposed to be yelping about the restaurant not the movie.... Off I go... Mojito's.. fresh... delicious... I had 3. The appetizers were good... my fav was the croquettes (how do you spell that anyway..?) Then I had the Veggie Plate... delicious platter... yummy potatoes.... the  veggie meatloaf things were OK.... not great.... but the aspargus made up for it... Fun room in the back..... good parking in the back.. it was a great place to hang out and get drinks and appetizers...
Ehhh.... Maybe I just wasnt feeling it this day but the food was just average: *Liked the chili oil deeping that comes with the bread *Croquetas - just plain *Tierra y Mar was OK - the meat a bit on the tougher side *Arroz con Pollo - very tender - I would recommend this *Mojito - Good *Chocolate rum cake - average 3.5 stars. It was over-the-top noisey, so I couldn't really hear what my friend was saying...  anyway, dont think I'll be back, but overall, it was a good experience.
5 Goddamned Stars!  It's a 4, but the restaurants blow so bad out here, it deserves a 5.  OK, thanks to Yelpers, I ordered the skirt steak dish, can't remember the name... it was outstanding!  Just get it. The Ropas dish was sweeter, ok, I was hoping my wife was going to order the spicy pork. We were starving, wanted to try a new place, thank you Yelpers - great and accurate reviews - going to make this a regular stop.
I've only had drinks and cigars here - this is purely a review of the bar. I don't know if this is common knowledge and I don't see it in the other reviews, but you can *SMOKE CIGARS* here. There is a little back room where they sell them for about 20% over retail price and another super-comfy room where you can smoke, eat, drink and be merry. Due to California laws employees aren't allowed in the room. You can bring your own cigars - and I recommend you do. Mojitos are obviously great, they do a good job soaking the mint for a while before mixing. Other drinks seem to be well mixed, too. I'm a vodka tonic man, but those don't go well with cigar flavor. Sweeter drinks are generally better for when you smoke.
Eating at this restaurant is something that I will remember until the day I die.  It is amazing and something that one does not forget quickly.  It's been a couple of months since I have gone but I enjoyed it so much. My boyfriend went there a couple of days ago and keeps bragging about how great the curry was.  It's so good!!!  Not one to forget!!!  An experience of a life time, I do believe.
Everything about La Bodeguita is top notch and very Cuban. I usually order up a Dark & Stormy to sip on while getting down to business with a bowl full of savory, marinated mussels. All of the vegetarian dishes that I have ordered here have been delicious. The coconut curry (minus the shrimp) was one if my favorites. I hear that the meat dishes are awfully good, too. I love the vibrant art and music. La Bodeguita has become one my go-to restaurant on the peninsula for special occasions.
Food: Out of four possible stars, four stars. I got the Graycliff Chowder and the Arroz con Polo. What stood out the most was how well cooked the chicken was done. Crispy on the outside, moist throughout. Oh, and it was a whole chicken. Find me a restaurant that can not only cook a whole chicken perfectly well, and serve it all in one dish. The chicken worked perfectly with the rice because it was so moist. Best of all was the plantains. Wow. Graycliff chowder was supposed to have shrimp, and I expected something a bit chunkier. The shrimp is there though, just blended in. All in all very flavorful and savory. Ambiance/Service: Out of one possible star, one star. The server bringing the food seemed a bit cheerful for my taste. Scratch that; she was far too cheerful. However, I can't dock them for that. Just a note in case you are somewhat a curmudgeon like I am and don't like overt happiness. Be prepared to have happiness showered upon you. Water was refilled often. The restaurant wasn't too loud or quiet. Ultimately, well done.
Somewhere between 3~3.5 stars. Perhaps my expectation was too high based on all the hype and the reviews. This place looks like a pretty popular happy hour hangout spot. All the hip looking professionals gathering at the bar area under the dim ambiguous lighting makes this place looks even cooler. After tasting their super fantastic Mojito (probably one of the best I've had) and other equally impressive cocktails, it's no wonder that the bar area is always so crowded. I just wish the food could be just as good as their drinks. Everything seems to be overly salty that it was hard for me to taste the food itself. I think I drank at least 5 glasses of water during dinner because the saltiness made me so thirsty and it was exhausting for my taste buds. I might come back again just for drinks, not so much for food.
Not sure how it compares to real Cuban food but I enjoyed the lunch I had here. Came with a dozen other coworkers for lunch and the service was excellent. I had a little bit of everything as we were a large group and wanted to try all the flavors. I must say after eating here I'd like to try more Cuban-style food but its pretty hard to find around here.
I like this place MUCH BETTER THAN the Cuban restaurant in San Jose off of Race Street. I've taken a couple dates here, drinks after work, lunch time client thing and have been impressed each time. La Bodegita has a great staff, tasty food- I've enjoyed both lunch and Dinner, and the drinks at the bar are well made. The food is refined-and not in the tiny portions kind of way refined - rather a tasteful well balanced refined that also implies the portions were not an afterthought by the purveyors. Read as: not huge and not small- they gave it thought. Finally, if you enjoy a dessert after your meal from time to time, you won't be disappointed in this category either. A favorite dish:  Cocktail Shrimp appetizer- the coconut milk seals it.
Love La Bodeguita! The Hemmingway's are better than the Mojitos. Get there a little early on Friday for a nice spot at the bar. The Tierra y Mar is fantastic. The sofrito is the best I've ever had. Empanada appetizers are great, but a bit on the pricey side. You must try the fried plantains w/ chili oil and the bread they serve! Delish!
Nice atmosphere, tasty food, and decent drinks.  I just prefer a less fancy environment when having cuban food.  Future cuban cravings will be satiated in downtown SJ rather than here.
Food was expensive and disappointing overall. Taste was not good at all. This was not real Cuban food. I ordered arroz con pollo and they gave me instead Uncle Benz rice (tasted like those microwave bags from the supermarket) with a chicken leg in a tomato sauce. I couldn't believe it. That's not arroz con pollo and I would not accept again paying 15$ or so for cheap bad food.
We just started touring California Ave recently and tried Bodeguita for the first time.  Not disappointed.  I had the Tierra Y Mar and the wife had some pork thing.  Both were very well done and I'd definitely have them again. The place is super crowded, and we ended up sitting in the bar area.  Service was fun and attentive.  We'll definitely come back.
This is a tale of two considerations for my review of La Bod: First, as a bar for drinks, a great choice and definitely in 4-star territory.  They have the real deal with Mojitos and also try their "Hemingway".  Truly great drinks, and bar.  If meeting friends for drinks, this is definitely a good place. Now, as a restaurant, I think it is just so-so.  You have to be selective to get the good stuff.  I really like their Ropa Vieja, which is a shredded beef dish of yummy goodness.  As pedestrian as the Arroz Con Pollo may sound, it is also quite good. With their other entrees, I have been unimpressed.  There was a good fish dish I had once, but I don't recall exactly what it was.  What I can say is that there is nothing special about the service or ambience, and the food has been selectively, but not consistently good. Now, if you ask me where I can find better Cuban food, unfortunately I would only be able to recommend Versailles, which is a long drive down to LA...it's sad... Great Bar, Okay Restaurant.
Setting: Dim but lit enough for you to order and see the people you're dining with. Nice set up. Not too fancy but nice enough for a date or decent dinner with friends or family. Drinks: The mojito tasted a little watered down but it still did the job to get me a little buzzed. Price: At first I was going to kill my friend who dragged us down here because the prices were a little bit pricier than expected (but that was our fault for not looking) but the price isn't going to break you. I was thinking it was going to be the price of a hole in the wall place. I wanted to compare it to Versailes in LA. Food: OMG, EVERYTHING was to DIE for. The Ceveche was mouth watering. It was actually better than some Ceveche I've had back home in SD. The Plantain Chips were good with the black beans but nothing to write home about. But, now lets go for the hella good stuff... TIERRA Y MAR 25.00 marinated skirt steak, coconut crusted tiger prawns, sofrito mashed potatoes, avocado-cilantro pesto. Presentation was beautiful. I almost, just almost didn't want to massacre it but did anyway. It was served with Asparagus that was intertwined with the steak. The steak was tender enough to melt in your mouth. It gave this burst of flavor even before you chewed. The Prawns were huge and crunch. You could totally taste the coconut and there was shredded coconut in the batter that the prawns were coated with. MASITAS 18.50 spicy roasted pork, white rice, black beans, rioja caramelized red onions This dish had all these flavors in one. The onions had a slight sweet taste that complemented the spiciness of the pork. Ohhhh and it was topped with Cilantro... I heart Cilantro. ROPA VIEJA 18.00 shredded skirt steak, peppers, tomatoes, spiced yellow rice, plantanos maduros This is a Comfort Food dish. It reminded me of a Filipino dish but I don't know what that dish is called. The plantanos really brought out the flavor of the dish.
The best Cuban food I've had. Try: The Pork entree and the Shrimp Ceviche. Skip: Goat Cheese Salad- thought this was quite plain. The food was so good, we had to box the remaining tiny portions (there were literally 2 bites per plate left but it was too good to toss)! Romantic (dark lighting! my date even asked if I was wearing powder!) setting for dinner.
We strolled in at 5:30PM on a Wednesday night and asked for a table for 3. The girl studied her reservations book for a while, then said "I can seat you.... but you will need to move later..." Then she thought about it some more, then told us we could sit in the area by the bar without hassle. Yes, it was weird. My friends thought it was an example of snotty Palo Alto airs, but I thought the girl was simply new to being a hostess. Your interpretation is my best guess. Budget-conscious girlfriends and I stepped in for dinner and looked at the prices, and decided to get soups and salads ($5-$10) instead of actual food ($20-$25 for entrees). They were all pretty tasty but not so good that you'd write home about it. I got the shrimp and conch soup, which tasted fine except that I think the conch was a bit hard and out of a can... Overall it was one of the better places to spend a DATE night on California Avenue in Palo Alto. Yes, date night, because us three girls were surrounded by nothing but couples on their first, second, or third dates. Awkward, eager, spendy types. Well, now you know where to go on a date. It's dark-lit, atmospheric, lively, and smells really good.
We came here for lunch and overall it was decent. We had some bread and chili oil to munch on before our entrees arrived, but there was something weird about the taste of the oil. It was JUST oil. I feel like they could spice it up a bit by adding some herbs or just something else to it. I ordered a MWA (mojito w/o alcohol) since I had to go back to work and all, and it was delicious, exactly what I remembered having a few years back. Very delicious and refreshing. For my entree I ordered the carne asada sandwich, it was OK, nothing memorable, but definitely filling and the side salad it came with was yummy and perfectly dressed IMO. The service was REALLY slow and our server kinda seemed out of it. I also don't like restaurants where 5 different ppl serve your table. I get confused and I feel like the experience isn't personalized. This happened and b/c of it, one of my coworker's order was completely messed up. It wasn't very busy at all and still I felt like we had to look for our server multiple times. I like the atmosphere, the food is OK, the service meh, but i'll definitely be back for their mojitos! :)
Absolutely stellar service.  I organized a 10-person surprise birthday dinner with La Bodeguita and they were nothing but accommodating.  I called them multiple times in the week before the dinner, clarifying number of people, etc., and the surprise pulled off exactly as I had planned. I heard great things from everybody at the table about the food, and our drinks and bread were kept filled.  For appetizer I ordered the mussels, which were delicious.  Remember to dip the bread into the mussel sauce, don't let it all go to waste! For the main dish, I wasn't super-hungry and ordered the crabcake appetizer with a side of rice.  The crabcakes I wasn't impressed with.  I'm used to crabcakes with chunks of crab smashed together into a patty.  These crabcakes looked like pureed crabs+stuff, and then shaped in a muffin tin before frying.  They had all smooth edges; it was weird.  The corn salsa that came with them was delicious, though.  The side of rice I ordered was HUGE.  It was more family-style rice that gets passed around than a small addition to my dinner. I was full after the crabcakes, so I didn't order any dessert.  I did have a bite of the birthday boy's cake, which I believe was the chocolate rum cake.  It was good, as chocolate cakes are wont to be, but nothing spectacular. I had a great experience at La Bodeguita and will definitely come again, probably with a smaller group.
Omg best thing that I've had in the longest time. My boyfriend and I ordered the paella for 2. I swear it could of fed at least 4 people. The paella was delicious! I can't describe how well it was made. The presentation was gorgeous. Rows of clams and mussels lined the paella and shrimp and chicken were mixed in with the rice. I've never had paella before but I hope all paella tastes like this one.. Our server was so attentive and very helpful. He wasn't too pushy or to spacey. Just over all a great server. I wish I had got his name though. I also ordered the mojito. It was a little too sour for my taste and I barely tasted any mint. It honestly tasted like a flat seven up. Overall it was a very good dinner. I thoroughly enjoyed the food and the service. I'll definitely be back
Started school here recently and since I live close to this area, we went for a walk in the neighborhood. This restaurant was definitely the most crowded and bustling on a late weekday evening. good signs so we step in. Took awhile for the hostess to get back to the front in order to greet and bring us to our table. (maybe part time waitress?) anyway, sat in a would have been cozy table but the partition was too short for comfort and privacy. Waiter was nice though. I wanted to try their guacamole which was a side on one of their dishes before trying it and got a nice taste. (Normal, nothing too special) We started off with the Ceviche. yum yum! too spicy for the s.o. but definitely a yum for me. nice and spicy with nice toasted plantains for crunch. Tierra y Mar is a MUST EAT wonderfully flavored beef with an AWESOME cilantro avocado dressing drizzled on, large coconut shrimp on top orange mashed potato, and rum cooked spinach (usually served with asparagus which I wish I got but they ran out). The rum was a little heavy but could be paired pleasantly with the mashed potato or beef! The curry was interesting to say the least. it was flavorful but not heavy like traditional curry is. Served with a wide variety of vegetables including plantains and jumbo shrimp. Unfortunately its not a good take home eat for leftovers kind of food :( The night was full of jumbo shrimp good-ness.
I was really impressed by this place. I have lived here for a few years and walked up and down this street, but never saw this place or it's little sign. It's pretty cool. A Cuban themed bar at the entrance and a dining room in the back. We got some croquettas as appetizers and they were pretty good on their own without the sauce they came with :) How can you go wrong with fried cheese and potatoes. Then a friend and I ended up grabbing the ajiaco. So good! Lobster  tails, mussels, shrimp, in a tasty cream sauce. It says serves two... Well make sure you both are hungry (really hungry and not dainty hungry) .. cause it's a lot of food. I could have served 3 looking back. My partner tapped out early so I learned this the hard way. I don't like taking food home, especially seafood. And I don't like wasting food especially seafood (since it's already overfished) So you can guess what my mission was :) It was worth it too. If I would have known my partner would not be able hold in there the entire time, I would have gone for the skirt steak which sounded good as well, but that will have to wait until next time. Lastly we had the Havana Bananas which was pretty good. Just right to finish the night off. Our service was great too. Very accommodating and full of good recommendations. Bar served some good mixes as well. I had the Stroh Rum Punch cocktail that they recommended woah that is potent but tasty. Overall a pretty cool place.
We ate here yesterday.  I didn't have high expectations as my boyfriend is Cuban, and Cuban food in northern CA is spotty at best, but I was still hoping t be surprised. I liked the decor, and I loved that there was a guitarist at the bar.  I was less impressed that despite the reservation I made, we still had to wait (and there was no free bar space).  Service throughout the night was indifferent at best. The place is LOUD.  So loud that when my boyfriend asked me to Yelp that this place is too loud, I said "What??"  We were shouting to hear each other. Food was pretty good.  Of the cured meat platter, only 2 of the 3 advertised meats were available (Serrano and lomo, no chorizo).  I didn't like the lomo and the Serrano was only so so.  The marinated cheese was great.  For entrees, my BF had the pork (really good), and I had the ropa vieja (really good). I've never been to a place where I liked the entree more than the appetizer, but there's always a first for something.  The wine list was nice.  We loved that the restaurant offers Hatuey beer (unfortunately, it wasn't available last night). If the place weren't so disorganized and loud, we'd be back soon for sure.
